http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31black.html?ex=1338264000&en=9c7404a1168c5ead&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Prosecutors Rest Case in Conrad Black Trial Rest Case in Conrad Black Trial THE ASSOCIATED PRESS May 30 (AP) &#151; Prosecutors rested their racketeering and fraud case against the media mogul on Wednesday, minutes after announcing they were dropping one money-laundering count against him. Prosecutors did not say why they dropped the count, a decision that came with no fanfare while jurors were out of the courtroom and issues were being discussed by the judge and lawyers. &#8220;At this time the prosecution rests,&#8221; an assistant United States attorney, Eric H. Sussman, told Judge Amy J. St. Eve of Federal District Court just before 3 p.m., ending the government&#8217;s case against Mr. Black after more than 10 weeks. Lawyers for Mr. Black and three co-defendants were scheduled to begin calling witnesses Thursday in what is expected to be a much less time-consuming case for the defense. Mr. Black, 62, and three other former executives are charged with swindling , a newspaper holding company, out of millions of dollars through the sale of The government says the scheme began with a decision in the late 1990s by Mr. Black, who was the company&#8217;s chairman, to sell hundreds of small Hollinger-owned community newspapers across the United States and Canada. Millions of dollars were paid to Hollinger in exchange for promises that it would not go into competition with the new owners of the papers. Prosecutors say that Mr. Black and two of his co-defendants, the former Hollinger vice presidents John A. Boultbee and Peter Y. Atkinson, illegally diverted much of the money to themselves with help from the corporate counsel, Mark S. Kipnis. Mr. Kipnis is also on trial. The prosecution rested its case amid bickering over 13 boxes that Mr. Black removed from the company&#8217;s headquarters in Toronto late in the afternoon of May 20, 2005, in defiance of a court order. On Wednesday, jurors saw pictures captured by security cameras of Mr. Black hauling the boxes out of the headquarters building and loading them into a waiting limousine. Mr. Black, who is charged with obstruction of justice in the incident, was forced to return the boxes, which sat on an evidence cart next to the jury box while the jurors viewed the security camera photos on a large screen. Judge St. Eve gave both sides until next Tuesday to file briefs expanding on their arguments. A defense lawyer for Mr. Black, Marc Martin, said he would ask her to drop other counts as well. Tells Of Black's Deal On Apartments Judge Scolds Central Witness In Conrad Black's Fraud Trial MEDIA FRENZY; Like a Marriage That Ended Up in Court Punishing Court Day for Black's Ex-Deputy POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31addes.html &#8216;I Love New York&#8217; Awarded to Saatchi Love New York’ Awarded to Saatchi THE NEW YORK TIMES familiar tourism campaign for New York State, known since 1977 by its theme, I Love New York, is getting a new agency as well as an increased budget. The Empire State Development Corporation selected Saatchi & Saatchi in New York, part of the , to handle the campaign. The decision, announced yesterday by Gov. , came after a required review that began in February. The budget for the campaign for 2007-8 will be increased 50 percent, to $16 million, Mr. Spitzer said. There will also be efforts to expand the types of media in which the campaign appears beyond traditional ones like television and print, reflecting the increasing use of the Internet by consumers making travel plans. The I Love New York campaign has been handled since December 2003 by the Albany office of Eric Mower & Associates. Mower was the first upstate agency to handle the assignment, which has had 11 agencies since its introduction 30 years ago. Mower decided in March not to take part in the review. Saatchi & Saatchi was awarded a three-year contract for the assignment, with a two-year renewal option. Room - 1918
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31vioxx.html 3rd Trial Is Ordered in Vioxx Death Case Trial Is Ordered in Vioxx Death Case THE ASSOCIATED PRESS ORLEANS, May 30 (AP) — A federal judge has ordered a third trial in a lawsuit by a woman who blamed ’s painkiller Vioxx for the heart attack that killed her husband. A cardiologist who testified for Merck misrepresented his qualifications in the second trial last year, Judge Eldon E. Fallon of the Eastern District of Louisiana ruled. Jurors in that trial ruled in favor of Merck and against Evelyn Irvin Plunkett, whose first husband, Richard Irvin Jr., died of a heart attack after taking Vioxx for less than a month. The ruling was signed Tuesday, but was made available on the Internet a day later. The first trial, held in Houston during November and December 2005, ended with the jury deadlocked 8 to 1 in Merck’s favor, two jurors told The Associated Press. The cardiologist, Dr. Barry Rayburn, a professor of medicine at the , Birmingham, who was hired by Merck as a $600-an-hour expert witness, testified in the second trial that the drug could not have caused Mr. Irvin’s heart attack. Dr. Rayburn testified then that he was board-certified in cardiovascular disease. When Merck brought Dr. Rayburn as a witness in a second Vioxx trial, in a state court case in New Jersey, however, he testified during cross-examination that his board certification had lapsed. The ruling will not affect other cases because Dr. Rayburn took the board examinations for recertification last summer, has testified in only those two cases and has since been recertified, his lawyer said. Jury Sides With Merck In a 10th Trial Over Painkiller In Big Penalty, Jury Reverses A Vioxx Verdict Mixed Verdicts for Merck in Vioxx Cases Mistrial Declared Over Vioxx Risks Merck & Company Inc Clemente at Shea Stadium - 1967
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31chinastox.html Tax Increase Batters Chinese Stocks, but There&#8217;s Little Wider Damage Increase Batters Chinese Stocks, but There’s Little Wider Damage Mark Ralston/Agence France-Presse — Getty Images Investors intently studied a stock price board at a securities firm in Shanghai Wednesday as share values dropped sharply. Earlier, the government, seeking to rein in speculation, tripled the tax on trading stamps. Thursday, May 31 — Chinese stock markets plummeted Wednesday and continued their decline in early trading Thursday after the authorities in Beijing moved to impose higher taxes on trading activity. Skip to next paragraph The tax increase, which was announced early Wednesday, was the government’s latest attempt to rein in the world’s hottest stock market as a growing number of economists and analysts warn about the danger of a market bubble. Investors reacted by selling shares and pushing the benchmark indexes on the two main stock exchanges sharply lower. The Shanghai composite index plunged 6.5 percent, to 4,053.09. The Shenzhen composite index dropped nearly 7.2 percent, to 1,199.45. At midday Thursday, the Shanghai exchange was down nearly 3 percent from Wednesday’s close and the Shenzhen 5 percent. When Chinese shares fell sharply at the end of February, markets around the world tumbled in tandem on worries of broader trouble ahead for the nation’s economy. But on Wednesday, other Asian markets were down only modestly. The benchmark Hang Seng index in Hong Kong declined 0.86 percent Wednesday, and in Tokyo the Nikkei index of 225 issues slid a little less than 0.5 percent. In its move Wednesday, the Chinese finance ministry tripled the tax on stock transactions to 0.3 percent, which analysts said was probably not enough to destroy the bull market, though it could dampen the mood of speculators. “The psychological impact on investors could be larger than the actual effect of the duty adjustment,” Shen Minggao, an economist at , wrote in a research note. Most analysts said they did not think that a sharp drop in stock prices would harm the Chinese economy, which continues to grow robustly. Some said they expected the markets to resume their climb quickly unless the government announced further measures. “If the market expectation is that share prices are going to rise 50 percent in the next six months, then the transaction tax is affordable,” said Dong Tao, chief Asia economist at The tax was increased at a time many Chinese seem to have gone mad for stocks. Professionals, retirees, shop owners, students — even watermelon hawkers — are said to be lining up to buy stocks in hopes of getting in on the rally. More than 300,000 accounts are being opened every day, regulators say. Brokerage houses are overrun with day traders and people who pack lunches to spend the day staring at stock price monitors. One indication of the mood is a popular cellphone greeting that is being sent around Shanghai. The greeting replaces the national anthem with a call for all investors to rise up and buy, buy, buy stocks. “Arise, ye who refuse to be slaves” from the national anthem has been replaced by: “Arise, ye who haven’t opened an account! Pour your gold and silver into the hot market.” Chinese seem eager to buy stocks not only because they have watched prices soar in the last two years, but also because there are few other opportunities to get a good return on investments. Until the past year, much of the speculative money in China was going into real estate, particularly in Shanghai and Beijing. Policy makers chilled real estate speculation with a series of tax and administrative measures, only to see the speculation move into stocks. Many investors are betting almost everything on stocks. Some said that even the sell-off on Wednesday was unlikely to restrain optimism. “There are too many small investors in the market,” said Fan Ligen, a retired Shanghai clerk who has been investing in stocks since 1992. “They are like hundreds of ants swarming on pieces of meat on the ground.” In the February sell-off, prices plummeted 8.8 percent after the Shanghai composite index surpassed the 3,000-point level for the first time. It was the biggest one-day drop in a decade. But with prices down, new investors rushed in, sensing an opportunity to buy on the cheap. They were right. In mid-March, the Shanghai index retraced its losses, again exceeding 3,000. Early this month, it passed 4,000. This week, it was pushing toward 4,400 on record volume. “Our market is different from the ones Japan,” said Li Wenwei, a banker who was at a brokerage house in Shanghai. “Those markets obey the rules of the market, while ours doesn’t. There are bubbles in the market. The index is already too high, and there is a lot of risk in the market.” In many ways, the stock market has come into line with China’s phenomenal economic growth, a bullish market to match a bullish economy that is growing close to 11 percent a year, creating worries about the possibility of hypergrowth and inflation, a stock market crash and, potentially, civil unrest. The rise is extraordinary. Since July 2005, when a bearish market turned bullish, share prices have soared in Shanghai by more than 300 percent and 400 percent in Shenzhen, even with Wednesday’s drop. That decline, though, was especially sharp — given regulations that no single stock rise or fall more than 10 percent in a trading day. Some stocks fell the limit Wednesday, and questions arose whether they might continue dropping Thursday. “I think the market will still go down a bit tomorrow,” Mr. Li, the banker in Shanghai, said. “My two stocks fell today. But I won’t sell them yet. I’m not nervous about the fall since my investment is from my savings.” David Barboza reported from Shanghai and Keith Bradsher from Hong Kong. Rujun Shen contributed reporting from Shanghai. a Switch, China Triples the Tax on Stock Trades STOCKS & BONDS; Shares Rise on a Wave of Takeover News China&#8217;s Leaders Confront Their Manic Market INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; China Talks Don't Resolve Major Issues Economic Conditions and Trends
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31blue.html?ex=1338264000&en=c3a7f579f981a945&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss I.B.M. to Cut Jobs, Mostly in Technology to Cut Jobs, Mostly in Technology Business Machines cut about 1,570 jobs yesterday to help improve profit margins in its technology services unit. Edward Barbini, a spokesman for , which is based in Armonk, N.Y., said that most of the cuts were in technology services and in North America. This is at least the second set of job reductions at I.B.M. this month. The company earlier dismissed workers in the global services unit. Profit at the technology unit, which accounts for more than a third of sales, fell 19 percent, to $681 million, in the latest quarter. I.B.M. reported last month that its first-quarter gross margin, the percentage of sales left after production costs, was unchanged from a year earlier, prompting the company to pursue cost cuts in the United States. Shares of I.B.M. rose 76 cents, to $106.68, on the New York Stock Exchange The company, which had 355,800 employees as of last year, has cut about 3,000 jobs this quarter. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (16 of 22) Here, But Hiring Over There INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; I.B.M. Job Cuts Will Hit Europe Especially Hard COMPANY NEWS; I.B.M. CLOSING FIVE PLANTS AND CUTTING 500 JOBS IN SWEDEN Technology Briefing | Hardware: I.B.M. Cuts 700 From Services Unit International Business Machines Corp Layoffs and Job Reductions (16 of 22)
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31radios.html?ex=1338264000&en=32fe4d40014e63c1&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss CBS Buys Last.FM, an Online Radio Site Buys Last.FM, an Online Radio Site THE NEW YORK TIMES yesterday that it had acquired Last.FM, an online radio and social-networking site, for $280 million to expand its digital offerings. CBS, one of the nation’s biggest radio broadcasters, said the founders of the five-year-old service would continue to operate it as an independent unit. But the purchase is also regarded as a way for CBS to grab an audience online at a time when many traditional radio stations fear losing listeners to iPods, Internet radio and other competing media. The sale of Last.FM comes as the profitability of online radio has been called into question. A recent ruling by the federal Copyright Royalty Board, which establishes royalty rates for Internet-based broadcasters that stream music online, would raise the existing rates significantly. CBS said the deal provided an opportunity to extend its reach online, including adding some of its own programming to Last.FM. As it stands, the site attracts more than 15 million users worldwide, with big audiences in the United States, Britain and Germany. CBS, which also owns the CBS television network, has also purchased Wallstrip.com, a business-oriented site built around online video and blogging, and has invested in Joost, an online video service. ONLINE; CBS Has a Crush on Wallstrip CBS to Sell Amusement Parks to Cedar Fair FIVE DAYS; G.M., Lucent and CBS Tackle Some Problems With Focus on Youth, 2 Small TV Networks Unite Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Computers and the Internet POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31plavix.html?ex=1338264000&en=ee87f5e346140c8f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Bristol-Myers to Pay Fine to Pay Fine May 30 (Agence France-Presse) — has agreed to plead guilty and pay a $1 million criminal fine for lying to the government about a patent deal on its blood-thinning drug Plavix, officials said Wednesday. The Justice Department said in a statement that the company’s actions had threatened to reduce competition for the drug, one of the best-selling prescription medications worldwide. Government investigators said that a former senior executive had made “oral representations” to a Canadian generic drug maker, Apotex, that caused Apotex to conclude that Bristol-Myers would not introduce its own generic version of Plavix. At the time, the two companies were locked in litigation over the validity of the patent for Plavix. Bristol-Myers, however, was subject to a consent decree that required it to submit any patent settlements for review with the Federal Trade Commission. The government said that Bristol-Myers had also lied to the government about the arrangement. The government inquiry is still open. The patent deal’s failure led to the ouster of Bristol-Myers’s chief executive, Peter R. Dolan, in September. Inquiry Into Bid to Suppress a Generic Plavix Bristol-Myers Says Review Clears Company Study Raises Questions on Plavix Safety COMPANY NEWS; DRUG FOR HEART PATIENTS FOUND EFFECTIVE FOR A YEAR POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31music.html?ex=1338264000&en=e24d1e82aada7253&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Viacom to Sell Music Publishing Unit to Sony/ATV to Sell Music Publishing Unit to Sony/ATV agreed to sell its Famous Music unit, a publishing catalog with rights to roughly 125,000 songs, to Sony/ATV Music Publishing for about $370 million. The deal, which was announced yesterday, , includes a wide range of songs, among them classics like &#8220;That&#8217;s Amore&#8221; and &#8220;Moon River&#8221; and newer hits by songwriters including Linda Perry and Akon. The Famous catalog, which dates to 1928, also includes a catalog of film scores, like the themes from &#8220;The Godfather&#8221; and &#8220;Beverly Hills Cop.&#8221; Viacom took over the business as part of its acquisition of the Paramount movie studio. The agreement comes after an extensive auction that in addition to Sony/ATV attracted suitors including private equity investors and the Universal Music Group, according to executives briefed on the negotiations. Sony/ATV is a partnership of and the pop star Michael Jackson, who had long financed his extravagant lifestyle with loans tied to his share of the venture. Viacom, which operates cable channels like MTV, auctioned the Famous catalog after concluding it was not a core asset. Sony, though, has been seeking publishing catalogs, which generate income when their songs are used by others. In April, Sony said it had acquired the music of the songwriters Jerry Leiber and Mike Stoller, including &#8220;Hound Dog,&#8221; and &#8220;Love Potion No. 9,&#8221; in a deal valued at roughly $40 million, according to executives briefed on the deal. The company also brought in Martin Bandier, the former chairman of EMI&#8217;s giant publishing unit, as chief executive. Feels Breath on Neck; These Days, No. 1 Portal Seems to Be a Step Behind Google Is Said To Set Sights On YouTube Viacom to Pay $102 Million For an Online Game Service Viacom to Sell DreamWorks Film Library Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Beatles Commemorative
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31device.html?ex=1338264000&en=f9f06d1c7e9a37b8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Palm to Sell Device That Won&#8217;t Fit in the Palm to Sell Device That Won&#8217;t Fit in the Palm Calif., May 30 &#151; Fifteen years after pioneering personal computers that nestled comfortably in a user&#8217;s hand, reversed itself Wednesday and said that it would begin selling a two-handed laptop-size machine called the Foleo. The 2.5-pound &#8220;appliance&#8221; comes with a 10-inch screen and is meant to be a companion for a smartphone, according to one of Palm&#8217;s founders, Jeff Hawkins, who introduced the machine here at the D: All Things Digital technology industry conference. The Foleo, which will be priced starting at $499, synchronizes information with Palm and Windows Mobile phones and can be linked wirelessly via phones to the Internet, although it comes with During a demonstration, Mr. Hawkins acknowledged the limitations of smartphones, which have been viewed as a lighter, less expensive alternative to carrying a portable laptop computer. &#8220;Sometimes you need a big screen,&#8221; Mr. Hawkins said. He said he had struck on the idea of a mobile companion for the phone five years ago, but that his business partners Donna Dubinsky and Ed Colligan had resisted the project as a distraction while the company introduced the popular The Foleo, which will go on sale this summer, is based on the Linux operating system. But it does not have a broad range of applications. For example, while Mr. Hawkins demonstrated the ability to synchronize e-mail automatically with a smartphone, synchronizing with a datebook was not a feature. The notion of an inch-thick device that is sold as a peripheral to a phone generated some skepticism. But several analysts saidt the phone might get a following of Linux enthusiasts. &#8220;This could become the first commercially viable portable Linux system,&#8221; said Tim Bajarin, an industry analyst at Creative Strategies, a consulting firm based in Campbell, Calif. The Foleo is the latest in a series of industry efforts to define a new category between cellphones and laptops. has tried to create interest in devices it calls ultra-mobile PCs, and has been encouraging developers to introduce systems it describes as mobile Internet devices. Several smaller start-up companies like Oqo, based in San Francisco, have also been offering hand-held systems that have most of the features of standard laptops, but fit comfortably in jacket pockets. This year&#8217;s conference also included an interview with . Mr. Jobs said his company would soon be focused on three business &#151; computers, digital music, and cellular telephone handsets &#151; and &#8220;a hobby,&#8221; the company&#8217;s recently introduced Apple TV peripheral. He called the device an experiment and said it would soon make it possible to download videos from the YouTube site of onto a home TV. He described efforts by PC and consumer electronics companies and others to replace the cable set-top box as failures. Apple has recently reset its strategy and is going to try to shape Apple TV as something other than a conduit for television. &#8220;We want to be the DVD player for the Internet age,&#8221; he said. Mr. Jobs also said that more than two hundred million copies of the Apple iTunes software had been downloaded, with most of them running on Windows-based personal computers. He did not let that fact pass without taking a not-so-subtle jab at his long-time competitor, , Microsoft&#8217;s founder: Offering iTunes software to Windows users was like &#8220;offering a glass of water to someone in hell,&#8221; Mr. Jobs said. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (11 of 22) Responds to the iPhone Cellular Carriers Offer Phone With E-Mail but Less Bulk SATURDAY INTERVIEW -- With Ed Colligan; Hand-Helds And Palm: What's Next? CIRCUITS; Palm Returns, In Both Plain And Less Plain Computers and the Internet New Models, Design and Products (11 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Comedy Business Turns to the Web Basics: Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce In Fierce Competition, Google Finds Novel Ways to Feed Hiring Machine Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31testing.html?ex=1338264000&en=faf61eff6bfca6d0&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Coca-Cola and PepsiCo Agree to Curb Animal Tests and PepsiCo Agree to Curb Animal Tests May 30 — Under pressure from animal rights advocates, two soft drink giants, , have agreed to stop directly financing research that uses animals to test or develop their products, except where such testing is required by law. People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals sought the assurances after discovering studies financed by the companies that used animals like rats and chimpanzees to test taste perception and, in some cases, to bolster support for promotional health claims. PepsiCo said that it would stop directly financing animal experiments, including some it had financed through grants given to graduate students through its Gatorade Sports Science Institute. Elaine Palmer, a spokeswoman for PepsiCo, said that while the company had never supported the idea of animal testing, “We had not been policing it, so that part is new.” Coca-Cola and PepsiCo are the largest largest manufacturers to agree to the ban. Coca-Cola also said that it would discontinue a grant given to a researcher at Virginia Commonwealth University who has been studying taste perception in rats, which share certain taste pathways with humans. Representatives of Coca-Cola and the university declined to say how much financing the company was providing or to elaborate on what the ultimate application of the research might be. A research associate at PETA, Shalin G. Gala, said, “We see these statements from Coke and Pepsi, massive global conglomerates, as the beginning of the end of all animal tests on food.” Scientists conducting basic research in animal models have cautioned against PETA’s hard line, saying their work, which may have medical benefits, would not be possible in many cases without help from corporate sponsors. “It’s very easy to characterize scientific research like this in a bad light,” said Dr. John A. DeSimone, a professor at Virginia Commonwealth University who had been working under the Coca-Cola grant. “To do medical research, you sometimes need an animal model.” Not everyone agrees with Dr. DeSimone’s thinking, particularly when it involves tests on highly intelligent animals, as did a study involving a Coca-Cola scientist, financed by Nutrasweet, that cut open the faces of chimpanzees to study nerve impulses used in the perception of sweet tastes. “I have never found chimpanzee work justifiable,” said Dr. Alan Goldberg, director of the Center for Alternatives to Animal Testing at Dr. Goldberg said that over the last 30 years, advances in alternatives to animal models, many of which are usually more scientifically precise, have already reduced the number of lab animals in use by 50 percent. “The bottom line for me is that I’d love to see animal studies disappear entirely,” Dr. Goldberg said. “In vitro models are cleaner.” The two soft drink giants are the latest companies to respond to scrutiny by PETA, which has mounted a campaign to denounce animal testing practices in the beverage industry, an industry that, unlike cosmetics or pharmaceuticals, had largely been unpublicized in the animal testing arena. In January, Roll International, the company that makes Pom Wonderful pomegranate juice, agreed to cease tests on animals after PETA disclosed a 2005 study financed by the company that tested the juice to see if it might relieve artificially induced erectile dysfunction in rabbits. Gets 8-Year Term in Coca-Cola Secrets Case Makers of Sodas Try a New Pitch: They're Healthy The Color of Cola Ex-Secretary at Coke Guilty of Trade-Secrets Theft POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Hippo at the Bronx Zoo - 1947
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31cantor.html Cantor Fitzgerald Sells Unit to eSpeed Fitzgerald Sells Unit to eSpeed THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Fitzgerald, the bond-trading firm, is selling its privately held BGC Partners brokerage unit to , the publicly owned electronic trading house controlled by Cantor, in a deal valued at $1.3 billion. The acquisition will allow Cantor to consolidate its interdealer broker businesses and end all revenue-sharing agreements with eSpeed, which some eSpeed investors had criticized. But Cantor is retaining voting control over the new company, which will be called BGC Partners and trade on the . BGC had made a $460 million initial public offering proposal earlier this year, which it will now withdraw. ESpeed, used to trade primarily United States Treasuries, will issue 133,860,000 shares of its common stock and rights to acquire shares of BGC’s common stock. BGC, which had first-quarter revenue of $249 million, is valued at approximately $1.23 billion, based on the closing price of eSpeed’s stock Tuesday. Shares of eSpeed rose 4 cents, to $9.23. The deal will do little to make BCG and eSpeed more competitive against the market leaders, Icap and Tullett, said Octavio Marenzi, chief executive of consulting firm Celent, noting that the move is more about simplifying the “bizarre, triangular” relationship among Cantor, BGC and eSpeed. He added that if Cantor has voting control, it makes the deal less attractive to investors. The combined company’s 2007 projected revenue is expected to be approximately $1 billion. For 2008, the combined company’s projected revenue is expected to increase by more than 12 percent to over $1.1 billion, the companies said. NEWS; BGC TO BUY MAXCOR, A RIVAL BROKERAGE FIRM Brokerage Firm Sells Loan Unit THE MARKETS: Market Place; Cantor Adds To Network For Its Data On Prices Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Brokers and Brokerage Firms THE WALL CAME DOWN
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31stox.html S.& P. Index Climbs Past the Record It Set 7 Years Ago P. Index Climbs Past the Record It Set 7 Years Ago Traders at the New York Stock Exchange were busy Wednesday as the S.& P. hit a record high. stock market yesterday clawed back to where it was seven years ago during the heady days of technology and the Internet boom — and it had to overcome an overnight sell-off in China to get there. Skip to next paragraph What Took So Long? which struggled for much of the day after markets fell in Asia and Europe, received a midafternoon boost from the minutes of a Federal Reserve meeting that indicated that policy makers had become somewhat more upbeat about the economy. The tone of the minutes, if not the substance, heartened investors, who sent the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index, the most widely followed benchmark of American stocks, past a level last reached on March 24, 2000. The index — a weighted measure of the biggest American companies, from — gained 0.8 percent, or 12.12 points, to 1,530.23, surpassing the record of 1,527.46. The S.& P. climbed past the record early last week, too, but failed to hold onto the gains until the end of regular trading as it did yesterday. The industrial average, which has been breaking records with some regularity in the last several months, closed up 111.74 points, or 0.83 percent, to 13,633.08, another record. composite index rose 20.53 points yesterday, or 0.8 percent, to 2,592.59. The Nasdaq has yet to come close to regaining the levels reached during the Internet boom. It is down 49 percent from its March 2000 high. The S.& P. breakthrough was set on a day that began with worries about a bubble in Chinese stocks. The stock market in Shanghai tumbled 6.5 percent yesterday after the government in Beijing trebled the taxes on stock transactions in an effort to rein in what has become the world’s hottest stock market. In February, the Shanghai market precipitated a wave of selling on markets around the world after a similar sell-off. But after a brief period of uncertainty in late February and early March, investors have been pushing American stocks steadily upward. This time, the nervousness was much shorter-lived. “If we see a 20 or 30 percent decline in the Shanghai index, that will cause investors to sit up and take notice,” Sam Stovall, chief investment strategist at Standard & Poor’s, said yesterday. “Basically, investors say, ‘You’ve got to increase the shock value, not merely replicate it to get my attention the second time around.’ ” The United States market has been supported by a strong flow of corporate takeovers, companies buying back their own shares and corporate earnings that are proving to be better than expected. That optimism appears to be overshadowing, at least for now, concerns about the slowing American economy, rising energy prices, a modest increase in interest rates and the troubles in the housing market. “We have a remarkably positive environment for securities,” said James W. Paulsen, chief investment strategist for Wells Capital Management. “You have 5 percent real world G.D.P. growth right now and you have massive excessive liquidity sloshing around.” According to minutes of the Fed meeting on May 9, officials seemed to think that the economic outlook had improved somewhat, even as they acknowledged that the housing market and the problems in subprime mortgages would serve as a bigger drag on the economy than they had previously thought. But the minutes reiterated, as statements from the Fed have for many months now, that policy makers remain concerned that inflation is too high and too unsettled to warrant a change in policy, which has been to leave short-term interest rates unchanged at 5.25 percent. There are also signs that the recent moderation in inflation could be threatened by rising gasoline prices, which have climbed past $3 a gallon for the first time since last summer. Still, investors appeared willing to look past the Fed’s concerns about housing and inflation, two staple worries that while they have raised eyebrows have not yet sapped corporate profits or the frenzied deal-making on Wall Street. While the outlook for profits is not as ebullient as it was in the last several years, it remains reasonably upbeat. Low interest rates have also ensured that businesses still have easy access to credit. (The 4.87 percent yield on the 10-year Treasury note, which has risen in the last two months, is still historically low.) & Poor's 500-Stock Index Economic Conditions and Trends in the Fog - 1992
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31ebay.html EBay Buys Search Service Buys Search Service FRANCISCO, May 30 ( ) — The Web auction leader has acquired StumbleUpon, a Web browsing recommendation site, for $75 million in cash. StumbleUpon recommends pages within sites like Flickr, MySpace or YouTube based on “thumbs up” or “thumbs down” votes from other Web users with shared interests. It has 2.3 million users and is adding more rapidly. The service helps people find Web sites, videos, products, people and other online information. Community members add more than five million recommendations a day, meaning StumbleUpon’s depth improves the more often it is used. Because StumbleUpon combines peer recommendations with search features, it offers an alternative to the Web search leader, Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (17 of 22) Pays to Have Pals in Silicon Valley A Bold Plan To Go Where Men Have Gone Before MARKET PLACE; Are the Latest Big Deals Really a Big Deal? COMPANY NEWS; EBAY TO PURCHASE RENT.COM FOR $415 MILLION Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Computers and the Internet (17 of 22) the Elephants - 1951
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31zoellick.html Bush&#8217;s Nominee Has New Agenda for Bank Nominee Has New Agenda for Bank Pool photo by Roger Wollenberg President Bush nominated Robert B. Zoellick, left, yesterday to lead the World Bank. Treasury Secretary Henry M. Paulson Jr. is at right. A scandal forced out the departing bank president, Paul D. Wolfowitz. May 30 &#151; The stands ready to inherit may be battered, fractious and rudderless. But he said Wednesday that he saw himself not simply as a healer but as a leader ready to establish a new agenda to help the world&#8217;s poor. &#8220;On the one hand, one has to calm the waters,&#8221; Mr. Zoellick told reporters in the afternoon. &#8220;But one also has to start to navigate the course of the future.&#8221; At another point he said, &#8220;People in the bank recognize that it&#8217;s going to have to go through some mission adjustment.&#8221; But he declined to specify details. People close to Mr. Zoellick say that based on his record in past economic and diplomatic jobs, he is likely to bring a demanding approach that could disturb the status quo. At his session with journalists, Mr. Zoellick signaled that he would retain and build on the anticorruption policies of the departing president, , who resigned nearly two weeks ago after a furor over charges of favoritism. Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s nomination was formally announced Wednesday at the White House, where President Bush praised him for having &#8220;earned the trust and support of leaders from every region of the world.&#8221; Mr. Bush also praised Mr. Wolfowitz for making the bank &#8220;a more effective partner for development.&#8221; The bank&#8217;s 24-member board has welcomed Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s nomination but said it would accept other nominations until June 15. But bank officials dismissed the statement as a formality and predicted that the board would move smoothly toward making Mr. Zoellick president, despite reservations by some about the United States&#8217; continuing to exercise its 60-year-old prerogative of filling the job. European officials said they would not disturb the arrangement of having the American president picking the head of the bank, in part to leave intact the tradition of having Europeans pick the head of the Mr. Zoellick has been told by Treasury Secretary Henry M. Paulson Jr. and others that the bank must do more to provide concrete measures of the effects of its $23 billion in lending to poor countries, in part to assure Congress about how the money is being spent. In his remarks to reporters, Mr. Zoellick also suggested that the international community must rethink having the bank provide loans to countries like China that have access to global capital markets and possess huge foreign exchange reserves. The bank, he said, could move more into providing technical assistance to these countries. &#8220;It would have been easy to get a figurehead,&#8221; an administration official involved in the selection process said of Mr. Zoellick. &#8220;Bob&#8217;s first posture at the bank will be to listen and to travel. But he definitely brings some ideas on development. He has thought about it a lot.&#8221; Others who know Mr. Zoellick say that despite having a reputation for being a brusque and demanding executive, he is also good at setting long-term objectives and building consensus. &#8220;The World Bank, like other international organizations, needs substantial reform,&#8221; said former Secretary of State James A. Baker III , who helped bring Mr. Zoellick into government in the 1980s. &#8220;I think Bob will be a very good agent of change. It&#8217;s a huge, humongous bureaucracy. But he&#8217;s a very resourceful person.&#8221; Colleagues noted that Mr. Zoellick brought &#8220;tough love&#8221; to some of his previous jobs, most notably as United States trade representative during Mr. Bush&#8217;s first term. As trade envoy, Mr. Zoellick worked with Europeans in 2001, shortly after the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, to make the next round of global trade talks focus on helping poor countries by letting them export more farm products and industrial goods to rich countries. But he also demanded that poor countries that gained from being able to export more also commit themselves to economic reforms. &#8220;He believes in rewarding opportunity, encouraging small business and frankly reducing the power of entrenched oligarchies that thrive on closed markets and corrupt environments,&#8221; said Christopher A. Padilla, Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s chief of staff at the trade office and when he was deputy secretary of state. &#8220;That agenda was a very important component of what we were trying to achieve,&#8221; said Mr. Padilla, now an assistant secretary of commerce for export administration. &#8220;I&#8217;m confident he will bring the same agenda to the World Bank.&#8221; There are some at the World Bank, many bank officials say, who may resist a bias toward encouraging free-market economies, especially at a time when faith in that philosophy has faded in Latin America and elsewhere. But bank officials said they would welcome a new president with knowledge in this area. &#8220;A lot of people used to think that if the Democrats win the White House in 2008, we might get a new president who won&#8217;t be pursing free markets and corruption,&#8221; said one bank official, who spoke on condition of anonymity. &#8220;But most people at the bank also realize that reform is necessary.&#8221; The official added: &#8220;Sure, Zoellick is coming with an agenda. People at the bank will be focusing on whether he is going to be fixated on trade. But he&#8217;s a basic policy wonk. He&#8217;s actually a lot closer in personality to the typical bank staffer than Wolfowitz was.&#8221; More Articles in Washington Envoy Is Bush&#8217;s Choice for World Bank Rice's Deputy Intends to Resign, Aides Say Fiorina Called Candidate for World Bank Trade Envoy Is Favorite to Lead World Bank More Articles in Washington NORTH POLE WAS HERE
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/smallbusiness/31sbiz.html Small Business Not as Usual Business Not as Usual Andrew Councill for A. Little, president of B&W Solutions, a personnel management firm in Oxon Hill, Md., said dealing with the Small Business Administration was frustrating, &#147;and after a while you don&#146;t even bother asking.&#148; Kain, a small-business owner in Fremont, Calif., started her packaging services business, ALOM Technologies, in 1997 with a $250,000 loan. In 2000, her 70-employee company was singled out as an entrepreneurial success by the agency, complete with a ceremony in San Francisco. Skip to next paragraph But in 2003, when she lost a government contract to package and distribute informational CDs to military bases around the world, she didn’t bother to turn to the S.B.A. for help. “I’m not so sure about the overall competency level and the ability to follow through,” Ms. Kain said. “The best you can expect is a list of government agencies you can contact.” Her assessment reflects a growing frustration among many small-business owners with the agency. Over the last five decades, the S.B.A. has been there to propel the likes of Federal Express, , Staples and thousands of lesser-known small businesses. But advocates say recent policy changes and severe budget and staffing cuts in the last six years have left the agency unable to fulfill its mission to provide programs and services to the nation’s 25 million small companies, which the agency defines as businesses with 500 or fewer workers. Since 2001, the agency’s budget has been sliced nearly in half, to $464 million in the proposed 2008 budget. Staff cuts have been almost as deep, with the agency losing 31 percent of its work force. Nowhere has the impact of these changes been felt more than in the S.B.A.’s primary loan program for small businesses, known as 7(a). Since the 2005 fiscal year, the agency has cut funding to the program and restored an earlier, more costly fee structure for borrowers. Now a borrower pays a minimum of $2,000 in upfront fees for the smaller loans up to $150,000, a rise from $1,000 before. For larger loans up to $700,000, the fee now is 3 percent, up from 2.5 percent before. For loans above $700,000, the fee remains unchanged at 3.5 percent. Even with the higher fees, the agency says, the loans have easier credit terms and longer repayment periods than those typically available at commercial banks. But many small-business advocates say that is a moot point as many small businesses cannot even pull together the amounts to cover the fees. The S.B.A. has also proposed raising the fees in its microloan program, which can be used for construction and expansion of facilities. Together these loans totaled $20 billion in 2006, according to the S.B.A. While fees for the loans have increased, the average size of the loans under the 7(a) and microloan programs has decreased 25 percent, to $188,878 in fiscal year 2006, from $252,314 in fiscal year 2001, according to data from the S.B.A. The total number of loans has more than doubled, however. The S.B.A. said that part of the reason that the average amount of the loans has dropped is because a number of banks use a process called S.B.A. Express. For it, banks use their own documents and need less interaction with the agency. The S.B.A guarantees only 50 percent of these loans instead of the 75 percent to 85 percent on larger loans. The increased fees for the loans may have had another effect. The number of banks participating has dropped by nearly half, to 2,751 in fiscal 2006, from 5,228 in fiscal 2001, according to the National Small Business Association in Washington. The association said some of the drop may reflect bank consolidation, but fees and other changes in the 7(a) program had the biggest impact. Because of the higher fees, many entrepreneurs have turned to a growing credit card market aimed at small-business owners. A survey by the association found that the overwhelming majority of small businesses use credit cards for their financing instead of S.B.A or other bank loans — meaning that the interest rate paid can be as much as 10 percentage points more than a conventional loan. “The S.B.A. in many ways is hurting small business by increasing these fees,” said Marilyn Landis, owner of Basic Business Concepts, a small company in Pittsburgh, who relies on credit cards for most of her financing. “The decrease in the size of the loans is certainly a detriment to small companies — it’s barely enough to get a company started and certainly not enough to grow one.” Ms. Landis is vice chairwoman of the National Small Business Association. Even more than the higher fees, reduced staffing levels at the agency have had a profound effect on small business, advocates say. the List: Health Care and Pay JOB CAMP; How to Walk a Mile in Your Dream Career House Committee to Examine Recent Performance of S.B.A. HOME FRONT; Helping Small Businesses Get Bigger BUSINESS RESOURCE CENTER Marketing & Advertising &raquo; Operations & Technology &raquo; Retail & Franchising &raquo; Taylor - 1985
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-JAPANTOBACCO_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=d44bd98f08d7ae35&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Canada: Japan Tobacco Unit to Face Trial Japan Tobacco Unit to Face Trial Tobacco’s Canadian unit was ordered by an Ontario judge to stand trial on charges it defrauded the Canadian government out of about a billion Canadian dollars ($931 million) in the 1990s by shipping cigarettes to the United States to avoid paying taxes. The judge, David Fairgrieve of Ontario Provincial Court, said in a 29-page ruling that prosecutors had presented enough evidence to warrant a trial of the unit, JTI-MacDonald. The company has denied any wrongdoing.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-INDUSTRIALOU_BRF.html South Korea: Industrial Output Rises Korea: Industrial Output Rises Korea’s industrial output rose in April, helped by increased exports of chips and cars. Manufacturing production jumped 3.1 percent from March, the largest gain in seven months, the National Statistical Office said. Output rose 6.7 percent from a year earlier. Corporate investment in factories surged 15.6 percent in April from a year earlier, the biggest gain since September 2006, the report showed. The figures also showed an index of economic indicators climbed 5.1 percent in April from a year earlier after rising 4.9 percent in March. BUSINESS; Hyundai to Retain Chairman as Sentence Is Appealed Daewoo Motor Becomes A Bright Spot for G.M. World Business Briefing | Asia: Japan: Sharp Adding A Plant Samsung Says It Will Expand Chip Factories
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31yahoo.html Yahoo Technology Chief to Leave in Wake of Company Revamping Technology Chief to Leave in Wake of Company Revamping FRANCISCO, May 30 — Farzad Nazem, ’s chief technology officer and one of its longest-serving executives, said he would leave on June 8 after 11 years at the company. Yahoo said its co-founder, Jerry Yang, would assume Mr. Nazem’s responsibilities while it searches for a replacement. The departure of Mr. Nazem, 45, who is known as Zod, will follow a turbulent year at Yahoo that included a companywide revamping. Several other senior executives, including the chief operating officer, have left in the wake of the overhaul. Yahoo would not make Mr. Nazem or any other executive available to discuss his departure. But a spokeswoman, Joanna Stevens, said that Mr. Nazem had wanted to retire and that he and the chief executive, Terry S. Semel, had been planning his departure for some time. Writing in the company’s , Mr. Nazem said, “As I began contemplating retirement, there were a few milestones that I (along with the executive leadership team) wanted to accomplish prior to my departure.” Those milestones, he wrote, included the reorganization of the company and its technology group, as well as the introduction of an advertising platform, known as Project Panama, which Yahoo began introducing in February. “It was very important to me,” Mr. Nazem said, “to drive all the way to my last day here at Yahoo without distractions of an announcement like this.” The new advertising platform is aimed at narrowing the lead of in online advertising, but it has yet to translate into financial gains for the company. Mr. Nazem, who is responsible for the operation of the Yahoo Web site and for product development, was popular among the company’s technology ranks, whom he largely helped hire. This month, Yahoo appointed Blake Jorgensen, a founder of Thomas Weisel Partners, as chief financial officer, replacing Susan L. Decker, who is switching roles to become head of the company’s advertiser and publisher group. Yahoo is looking for an executive to lead its audience group, which is responsible for much of the main company Web site. After Mr. Nazem’s departure, Yahoo is likely to have vacant positions at the top of two of its three operating units. As part of his separation agreement, Mr. Nazem will receive a lump sum equal to his base salary for the rest of the year as well as accelerated vesting of stock options and stock awards, a package that an executive compensation firm, Equilar, estimated around $6.9 million. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (10 of 22) Aiming for Agility, Shuffles Executives Suspensions, Dismissals and Resignations (10 of 22) Harlem Swimming Pool - 2004
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/30/technology/31pogue.html?ex=1338177600&en=50d565b783b2c03f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data of the Art The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data 2007 If you’ve ever felt as though you can’t keep up with the pace of life, well, it could have been worse. You could have been a computer disk. Skip to next paragraph Backing Up Your Files The current Iomega Rev drive takes 70-gigabyte cartridges and also accepts the 35-gigabyte cartridges of the original 2004 model. The Dell PowerVault RD 1000 and an 80-gigabyte cartridge, above. The cartridge contains a complete shock-mounted hard drive. The history of removable disks is one sad “couldn’t keep up” story after another. Remember the floppy disk (800 kilobytes)? The SyQuest cartridge (44 megabytes)? The Zip disk (100 megabytes)? The Jaz disk (1 gigabyte)? The recordable DVD (4.7 gigabytes)? Each one seemed at first like a handy system for making backups and transporting files. But as computer hard drives grew, those removable disks wound up looking pathetically puny. Nowadays, it’s not unusual for a new computer to come with a 320-gigabyte hard drive. Are you really going to back it up onto 68 blank DVDs? Or 444,431 floppies? It’s been years since there was a cartridge system on every desk. But like the hip-huggers, side ponytails and other fads of the 1980s, removables are making a comeback. At least three companies — , Quantum and ProStor —now offer cartridge systems that are just as convenient and transportable as Zip disks once were, but big enough to back up a hard drive. That’s because the cartridges actually Your initial outlay is for the drive itself. Each company makes both an internal model, which is installed inside a computer, and an external one that sits on the desk and connects with a U.S.B. cable. The price is fairly high; for example, the external Rev drive from Iomega costs about $500, the external GoVault from Quantum will cost around $370 when it hits stores in July, and an external RDX drive is on special from Dell for $300. Each drive includes one starter cartridge. (ProStor doesn’t actually sell its RDX systems. Instead, it created the design for RDX drives, which are manufactured and sold interchangeably by companies like Dell, , Tandberg and Exabyte under their own names. The Dell model I tested is called the PowerVault RD 1000.) The drive itself is just a dock with electronics and power circuitry. Into this shell, you slide the interchangeable cartridges that contain your data. All three drives leave one cartridge edge exposed — the edge with the label, so you can see which cartridge is currently inserted. The edge of an RDX cartridge (not just the drive) also bears a status light, which makes life much easier if troubleshooting is ever required. Once inserted, the cartridge behaves exactly like a hard drive. You can add and remove files by dragging and dropping, or by using an automated backup program. Backup software is included with all three drives. Quantum’s superb backup program, for example, crams more onto your cartridges using “de-duplication” — storing only new sections of documents you’ve already backed up. The drives are silent and fast. On a Windows PC, copying a 1.5-gigabyte folder full of large and small files took 80 seconds on the Quantum, and 90 seconds on the Rev and RDX drives. The Quantum GoVault and RDX cartridges both come in several sizes, ranging from 40 to 160 gigabytes. It’s very cool how a single drive can accommodate cartridges of all different capacities, present and future. Iomega, on the other hand, intends to keep releasing new drives to accommodate larger-capacity cartridges. The current drive takes 70-gigabyte cartridges. It also accepts the 35-gig cartridges of its original 2004 Rev drive, but “plays” them much slower. The Quantum and RDX cartridges (both 4.5 by 3.5 by 1 inch) are incredibly rugged. They’re intended to be handled, tossed, shipped and even dropped. They can shrug off one-meter drops onto concrete — a claim my kids and I had a glorious time investigating. The RDX cartridges even have what the company calls a static-dissipation system. The tiny Rev cartridges (3 by 3 by 0.4 inch) are built differently. Whereas each Quantum and RDX cartridge is a complete, sealed, shock-mounted 2.5-inch hard drive, the Rev cartridge contains only the spinning platter and the motor; the delicate stuff, like the read-write heads (the “needle” that plays the disk) are in the drive. As a result, Rev cartridges are slightly less tough; they can handle only three-foot drops onto “industrial carpet.” Still, anyone who nervously recalls the “click of death” that occasionally haunted Iomega’s previous systems, like Zip and Jaz, should be reassured; Rev drives have been on the market since 2004 (Iomega says that it has sold over a million cartridges), and even a search fails to reveal any Jaz-like community of bereaved customers with failed cartridges. Rev is also the only product that works on both Mac and Windows, and the only one available in both U.S.B.-connector and FireWire-connector editions. These cartridge systems sound great, right? Fast, tough, capacious — what more could you ask? You’ll pay $100 for Quantum’s 40-gigabyte cartridge and $305 for a 160-gig cartridge. The RDX cartridges are priced similarly, ranging from $118 (40 gigabytes) to $270 (160 gigs). Sorry, but that’s just nuts. For a fraction of that price, you could just buy a big old hard drive. These days, a 250-gigabyte internal drive costs about $66, for heaven’s sake. Of course, the beauty of the cartridges is that they’re transportable. A proper backup system involves storing a copy of your data off site, not in your office. So a more apt comparison would be with those little pocket hard drives — external U.S.B. drives like Seagate’s FreeAgent Go or ’s Pocket Media drive. But these, too, cost less than cartridges. A 120-gigabyte pocket hard drive costs about $85 — about one-third the price of the same-size Quantum cartridge. Iomega Rev cartridges are much more reasonably priced: $270 for a five-pack, which comes to about $54 each. They’re the only reasonable option for people whose last name isn’t “Inc.” Even so, that’s 77 cents per gigabyte, compared with 71 cents for a self-contained pocket hard drive. (You don’t even want to know the Quantum and RDX cost per gigabyte. All right, maybe you do: $2.03 and $1.70, respectively. And I’m not even counting the price of the drive itself.) So what, exactly, is the value proposition here? All three companies emphatically stress that their products are not intended for everyday desktop storage. Instead, these systems are supposed to be highly reliable backup machines for businesses. They are primarily intended to replace tape backup drives, which thousands of small businesses use to back up their computers. Sure enough, compared with these cartridges, tape backup systems are unreliable, high maintenance and even more expensive. You don’t have random instant access to files — the tape literally has to rewind or fast-forward to find a certain file — and tracking and managing the tapes themselves are a headache. Well, fine. If that’s the cartridge companies’ narrowly defined mission — replacing tape backup systems for businesses — then congratulations to them; they’ve succeeded. But the technology in these systems, including their speed, convenience, silence, compactness and reliability, is terrific. If it weren’t for the nosebleed pricing, cartridge systems would find a huge and happy home among everyday computer users. Think of all the photographers, music buffs and video editors who would love to hot-swap 160-gigabyte cartridges on the fly, ready to toss in the briefcase or cram into a envelope. Think of how great it would be to create a snapshot of your entire hard drive every few days, creating a rotating cartridge system that would mean you’re always backed up and safe. Imagine a return to the heady days when cartridges were so popular and prevalent, you could stuff a Zip disk in your coat pocket, confident that you’d be able to use it at your buddy’s house. This time, at last, the disk engineers have figured out how to create cartridge capacities that keep up with the pace of life. Now we just have to get the marketing executives on board. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (12 of 22) Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Hewlett-Packard Stakes a Claim as an Information Manager Equity Firm to Acquire Net Retailer Computers and the Internet (12 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Comedy Business Turns to the Web Basics: Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce In Fierce Competition, Google Finds Novel Ways to Feed Hiring Machine Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31mcdonalds.html 3 Claims Dismissed Against McDonald&#8217;s Claims Dismissed Against McDonald’s dismissal yesterday of three out of five claims in a lawsuit over allergens said to be in French fries and hash browns. Judge Elaine E. Bucklo of Federal District Court in Chicago said the plaintiffs’ complaint did not give enough detail about a supposed scheme by the company to conceal the existence of gluten and dairy in its food products. Judge Bucklo allowed two claims on breach of warranty and unjust enrichment to proceed. The suit had sought to force the company to change food product information in its advertising. Lawyers for McDonald’s, which is based in Oak Brook, Ill., asked the court to throw out the lawsuit in November, referring to the plaintiffs as a few “hypersensitive consumers with allergies.” The complaint was filed by 11 people who accused McDonald’s of concealing allergens until it was forced to disclose them by a change in food-labeling laws. Colonel Is Phasing Out Trans Fat From the Menu A Fright Over Fries; California Wants to Serve a Health Warning With That Order The Food Industry Empire Strikes Back Is a Trip to McDonald's Just What the Doctor Ordered? Condo - 2006
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-MORGANSTANLE_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=c26520fb8457ab46&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Morgan Stanley to Buy Real Estate Investor Stanley to Buy Real Estate Investor agreed to buy a real estate investor, the Investa Property Group of Australia, for 4.7 billion Australian dollars ($3.9 billion) in cash. Including debt, the offer values Australia’s biggest publicly traded owner of office buildings at 6.6 billion Australian dollars. The bid is subject to an independent expert’s report confirming that the offer is in the best interests of shareholders. Stanley to Buy Real Estate Trust Cablevision Deal Remains Very Much Up in the Air STREET SCENE; The Pressure of Great Expectations Blackstone Says It Plans To Go Public Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31tivo.html Subscriber Revenue Drives TiVo Profit Up Revenue Drives TiVo Profit Up ANGELES, May 30 ( posted a small quarterly profit on Wednesday, reversing a year-ago loss on higher revenue from subscribers to its digital video recording service. TiVo, whose service faces growing competition from set-top boxes made by cable and satellite TV providers, reported a fiscal first-quarter profit of $835,000, or 1 cent a share, in contrast to a loss of $10.7 million, or 13 cents a share, a year ago. Analysts had expected a loss of 2 cents a share, according to Reuters Estimates. The company, which is based in Alviso, Calif., makes systems that let users skip commercials and record programs on a built-in computer hard drive. It said that service and technology revenue increased to $58.1 million, from about $55 million. Net revenue rose to $60.4 million, from $56.8 million. NORTH POLE WAS HERE
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-CLOTHINGMAKE_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=298aef0cc95d1ba8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Canada: Clothing Maker Moves Operations Clothing Maker Moves Operations a maker of clothing like T-shirts, tank tops and golf shirts, said it would close two sock plants in North Carolina and lay off 520 employees as part of its plan to shift production to lower-cost factories in other countries. The North Carolina factories will close by the end of August, leaving one American plant, in Hillsville, Va., for making socks. Gildan is based in Montreal. 100 articles a month from The Archive - get it now with TimesSelect Business Briefing | Americas: Canada: T-Shirt Maker Shifts Production COMPANY NEWS; T-SHIRT MAKER SHIFTS WORK TO U.S. FROM CANADA
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31shelter.html?ex=1338264000&en=f1391cf59f465415&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Four Men, but Not Ernst & Young, Are Charged in Tax Shelter Case Men, but Not Ernst & Young, Are Charged in Tax Shelter Case current and former partners of the accounting firm Ernst & Young have been charged with tax fraud conspiracy over their work on questionable tax shelters. Skip to next paragraph Text of the Indictment The firm itself was not charged. But the indictment against the four, which was announced yesterday, did not mean that Ernst & Young, which has been under investigation since 2004, was entirely off the hook in a widening criminal investigation of the web of banks, accounting firms, law firms and investment boutiques that promoted questionable shelters. Those shelters have turned out to be bogus in the eyes of the , and prosecutors contend that they were shams or frauds that deprived the government of billions of dollars in tax revenue from the late 1990s through recent years. Federal prosecutors in Manhattan said yesterday that their investigation was continuing. The four Ernst & Young employees — Robert Coplan, who is also a former I.R.S. official, Richard Shapiro, Martin Nissenbaum and Brian Vaughan — were indicted by a federal grand jury in Manhattan on eight charges including conspiracy to defraud the I.R.S., tax evasion, making false statements to the I.R.S., and impeding and impairing the lawful functioning of the I.R.S. from 1998 through 2004. James Tucker, a lawyer for Mr. Vaughan, declined to comment yesterday. A lawyer for Mr. Nissenbaum said yesterday in a statement that his client had entered a plea of not guilty and “did not engage in any unlawful activity.” Jack Tigue, a lawyer for Mr. Shapiro, could not be reached for immediate comment. Lawyers for the other men did not return calls for comment. If convicted, each faces as much as 18 years in prison. The charges come nearly four years after Ernst & Young reached a settlement with the I.R.S., paying a $15 million penalty to resolve a civil investigation into the firm over its design and sales of questionable shelters. The civil settlement, however, did not prevent Ernst & Young from a criminal investigation less than one year later, as federal scrutiny of a rival accounting firm, KPMG, intensified, and as prosecutors made progress in teasing out the links between the web of firms that promoted tax shelters. But the 2003 settlement may make a criminal case against the firm more difficult. “Once you’ve got a civil settlement and a closing agreement with the I.R.S., it’s pretty hard for the Southern District to go back and get the firm — that bar makes it pretty hard,” argued a senior tax lawyer involved in the wider tax shelter investigation, referring to the federal Southern District of New York. Ernst & Young could still ultimately reach a deal that does not involve charges, but an acknowledgment of wrongdoing. KPMG reached a $456 million deferred-prosecution agreement with the Justice Department in 2005, as a condition of not being indicted — a near-certain corporate death sentence. Sixteen former KPMG employees, plus an outside lawyer and investment adviser, are set to stand trial at an undetermined date over their tax shelter work. Yesterday’s developments suggest that federal prosecutors are more likely to focus on individuals rather than firms in the tax shelter investigation. Robert Bennett, a lawyer for KPMG who persuaded the Justice Department not to indict the firm in 2005, said yesterday that “there’s a movement away from a knee-jerk reaction to impose vicarious liability on companies.” The indictment accuses the four Ernst & Young men of lying to the I.R.S. in the summer of 2002 during the audit of their employer that resulted in the $15 million penalty. “After being placed under oath, they sought to obstruct and impede the I.R.S. by providing false and misleading testimony concerning the origin, design, marketing and implementation of E.& Y.’s tax shelters,” the indictment said. In a statement yesterday, Ernst & Young said the four “were part of a small group within the firm, disbanded years ago, that was responsible for developing the transactions in question. None of the individuals was part of the firm’s management. ” It added that “Ernst & Young has cooperated with the government from the beginning of its investigation. We have voluntarily made many changes and enhancements to our tax practice. We have also made other changes to our tax practice pursuant to our 2003 agreement with the I.R.S., which the I.R.S. commissioner called a model for agreements with practitioners.” POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31photo.html?ex=1338264000&en=a35cf39cf63262f3&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss A Unit of News Corp. Agrees to Buy Photobucket and Flektor Unit of News Corp. Agrees to Buy Photobucket and Flektor THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Interactive Media, a unit of the , has agreed to acquire the photo-storage site Photobucket, just weeks after a public spat in which the popular networking site MySpace partly blocked content from Photobucket. MySpace, which is also owned by the News Corporation, lifted the block after about two weeks, but both sides have been silent on the details of their peacemaking. Separately, Fox also agreed to buy Flektor Inc., which offers Web-based tools for creating slide shows, recombined videos and other interactive presentations. Financial terms of the two deals were not disclosed. MySpace users often embed third-party photos, video and other material in their personal profile pages, and sites like Photobucket and YouTube, ’s video-sharing site, make that easy by providing the programming code to cut and paste into MySpace pages. The practice has made Photobucket one of the leading sites on the Internet, even though relatively few users access content directly through its home page. MySpace blocked Photobucket in April, after complaining that the hosting service had been encouraging users to incorporate an ad-supported slide show into their MySpace profiles. MySpace said the slide show violated its policies banning unauthorized commercial activity. Photobucket’s chief executive, Alex Welch, responded by accusing MySpace of limiting free expression and treating users as a commodity. He was more conciliatory two weeks later, saying the two had “established open lines of communication and procedures,” but he made no mention of negotiations over a sale of his company. MEDIA BUSINESS; Murdoch Plan Under Scrutiny THE MEDIA BUSINESS; A Texas Newspaper For Hearst COMPANY NEWS; Stake Purchased In Reiss Media THE MEDIA BUSINESS; News Corp. To Sell Stake Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31novell.html Novell Posts Loss After Trimming Jobs Posts Loss After Trimming Jobs which sells networking software and computer consulting services, reported a second-quarter loss after the company cut jobs to compensate for declining sales. The loss was $2.19 million, or 1 cent a share, in contrast to a profit of $3.34 million, or 1 cent, a year earlier, Novell, based in Waltham, Mass., said yesterday in a statement. Sales rose 2.6 percent, to $239.2 million, in the period that ended April 30. The company is spending as much as $45 million to cut jobs and expenses in a bid to increase profit. The company’s newer Linux operating system programs have not grown enough to offset declining sales of older products. The company said that sales for the year would be $925 million to $955 million, below the $957 million average of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg. Shares of Novell, which have risen 19 percent this year, fell 10 cents, to $7.36. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (18 of 22) Novell to Eliminate 16% of Work Force Novell, Once Foundering, Finds a Way to Coexist With Microsoft Novell to Cut Its Work Force; Software Maker Posts Deficit Novell to Cut 50 Positions Layoffs and Job Reductions (18 of 22) Kahlo and Diego Rivera - 1930.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31place.html?ex=1338264000&en=926c01b0b05c6ea5&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Manufacturer of Risky Drug to Sell Shares of Risky Drug to Sell Shares a pharmaceutical company whose biggest-selling drug is considered as dangerous as heroin or LSD a good investment? Jazz Pharmaceuticals &#151; along with the private equity firm Kohlberg Kravis Roberts &#38; Company and some of Wall Street&#8217;s most prestigious investment banks &#151; is hoping investors think so. Jazz, based in Palo Alto, Calif., has filed to sell as much as $180 million in stock as early as today in its first public offering. Jazz&#8217;s main product is gamma hydroxybutyrate, or GHB, a fast-acting with a history of use in date rape and serious risks of overdose, including coma and death. Jazz sells it under the brand name Xyrem to treat narcolepsy, a serious lists GHB as a Schedule I drug, the most dangerous kind, in the same category as heroin. But the Food and Drug Administration has approved Xyrem for narcolepsy, and when dispensed by prescription Xyrem can be used legally. Because of its risks, Xyrem can be distributed only under very strict rules. And the marketing of the drug by Jazz is the subject of a federal criminal case in Brooklyn that has already resulted in one felony guilty plea by a former Jazz employee. The narcolepsy market is small, estimated at only 120,000 patients, and sales of Xyrem were just $29 million in 2006. As for Jazz, it lost $82 million last year and has lost almost $200 million since it was founded in 2003. Auditors have warned that the losses raise &#8220;substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern,&#8221; according to the offering prospectus Jazz filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In plain English, Jazz &#151; which had $67 million in cash as of March 31 &#151; is running out of money. And if it does not get more, it could go broke as early as the end of this year. Jazz is hoping to solve that problem, at least temporarily, by selling as much as 6.9 million shares to the public at $24 to $26 a share. The offering, which values Jazz at about $600 million, could be completed as early as this morning, with shares sold to institutional or individual buyers who can resell them when Jazz begins trading later in the day. (which is also an investor in Jazz) and are leading the deal. Aside from Jazz itself, the biggest winner in the public offering would be Kohlberg Kravis and other private equity firms. Since 2003, they have sunk $265 million into Jazz. If the company cannot go public, they will have to choose between putting more money up or potentially losing their entire investments. Matthew K. Fust, Jazz&#8217;s chief financial officer, declined to comment about the offering or Jazz. A spokeswoman for Kohlberg said the firm could not comment because the offering is imminent. Securities and Exchange Commission rules discourage companies from discussing their prospects in advance of a public offering. Jazz hopes to expand Xyrem&#8217;s potential market vastly by winning approval from the F.D.A. to promote it for fibromyalgia, a vague and poorly understood pain disorder with symptoms that are often treated with antidepressants. Jazz is conducting two late-stage clinical trials to prove that Xyrem reduces the pain of fibromyalgia, with results expected in the one trial in the second half of 2008. In an earlier trial, about 30 percent of the people who took Xyrem reported improvement in their fibromyalgia symptoms, compared with 13 percent on a placebo. Whether that figure will be enough to persuade the F.D.A. to approve Xyrem &#151; whose label warns that abuse of GHB can cause &#8220;seizure, respiratory depression and profound decreases in level of consciousness&#8221; &#151; is not clear. Much bigger drug companies, including , are also researching fibromyalgia treatments and have medicines further along in development. Jazz, meanwhile, is still under a cloud in a criminal case in Brooklyn involving the way it promoted Xyrem to doctors. Last year, federal prosecutors charged Dr. Peter Gleason, a psychiatrist, with working illegally with Jazz to encourage doctors to use Xyrem to treat fibromyalgia and other diseases for which Xyrem has not been approved, so-called off-label uses. The case has raised debate about free speech and how tightly the government may regulate discussions by doctors with one another. Under F.D.A. rules, doctors may prescribe drugs for any condition they see fit, but pharmaceutical companies are not allowed to promote drugs for off-label uses. Dr. Gleason is fighting the charges. But in March, David Tucker, a former sales manager for Jazz who worked with Dr. Gleason, pleaded guilty to a single felony count of introducing a misbranded drug into interstate commerce. Mr. Tucker has not been sentenced, but the charge carries a maximum sentence of up to three years in prison, according to Bruce Maloy, Mr. Tucker&#8217;s lawyer. Geoffrey Kaiser, the prosecutor handling the case, said he could not comment. In its prospectus, Jazz says it is close to settling the case by pleading guilty to the same felony charge as Mr. Tucker and paying $20.5 million in civil and criminal fines and restitution. With all the clouds over Xyrem, potential investors in Jazz may be pleased to know that it does sell another drug, Antizol, used to treat people who have been poisoned by antifreeze. Unfortunately &#151; or fortunately, perhaps &#151; Antizol&#8217;s market is even smaller than Xyrem&#8217;s. Antizol had sales of $2.6 million in the first three months of 2007. of Doctor Tests Drug Marketing Rules Drug Company With No Products Raises $250 Million POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31google.html Moving Web-Based Software Offline Web-Based Software Offline FRANCISCO, May 30 — Millions of people enjoy free Web-based software programs that deliver e-mail, news and many other services. But those programs are available to users only when they are online. Skip to next paragraph Google&#146;s chief executive, Eric Schmidt, speaking at the Seoul Digital Forum Wednesday. He said Google wanted to expand in South Korea. is hoping to help make many of those programs, among them its own free Web applications like Gmail and Docs and Spreadsheets, available offline, say when a user is on an airplane. In doing so, Google will more openly challenge and its office productivity tools, like Excel and Word, which users must buy for hundreds of dollars. That rivalry was heightened Wednesday when Google released a set of tools to software programmers, which it calls Google Gears, that addresses what is perhaps the single most critical shortcoming of Web-based software. The tools can be used by all programmers, whether they work for Google or not, to enhance their own Web-based programs for offline use. The company is making the technology available in an open-source model, so programmers can use it free, test its abilities and extend them as necessary to fit their needs. “The whole idea of extending browser capabilities to offline is something that a lot of people are going to get pretty excited about,” said David Mitchell Smith, a vice president at Gartner Research. Google is introducing Gears during a coming-out party of sorts. The company is playing host to what it calls its first “developer day,” an event held around the world at which Google will present itself not as the world’s most-used search engine, or as the biggest Internet advertising company, or even as the creator of applications like Gmail, but rather as the provider of tools that others can use to build their own programs. It is an event that underscores Google’s evolution from its roots as a search engine into a company that hopes to become central to a new way of computing in which software is delivered over the Web, often free and supported by ads, rather than bought and installed on users’ PCs. This evolution sharpens Google’s rivalry with Microsoft and others who are trying to provide both new Web-based software and technology building blocks for Web programmers. Google has been among the most enthusiastic proponents of this new computing model, and its executives say it will help usher in faster innovation because many Web applications can be created quickly by cobbling together existing components created by others. “It is a different model,” Google’s chief executive, Eric Schmidt, said in an interview. “The rate at which you can build applications is an order of magnitude faster because the components all fit together so quickly.” Google hopes other companies will use Gears to extend their own software and services. Some Microsoft rivals, including and Mozilla, which is behind the Firefox Web browser, are collaborating with Google on the technology. But it could also help Google’s rivals. If the Gears technology proves effective, scores of software programs, including Mail and Microsoft’s Hotmail, might one day be used offline to read e-mail messages and to compose new ones. The new e-mail messages would be sent the next time a user connects to the Internet. Google said Gears was in early stages of development. “This is not a solution that is going to work with everything on Day 1,” Mr. Smith said. For now, Google itself has applied Gears only to one of its own programs, Reader, which is used to track blogs and news sources. But the company plans to use Gears to make other programs like Gmail, Calendar, and most notably, Docs and Spreadsheets, available offline. That would make those programs more competitive with Microsoft’s Office suite of programs, one of the software giant’s cash cows. Google has begun marketing a package of these productivity applications to businesses. But many analysts say these products, unlike Microsoft’s competing software, lack the support or functions that most businesses need. “I don’t think Google is a serious player in personal productivity applications, certainly not for businesses,” said David Card, an analyst with Jupiter Research. This is not the first time that Google has offered tools to developers. Indeed, the company, much like many of its competitors in recent years, has long opened up many of its own programs to others, in hopes they would use them as building blocks for their own software and services. For instance, when Google allowed others to build map-based software and services on top of its Google Maps product, an explosion of creativity ensued. Online travel and real estate companies used the maps to enhance their own Web sites or to create entirely new businesses. And even individual programmers used data from multiple sources to “mash up” new applications. Some of these companies and Web sites, in turn, are supported by advertising that is sold by Google. Microsoft and Yahoo have opened up their own map products to developers with similar results. In putting on its first developer day, Google hopes to lure even more programmers into its camp at a time when many Internet companies are competing for their skills by offering them new tools aimed at making Web programs more capable or easy to assemble. Microsoft, for instance, recently released a product called Silverlight, which allows programmers to deliver high-quality video and other features to Web applications. “We see an emerging market that combines what people love about the Web with richness and interactivity of full desktop application,” said Brian Goldfarb, senior product manager for Silverlight. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (3 of 22) BY LINK; Firefox and the Anxiety of Growing Pains Out of Chaos, Order. Or So Google Says. WHAT'S ONLINE; Apple Cult Becoming a Religion Searching for Michael Jordan? Microsoft Wants a Better Way Computers and the Internet (3 of 22) Greatest Games Commemorative
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31deal.html Ceridian to Be Taken Private in $5.3 Billion Deal to Be Taken Private in $5.3 Billion Deal a human resources company, said last night that it had sold itself to the private equity firm Thomas H. Lee Partners and the specialty insurer for $5.3 billion in cash. The deal values Ceridian at $36 a share, a 5.3 percent premium to its closing price of $34.19 yesterday. In after-hours trading, Ceridian rose $1.41, or 4 percent, to $35.60. Ceridian and its buyers noted, however, that Ceridian was trading at around $31 before Feb. 17, when the company announced that it was putting itself up for sale. The deal represents a 16 percent premium over that price, and a 56 percent premium to Ceridian&#8217;s price on Oct. 6, the day before Ceridian announced Kathryn V. Marinello&#8217;s appointment as chief executive. Last year, Ceridian reported earnings of $174 million, or $1.20 a share, so the merger values the company at 30 times its trailing earnings, compared with about 18 times earnings for the average company in the Standard &#38; Poor&#8217;s 500-stock index. Ceridian&#8217;s human resource division offers payroll, tax and benefits services to 110,000 companies, with a combined 25 million employees, in 38 countries. The company also processes payments and issues credit and stored-value cards for the trucking and retail industries. In a statement announcing the deal, Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity said they planned to bring other investors into the transaction. Fidelity will own less than 50 percent of Ceridian at closing and for accounting purposes will not consolidate Ceridian&#8217;s results into its income statement. The transaction will be presented to Ceridian shareholders for approval at the company&#8217;s annual meeting, after the filing of proxy materials with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Ceridian said it would hold its annual meeting no later than Sept. 21. Ceridian and the buyers said they expected that the purchase would close by the end of the year. is serving as financial adviser to Ceridian, and Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen &#38; Katz is serving as legal adviser. Securities acted as financial adviser to Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity; Deutsche Bank and will finance the deal. Weil, Gotshal &#38; Manges is acting as legal adviser for Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity. NEWS; CERIDIAN TO SEPARATE INTO TWO COMPANIES BY YEAR-END THE MARKETS: Market Place; Wild Ascent Of a Small-Cap Stock, Perhaps By Mistake COMPANY NEWS; CERIDIAN AGREES TO BUY ABR INFORMATION SERVICES COMPANY NEWS; CERIDIAN TO BUY LIFEWORKS, A RIVAL IN EMPLOYEE SERVICES Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Lee, Thomas H, Partners Fidelity National Financial Incorporated and Krushchev 1961
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31digital.html For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Bill Gates and Steven P. Jobs in a rare joint appearance at a technology conference in Carlsbad, Calif. Calif., May 30 — In a highly anticipated encounter, Bill Gates of Microsoft and Steven P. Jobs of Apple took the stage Wednesday evening to relive old battles and alliances and speculate about the future of digital culture and technology. Rivals for three decades, the two executives have rarely appeared in public together and have generally been viewed as bitter rivals, despite occasional partnerships. In front of about 600 technology executives at the D: All Things Digital conference, which was sponsored by The Wall Street Journal, the two executives attracted the attention usually reserved for rock singers and Hollywood stars. However, attendees who came hoping for fireworks or a confrontation were disappointed. The mild tone to the session did not take anything away from the event and after discussing the past and present of the computing industry, the two were greeted with a standing ovation. After the event was over a number of the attendees who are veterans of decades in the computer industry said the joint appearance was the most memorable moment of any of the many conferences they had attended. Mr. Gates and Mr. Jobs largely pioneered the personal computer industry beginning in 1975 and 1976 and they spent part of the evening sharing memories of those days. Today "we ship these computers with one or two gigabytes and nobody remembers 128 kilobytes," Mr. Jobs said. Apple and Microsoft were business partners at the start of the computer era beginning in 1977 when Mr. Gates supplied a copy of the BASIC programming language for the Apple II computer. Later, Mr. Gates made an early bet on writing software for the Macintosh, two years before the computer was introduced in 1984. Neither was willing to acknowledge the possibility that the personal computer era they helped create would end any time soon. "The PC has proven to be very resilient," Mr. Jobs said. At the same time they called themselves believers in the explosion of hand-held communications devices, also known as "Post PC devices." Mr. Gates said he was sometimes frustrated by the fact that the players in the industry changed so quickly. "I miss it when people come and go. It's nice when people stick around and it gives us some context," he said.During a question and answer period at the end of the session both men were asked to comment on the other's strengths. Mr. Gates singled out Mr. Jobs intuitive aesthetic sense. "I'd give a lot to have Steve's taste," Mr. Gates said, drawing laughter from the audience. "The way he does things, it's just different." Mr. Jobs returned the compliment, noting that Mr. Gates skills at building business partnerships were something that eluded him in his first decade at Apple. Asked to comment on today's computer industry and the youth culture that it markets to, both men pointed to examples of applications of computer technology that had been readily adopted by seniors. Mr. Gates said that when he showed the Microsoft Surface, the touch computing system introduced on Wednesday to a group of chief executives at his home several weeks ago, he was surprised they were more enthusiastic about the product than he was. The executives, he noted came from a generation that was not comfortable with keyboards. They were particularly interested in a technology that allowed them to control things on a display screen by pointing and moving them directly with their fingers. Neither man was willing to say harsh things about the other and Mr. Jobs summed up his feelings by quoting from a Beatles song: "&#61486;'You and I have memories longer than the road that stretches out ahead,' that's clearly true here," he said. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (4 of 22) SUITS; Most-Admired C.E.O. Is Not an Oxymoron Gates vs. Jobs: The Rematch THEATER: THIS WEEK; The 'Bomb-itty' Team Sends in the Nerds (4 of 22) Seaver Autographed Baseball
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31adco.html?ex=1338264000&en=735b9e7eb7306b76&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss About Online Surveys, Traditional Pollsters Are: (C) Somewhat Disappointed Online Surveys, Traditional Pollsters Are: (C) Somewhat Disappointed May 27 — To traditional pollsters, a random survey adjusted to reflect the general population is the only way to measure public opinion properly. First developed in the 1940s by George Gallup, the father of modern polling, random sampling requires hours of costly legwork by an army of specially trained pollsters. But some survey companies that offer an Internet-based alternative to traditional polls are trying to make inroads, including a British one, YouGov, which plans to introduce its methods in the United States for the next presidential election. Working with a large panel of respondents who answer a range of questions through an online questionnaire, YouGov says it can predict election outcomes and consumer preferences with greater accuracy for far less money than ever before. To reflect a broad spectrum of opinion, the online panelists are recruited from all walks of life, and efforts are made to reach out to people who are less likely to be online, like the elderly and people with low incomes. Panelists are paid to participate — which is a big no-no in conventional polling — and their identities are validated by their home addresses and other personal details. To be sure, traditional pollsters and political consultants do not view online surveys as scientifically acceptable. The sampling of consumer opinion tapped through an online questionnaire cannot be as random as traditional measures, they argue, and it is easier for people to misrepresent themselves and their opinions online. Another critical difference is that in traditional polls, participation is voluntary, not paid. “Voter polling by the Internet is not yet viable,” said Joel Benenson, a Democratic pollster working for the presidential campaign of Senator of Illinois. “There are some uses for online polling, but it still misses out on too much of the population for us.” Despite the strong skepticism, Internet-based survey results are likely to get some publicity during the 2008 elections, and executives from companies that conduct these surveys hope that they can use the attention to gain credibility for their methods. YouGov, for example, has formed a partnership with Polimetrix, an online survey company based in Palo Alto, Calif., for surveys in the United States. Polimetrix, with a panel of one million people, plans to track the 2008 presidential election with a 50-state survey covering a minimum of 1,000 panelists in each state. “State-by-state election results are an important way for us to prove that our methodology delivers accurate results,” said Douglas Rivers, a political science professor who founded Polimetrix in 2004. “You can be lucky once, but not 50 times.” Professor Rivers said that the margin of error for Polimetrix surveys is similar to that of polls conducted by telephone. YouGov said that its own results in recent British elections were as close or closer to the actual votes than traditional polling methods. Mr. Benenson of the Obama campaign said that the Internet can be an effective way to test ad campaigns for specific populations, but that the variables are too great for judging the views of the general population. Polls on which public policy decisions are based still require walking the streets, said Leendert de Voogd, managing director of TNS Opinion in Brussels, one of the world’s largest polling companies. “It is still way too early for public opinion polling to go online,” Mr. de Voogd said. “Internet polling is like the Far West, with no rules, no sheriff and no reference points.” Among the surveys run by TNS Opinion is Eurobarometer, a survey of public opinion across Europe conducted for the “The decisions made on the basis of our polls are far too important to be left to an online survey,” Mr. de Voogd said. “Online polls can miss very important parts of the population.” For YouGov, developing a balanced panel of regular respondents from all sectors of the population is a priority, said Nadhim Zahawi, YouGov’s chief executive. “We expend a lot of effort reaching older people and other demographics” of people who are less likely to use the Internet, he said. Mr. Zahawi added that modern technology has made old-fashioned polls more cumbersome and unreliable. “Thanks to the increased use of mobile phones, the traditional pollsters face a growing problem of how to track down people at home,” he said. In London, The Daily Telegraph, which uses YouGov’s services roughly twice a month, appreciates the ability to query a large number of people in a short time. Control Of Electric Bill, Hour by Hour Despite Steps, Disaster Planning Still Shows Gaps Through His Webcam, a Boy Joins a Sordid Online World Young, Assured and Playing Pharmacist to Friends Computers and the Internet POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31phone.html Motorola Says It Will Eliminate 4,000 More Jobs Says It Will Eliminate 4,000 More Jobs THE ASSOCIATED PRESS May 30 (AP) &#151; said Wednesday that it would cut another 4,000 jobs, or more than 6 percent of its shrinking work force, as part of a plan to improve sagging financial and operational results. With the latest round of cuts, the company has announced plans to eliminate more than 10 percent of its work force since the start of 2007, when it became clear that two years of strong momentum behind the popular Razr mobile phone had collapsed. The company&#8217;s travails caused it to be the target of a proxy fight this year by the billionaire investor , who lost his bid this month for a board seat. Motorola said Wednesday that Mr. Icahn had received 717.1 million votes, compared with 931.7 million for John A. White, the company nominee he was closest to defeating. All other Motorola nominees got at least 1.6 billion votes. The company had been in the process of eliminating 3,500 jobs as part of a two-year cost-cutting plan to save $400 million. Motorola said the newly announced cuts, together with other cost-control measures, would save another $600 million in 2008. Motorola&#8217;s work force, which stood at 150,000 worldwide as recently as 2000, had declined to 66,000 at the beginning of the year. Wall Street gave modest approval to the latest cuts. Motorola shares rose 17 cents in after-hours trading after closing the regular session down 2 cents, at $18.28. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (15 of 22) Plans to Cut 5% of Work Force At A.M.D., A Quiet Doer Gets His Due Technology Briefing | Hardware: Motorola To Cut 1,000 Jobs Worldwide Technology Briefing | Hardware: Motorola Lowers Growth Predictions Layoffs and Job Reductions (15 of 22) ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: JAZZ
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31scene.html?ex=1338264000&en=8345e60ee2c55235&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Copyrights That No One Knows About Don&#8217;t Help Anyone That No One Knows About Don’t Help Anyone a quiz question for authors: To copyright a written work in the United States, you must (a) register it with the Copyright Office; (b) insert a notice that says “Copyright © 2007”; (c) insert a notice that says “All rights reserved.” Answer: none of the above. Under current law, a work is automatically copyrighted the moment it is “fixed in tangible form.” And these days, that copyright lasts virtually forever: 70 years after the death of the author, in most cases. Since there is no requirement to register a work and a copyright lasts so long, the legal owner of a work can be difficult to find, particularly when the work is more than a few decades old. When some librarians at tried to request permissions to digitize a collection of out-of-print books, they were unable to find more than 20 percent of the rights holders, despite persistent efforts. Failing to locate rights holders can be costly since copyright infringement may be subject to statutory damages of up to $150,000 an incident. The costs of locating rights holders are an example of what economists call transactions costs. Not surprisingly, high transactions costs tend to discourage transactions from occurring. The so-called orphan works problem was examined by the Copyright Office in a 2006 report in which it proposed legislation to address the transactions costs issues. Under its proposal, if you conducted a “diligent search” to locate a rights holder and still failed to find the owner, you would be off the hook. You could then incorporate the work in question into your own work, as long as you provided proper attribution. If the legitimate rights holder was subsequently found, he or she could not require that your work be withdrawn from circulation, but could collect “reasonable compensation” for use. But what is a “diligent search?” The report leaves the interpretation of this phrase up to the courts but suggests some relevant considerations: whether the work includes identification, the age of the work, whether the work can be found in public databases like Copyright Office records, and so on. The Copyright Office’s proposal is certainly a step in the right direction. Clarifying the rights and obligations of the buyers and sellers of copyrighted material would reduce transactions costs, and that should lead to a more efficient market for intellectual property. But does the proposed legislation go far enough? According to Law professor who is an expert in copyright law, it does not. He favors a system where authors receive an automatic copyright when they create new works, but they must register their copyright within 14 years to retain it past the initial period. (Unfortunately, such a registration requirement cannot apply to foreign creators because of international copyright treaties.) This is in the same spirit as the copyright law in place before 1964 requiring that copyrights be renewed at the Copyright Office in their 28th year. Materials that weren’t renewed fell into the public domain. Mr. Lessig envisions the Copyright Office as specifying the standards for registries but not necessarily operating them, since the private sector may be better positioned to build and maintain such systems. His inspiration is the domain name system used to register Internet sites. In that system, a standards body specifies the design, but it is up to individual organizations to carry out the necessary registries. The proposals by the Copyright Office and Mr. Lessig are not necessarily exclusive. If easily accessible copyright registries existed, the courts would probably find that simply searching the registries would satisfy the diligent search requirement. Creators of works with commercial potential would then have strong incentives to register their works. In such a world, a legal requirement to register works could be redundant, since the commercial incentives to register would be strong. Still, why take a chance? Establishing the expectations that works should be registered to receive the full protection of copyright law makes a lot of sense. Creating a registry is not that difficult from either a technological or a business perspective. The Copyright Clearance Center ( ) was established by a group of publishers in 1978 to provide rights clearance for printed works. The Harry Fox Agency ( ) serves as a clearinghouse for those who want to make recordings of songs, and there are plenty of Web sites devoted to image search to ease the sharing of photographs. But would the creators charge excessive fees if rights clearinghouses became widespread? I would argue that just the opposite would occur. An easy-to-use, efficient and competitive marketplace tends to push prices down. Reducing the transactions costs of acquiring reproduction rights potentially makes both creators and users of information better off. The orphan works legislation from the Copyright Office is still on the back burner in Congress. Let us hope that it soon gets the attention it deserves. Information plays a crucial role in today’s economy. Making it easy for creators and users of information to find each other should be a high priority for policy makers. Hal R. Varian is a professor of business, economics and information management at the University of California, Berkeley. access to The Archive - get it now with TimesSelect Trip By Paulson Lifts Stakes Apple Gets French Support In Music Compatibility Case Skin Deep; Is a Scent Like a Song? Oui and Non Paris Approves Law Aimed at Making iTunes Compatible With Rival Devices POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-QATARAIRWAYS_BRF.html France: Qatar Airways Raises Airbus Order Qatar Airways Raises Airbus Order THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Airways ordered 20 more Airbus A350s to become the largest customer for the wide-body jet, with a total order of 80 planes worth a listed price of $16 billion. Louis Gallois, chief executive of Airbus, said it was one of Airbus’s biggest orders ever. The Qatar Airways agreement for 20 A350-800s, 40 A350-900s and 20 A350-1000s, as with most large orders, would probably come with deep discounts from the listing price. The agreement replaces one for 60 A350s signed in 2005. The commitment for 20 extra planes brings Airbus’s total orders for the A350 to 268. Business Briefing | Europe: Russia: Aeroflot to Buy Airbus Planes Airbus Chief Says Order Ensures Jet Will Be Built
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-EXECUTIVEISL_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=e38e996e62add665&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Britain: Executive Is Leaving BP Executive Is Leaving BP THE ASSOCIATED PRESS the British oil company, said the chief executive of its refining and marketing operations is leaving to run of Canada. The executive, John Manzoni, had been passed over for the chief executive’s position at BP when Tony Hayward was named to the job this month. Mr. Manzoni will become president and chief executive of Talisman. He will be succeeded at BP by a fellow executive, Iain Conn, BP said. Mr. Manzoni was criticized for his handling of safety management after an explosion killed 15 workers at a BP refinery in Texas in March 2005. New Chief, BP's Problems Range From Rusted Pipes to a Tarnished Image BP's Chief Quits Over Revelations About Private Life Chief's Bonus Is Cut at BP; Safety Issues Cited as Factor INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; BP's Quarterly Profit Falls to 2-Year Low Suspensions, Dismissals and Resignations
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31martha.html?ex=1338264000&en=14b3480ddc610b09&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Settlement for Martha Stewart Investors for Martha Stewart Investors federal judge has approved a class-action settlement that requires Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia and its founder to pay shareholders $30 million in compensation for losses suffered during the trading scandal, lawyers said yesterday. was convicted by a Manhattan federal court jury in March 2004 of lying to investigators looking into her sale of shares of ImClone Systems. She served five months in prison and five more months of house arrest. The shareholders accused executives of Omnimedia, a media and merchandising company, of misleading investors by making false statements related to the government inquiry into Ms. Stewart’s suspicious stock trading. The lawsuit contended that stockholders lost money because of the scandal. The pact requires that Ms. Stewart pay $5 million of the total settlement, according to the law firm Milberg Weiss & Bershad, which represented the investors. The settlement was approved by Judge John E. Sprizzo of Federal District Court in Manhattan on Tuesday, according to Milberg Weiss. Omnimedia did not immediately respond to a request for comment yesterday. MONEY: INVESTING; Will a Short Sentence Prove Sweet for a Stock? MARTHA STEWART'S SENTENCE: THE OVERVIEW; 5 Months in Jail, and Stewart Vows, 'I'll Be Back' THE MARTHA STEWART VERDICT: THE COMPANY; A Harsh Blow To a Company Based on Image Prosecutor Says Martha Stewart Spun Web of Lies About Shares Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia Incorporated POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Truth, India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31black.html?ex=1338264000&en=9c7404a1168c5ead&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Prosecutors Rest Case in Conrad Black Trial - Rest Case in Conrad Black Trial THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 CHICAGO, May 30 (AP) &#151; Prosecutors rested their racketeering and fraud case against the media mogul on Wednesday, minutes after announcing they were dropping one money-laundering count against him. Prosecutors did not say why they dropped the count, a decision that came with no fanfare while jurors were out of the courtroom and issues were being discussed by the judge and lawyers. &#8220;At this time the prosecution rests,&#8221; an assistant United States attorney, Eric H. Sussman, told Judge Amy J. St. Eve of Federal District Court just before 3 p.m., ending the government&#8217;s case against Mr. Black after more than 10 weeks. Lawyers for Mr. Black and three co-defendants were scheduled to begin calling witnesses Thursday in what is expected to be a much less time-consuming case for the defense. Mr. Black, 62, and three other former executives are charged with swindling , a newspaper holding company, out of millions of dollars through the sale of The government says the scheme began with a decision in the late 1990s by Mr. Black, who was the company&#8217;s chairman, to sell hundreds of small Hollinger-owned community newspapers across the United States and Canada. Millions of dollars were paid to Hollinger in exchange for promises that it would not go into competition with the new owners of the papers. Prosecutors say that Mr. Black and two of his co-defendants, the former Hollinger vice presidents John A. Boultbee and Peter Y. Atkinson, illegally diverted much of the money to themselves with help from the corporate counsel, Mark S. Kipnis. Mr. Kipnis is also on trial. The prosecution rested its case amid bickering over 13 boxes that Mr. Black removed from the company&#8217;s headquarters in Toronto late in the afternoon of May 20, 2005, in defiance of a court order. On Wednesday, jurors saw pictures captured by security cameras of Mr. Black hauling the boxes out of the headquarters building and loading them into a waiting limousine. Mr. Black, who is charged with obstruction of justice in the incident, was forced to return the boxes, which sat on an evidence cart next to the jury box while the jurors viewed the security camera photos on a large screen. Judge St. Eve gave both sides until next Tuesday to file briefs expanding on their arguments. A defense lawyer for Mr. Black, Marc Martin, said he would ask her to drop other counts as well. Tells Of Black's Deal On Apartments Judge Scolds Central Witness In Conrad Black's Fraud Trial MEDIA FRENZY; Like a Marriage That Ended Up in Court Punishing Court Day for Black's Ex-Deputy POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31addes.html &#8216;I Love New York&#8217; Awarded to Saatchi - Love New York’ Awarded to Saatchi THE NEW YORK TIMES Published: May 31, 2007 The familiar tourism campaign for New York State, known since 1977 by its theme, I Love New York, is getting a new agency as well as an increased budget. The Empire State Development Corporation selected Saatchi & Saatchi in New York, part of the , to handle the campaign. The decision, announced yesterday by Gov. , came after a required review that began in February. The budget for the campaign for 2007-8 will be increased 50 percent, to $16 million, Mr. Spitzer said. There will also be efforts to expand the types of media in which the campaign appears beyond traditional ones like television and print, reflecting the increasing use of the Internet by consumers making travel plans. The I Love New York campaign has been handled since December 2003 by the Albany office of Eric Mower & Associates. Mower was the first upstate agency to handle the assignment, which has had 11 agencies since its introduction 30 years ago. Mower decided in March not to take part in the review. Saatchi & Saatchi was awarded a three-year contract for the assignment, with a two-year renewal option. dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Sudoku Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31vioxx.html 3rd Trial Is Ordered in Vioxx Death Case - Trial Is Ordered in Vioxx Death Case THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 NEW ORLEANS, May 30 (AP) — A federal judge has ordered a third trial in a lawsuit by a woman who blamed ’s painkiller Vioxx for the heart attack that killed her husband. A cardiologist who testified for Merck misrepresented his qualifications in the second trial last year, Judge Eldon E. Fallon of the Eastern District of Louisiana ruled. Jurors in that trial ruled in favor of Merck and against Evelyn Irvin Plunkett, whose first husband, Richard Irvin Jr., died of a heart attack after taking Vioxx for less than a month. The ruling was signed Tuesday, but was made available on the Internet a day later. The first trial, held in Houston during November and December 2005, ended with the jury deadlocked 8 to 1 in Merck’s favor, two jurors told The Associated Press. The cardiologist, Dr. Barry Rayburn, a professor of medicine at the , Birmingham, who was hired by Merck as a $600-an-hour expert witness, testified in the second trial that the drug could not have caused Mr. Irvin’s heart attack. Dr. Rayburn testified then that he was board-certified in cardiovascular disease. When Merck brought Dr. Rayburn as a witness in a second Vioxx trial, in a state court case in New Jersey, however, he testified during cross-examination that his board certification had lapsed. The ruling will not affect other cases because Dr. Rayburn took the board examinations for recertification last summer, has testified in only those two cases and has since been recertified, his lawyer said. Jury Sides With Merck In a 10th Trial Over Painkiller In Big Penalty, Jury Reverses A Vioxx Verdict Mixed Verdicts for Merck in Vioxx Cases Mistrial Declared Over Vioxx Risks Merck & Company Inc million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Puzzle Society Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31chinastox.html Tax Increase Batters Chinese Stocks, but There&#8217;s Little Wider Damage - Increase Batters Chinese Stocks, but There’s Little Wider Damage Mark Ralston/Agence France-Presse — Getty Images Investors intently studied a stock price board at a securities firm in Shanghai Wednesday as share values dropped sharply. Earlier, the government, seeking to rein in speculation, tripled the tax on trading stamps. May 31, 2007 SHANGHAI, Thursday, May 31 — Chinese stock markets plummeted Wednesday and continued their decline in early trading Thursday after the authorities in Beijing moved to impose higher taxes on trading activity. Skip to next paragraph The tax increase, which was announced early Wednesday, was the government’s latest attempt to rein in the world’s hottest stock market as a growing number of economists and analysts warn about the danger of a market bubble. Investors reacted by selling shares and pushing the benchmark indexes on the two main stock exchanges sharply lower. The Shanghai composite index plunged 6.5 percent, to 4,053.09. The Shenzhen composite index dropped nearly 7.2 percent, to 1,199.45. At midday Thursday, the Shanghai exchange was down nearly 3 percent from Wednesday’s close and the Shenzhen 5 percent. When Chinese shares fell sharply at the end of February, markets around the world tumbled in tandem on worries of broader trouble ahead for the nation’s economy. But on Wednesday, other Asian markets were down only modestly. The benchmark Hang Seng index in Hong Kong declined 0.86 percent Wednesday, and in Tokyo the Nikkei index of 225 issues slid a little less than 0.5 percent. In its move Wednesday, the Chinese finance ministry tripled the tax on stock transactions to 0.3 percent, which analysts said was probably not enough to destroy the bull market, though it could dampen the mood of speculators. “The psychological impact on investors could be larger than the actual effect of the duty adjustment,” Shen Minggao, an economist at , wrote in a research note. Most analysts said they did not think that a sharp drop in stock prices would harm the Chinese economy, which continues to grow robustly. Some said they expected the markets to resume their climb quickly unless the government announced further measures. “If the market expectation is that share prices are going to rise 50 percent in the next six months, then the transaction tax is affordable,” said Dong Tao, chief Asia economist at The tax was increased at a time many Chinese seem to have gone mad for stocks. Professionals, retirees, shop owners, students — even watermelon hawkers — are said to be lining up to buy stocks in hopes of getting in on the rally. More than 300,000 accounts are being opened every day, regulators say. Brokerage houses are overrun with day traders and people who pack lunches to spend the day staring at stock price monitors. One indication of the mood is a popular cellphone greeting that is being sent around Shanghai. The greeting replaces the national anthem with a call for all investors to rise up and buy, buy, buy stocks. “Arise, ye who refuse to be slaves” from the national anthem has been replaced by: “Arise, ye who haven’t opened an account! Pour your gold and silver into the hot market.” Chinese seem eager to buy stocks not only because they have watched prices soar in the last two years, but also because there are few other opportunities to get a good return on investments. Until the past year, much of the speculative money in China was going into real estate, particularly in Shanghai and Beijing. Policy makers chilled real estate speculation with a series of tax and administrative measures, only to see the speculation move into stocks. Many investors are betting almost everything on stocks. Some said that even the sell-off on Wednesday was unlikely to restrain optimism. “There are too many small investors in the market,” said Fan Ligen, a retired Shanghai clerk who has been investing in stocks since 1992. “They are like hundreds of ants swarming on pieces of meat on the ground.” In the February sell-off, prices plummeted 8.8 percent after the Shanghai composite index surpassed the 3,000-point level for the first time. It was the biggest one-day drop in a decade. But with prices down, new investors rushed in, sensing an opportunity to buy on the cheap. They were right. In mid-March, the Shanghai index retraced its losses, again exceeding 3,000. Early this month, it passed 4,000. This week, it was pushing toward 4,400 on record volume. “Our market is different from the ones Japan,” said Li Wenwei, a banker who was at a brokerage house in Shanghai. “Those markets obey the rules of the market, while ours doesn’t. There are bubbles in the market. The index is already too high, and there is a lot of risk in the market.” In many ways, the stock market has come into line with China’s phenomenal economic growth, a bullish market to match a bullish economy that is growing close to 11 percent a year, creating worries about the possibility of hypergrowth and inflation, a stock market crash and, potentially, civil unrest. The rise is extraordinary. Since July 2005, when a bearish market turned bullish, share prices have soared in Shanghai by more than 300 percent and 400 percent in Shenzhen, even with Wednesday’s drop. That decline, though, was especially sharp — given regulations that no single stock rise or fall more than 10 percent in a trading day. Some stocks fell the limit Wednesday, and questions arose whether they might continue dropping Thursday. “I think the market will still go down a bit tomorrow,” Mr. Li, the banker in Shanghai, said. “My two stocks fell today. But I won’t sell them yet. I’m not nervous about the fall since my investment is from my savings.” David Barboza reported from Shanghai and Keith Bradsher from Hong Kong. Rujun Shen contributed reporting from Shanghai. a Switch, China Triples the Tax on Stock Trades STOCKS & BONDS; Shares Rise on a Wave of Takeover News China&#8217;s Leaders Confront Their Manic Market INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; China Talks Don't Resolve Major Issues Economic Conditions and Trends million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Fifth Avenue From St. Regis, circa 1904 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31blue.html?ex=1338264000&en=c3a7f579f981a945&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss I.B.M. to Cut Jobs, Mostly in Technology - to Cut Jobs, Mostly in Technology May 31, 2007 International Business Machines cut about 1,570 jobs yesterday to help improve profit margins in its technology services unit. Edward Barbini, a spokesman for , which is based in Armonk, N.Y., said that most of the cuts were in technology services and in North America. This is at least the second set of job reductions at I.B.M. this month. The company earlier dismissed workers in the global services unit. Profit at the technology unit, which accounts for more than a third of sales, fell 19 percent, to $681 million, in the latest quarter. I.B.M. reported last month that its first-quarter gross margin, the percentage of sales left after production costs, was unchanged from a year earlier, prompting the company to pursue cost cuts in the United States. Shares of I.B.M. rose 76 cents, to $106.68, on the New York Stock Exchange The company, which had 355,800 employees as of last year, has cut about 3,000 jobs this quarter. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (16 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Here, But Hiring Over There INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; I.B.M. Job Cuts Will Hit Europe Especially Hard COMPANY NEWS; I.B.M. CLOSING FIVE PLANTS AND CUTTING 500 JOBS IN SWEDEN Technology Briefing | Hardware: I.B.M. Cuts 700 From Services Unit International Business Machines Corp Layoffs and Job Reductions (16 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31radios.html?ex=1338264000&en=32fe4d40014e63c1&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss CBS Buys Last.FM, an Online Radio Site - Buys Last.FM, an Online Radio Site THE NEW YORK TIMES Published: May 31, 2007 said yesterday that it had acquired Last.FM, an online radio and social-networking site, for $280 million to expand its digital offerings. CBS, one of the nation’s biggest radio broadcasters, said the founders of the five-year-old service would continue to operate it as an independent unit. But the purchase is also regarded as a way for CBS to grab an audience online at a time when many traditional radio stations fear losing listeners to iPods, Internet radio and other competing media. The sale of Last.FM comes as the profitability of online radio has been called into question. A recent ruling by the federal Copyright Royalty Board, which establishes royalty rates for Internet-based broadcasters that stream music online, would raise the existing rates significantly. CBS said the deal provided an opportunity to extend its reach online, including adding some of its own programming to Last.FM. As it stands, the site attracts more than 15 million users worldwide, with big audiences in the United States, Britain and Germany. CBS, which also owns the CBS television network, has also purchased Wallstrip.com, a business-oriented site built around online video and blogging, and has invested in Joost, an online video service. ONLINE; CBS Has a Crush on Wallstrip CBS to Sell Amusement Parks to Cedar Fair FIVE DAYS; G.M., Lucent and CBS Tackle Some Problems With Focus on Youth, 2 Small TV Networks Unite Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Computers and the Internet POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31stox.html S.& P. Index Climbs Past the Record It Set 7 Years Ago - P. Index Climbs Past the Record It Set 7 Years Ago Traders at the New York Stock Exchange were busy Wednesday as the S.& P. hit a record high. May 31, 2007 The stock market yesterday clawed back to where it was seven years ago during the heady days of technology and the Internet boom — and it had to overcome an overnight sell-off in China to get there. Skip to next paragraph What Took So Long? which struggled for much of the day after markets fell in Asia and Europe, received a midafternoon boost from the minutes of a Federal Reserve meeting that indicated that policy makers had become somewhat more upbeat about the economy. The tone of the minutes, if not the substance, heartened investors, who sent the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index, the most widely followed benchmark of American stocks, past a level last reached on March 24, 2000. The index — a weighted measure of the biggest American companies, from — gained 0.8 percent, or 12.12 points, to 1,530.23, surpassing the record of 1,527.46. The S.& P. climbed past the record early last week, too, but failed to hold onto the gains until the end of regular trading as it did yesterday. The industrial average, which has been breaking records with some regularity in the last several months, closed up 111.74 points, or 0.83 percent, to 13,633.08, another record. composite index rose 20.53 points yesterday, or 0.8 percent, to 2,592.59. The Nasdaq has yet to come close to regaining the levels reached during the Internet boom. It is down 49 percent from its March 2000 high. The S.& P. breakthrough was set on a day that began with worries about a bubble in Chinese stocks. The stock market in Shanghai tumbled 6.5 percent yesterday after the government in Beijing trebled the taxes on stock transactions in an effort to rein in what has become the world’s hottest stock market. In February, the Shanghai market precipitated a wave of selling on markets around the world after a similar sell-off. But after a brief period of uncertainty in late February and early March, investors have been pushing American stocks steadily upward. This time, the nervousness was much shorter-lived. “If we see a 20 or 30 percent decline in the Shanghai index, that will cause investors to sit up and take notice,” Sam Stovall, chief investment strategist at Standard & Poor’s, said yesterday. “Basically, investors say, ‘You’ve got to increase the shock value, not merely replicate it to get my attention the second time around.’ ” The United States market has been supported by a strong flow of corporate takeovers, companies buying back their own shares and corporate earnings that are proving to be better than expected. That optimism appears to be overshadowing, at least for now, concerns about the slowing American economy, rising energy prices, a modest increase in interest rates and the troubles in the housing market. “We have a remarkably positive environment for securities,” said James W. Paulsen, chief investment strategist for Wells Capital Management. “You have 5 percent real world G.D.P. growth right now and you have massive excessive liquidity sloshing around.” According to minutes of the Fed meeting on May 9, officials seemed to think that the economic outlook had improved somewhat, even as they acknowledged that the housing market and the problems in subprime mortgages would serve as a bigger drag on the economy than they had previously thought. But the minutes reiterated, as statements from the Fed have for many months now, that policy makers remain concerned that inflation is too high and too unsettled to warrant a change in policy, which has been to leave short-term interest rates unchanged at 5.25 percent. There are also signs that the recent moderation in inflation could be threatened by rising gasoline prices, which have climbed past $3 a gallon for the first time since last summer. Still, investors appeared willing to look past the Fed’s concerns about housing and inflation, two staple worries that while they have raised eyebrows have not yet sapped corporate profits or the frenzied deal-making on Wall Street. While the outlook for profits is not as ebullient as it was in the last several years, it remains reasonably upbeat. Low interest rates have also ensured that businesses still have easy access to credit. (The 4.87 percent yield on the 10-year Treasury note, which has risen in the last two months, is still historically low.) & Poor's 500-Stock Index Economic Conditions and Trends million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands PRESIDENTS Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31plavix.html?ex=1338264000&en=ee87f5e346140c8f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Bristol-Myers to Pay Fine - to Pay Fine May 31, 2007 WASHINGTON, May 30 (Agence France-Presse) — has agreed to plead guilty and pay a $1 million criminal fine for lying to the government about a patent deal on its blood-thinning drug Plavix, officials said Wednesday. The Justice Department said in a statement that the company’s actions had threatened to reduce competition for the drug, one of the best-selling prescription medications worldwide. Government investigators said that a former senior executive had made “oral representations” to a Canadian generic drug maker, Apotex, that caused Apotex to conclude that Bristol-Myers would not introduce its own generic version of Plavix. At the time, the two companies were locked in litigation over the validity of the patent for Plavix. Bristol-Myers, however, was subject to a consent decree that required it to submit any patent settlements for review with the Federal Trade Commission. The government said that Bristol-Myers had also lied to the government about the arrangement. The government inquiry is still open. The patent deal’s failure led to the ouster of Bristol-Myers’s chief executive, Peter R. Dolan, in September. Inquiry Into Bid to Suppress a Generic Plavix Bristol-Myers Says Review Clears Company Study Raises Questions on Plavix Safety COMPANY NEWS; DRUG FOR HEART PATIENTS FOUND EFFECTIVE FOR A YEAR POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Wright Brothers' Historic First Flight - 1903 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31music.html?ex=1338264000&en=e24d1e82aada7253&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Viacom to Sell Music Publishing Unit to Sony/ATV - to Sell Music Publishing Unit to Sony/ATV May 31, 2007 has agreed to sell its Famous Music unit, a publishing catalog with rights to roughly 125,000 songs, to Sony/ATV Music Publishing for about $370 million. The deal, which was announced yesterday, , includes a wide range of songs, among them classics like &#8220;That&#8217;s Amore&#8221; and &#8220;Moon River&#8221; and newer hits by songwriters including Linda Perry and Akon. The Famous catalog, which dates to 1928, also includes a catalog of film scores, like the themes from &#8220;The Godfather&#8221; and &#8220;Beverly Hills Cop.&#8221; Viacom took over the business as part of its acquisition of the Paramount movie studio. The agreement comes after an extensive auction that in addition to Sony/ATV attracted suitors including private equity investors and the Universal Music Group, according to executives briefed on the negotiations. Sony/ATV is a partnership of and the pop star Michael Jackson, who had long financed his extravagant lifestyle with loans tied to his share of the venture. Viacom, which operates cable channels like MTV, auctioned the Famous catalog after concluding it was not a core asset. Sony, though, has been seeking publishing catalogs, which generate income when their songs are used by others. In April, Sony said it had acquired the music of the songwriters Jerry Leiber and Mike Stoller, including &#8220;Hound Dog,&#8221; and &#8220;Love Potion No. 9,&#8221; in a deal valued at roughly $40 million, according to executives briefed on the deal. The company also brought in Martin Bandier, the former chairman of EMI&#8217;s giant publishing unit, as chief executive. Feels Breath on Neck; These Days, No. 1 Portal Seems to Be a Step Behind Google Is Said To Set Sights On YouTube Viacom to Pay $102 Million For an Online Game Service Viacom to Sell DreamWorks Film Library Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/01/business/01cnd-econ.html U.S. Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years - Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years June 1, 2007 The economy grew at less than half the rate first estimated in the first quarter, the Commerce Department said today in its revision of the nation’s gross domestic product. Skip to next paragraph today’s numbers were released, it was clear the economy was downshifting from the rapid 5.6 percent expansion of the first quarter last year. But the new data reinforced how significant the slowdown has been. Growth advanced just 0.6 percent, compared with an initial estimate of 1.3 percent. It was the slowest rate recorded since the fourth quarter of 2002. The chief reasons for the revisions were adjustments to the estimates of imports and business inventories. Imports, which subtract from the gross domestic product, were stronger than the government first thought. At the same time, businesses cut production and accumulated smaller inventory stockpiles. Despite the adjustments to the growth figures, inflation in the first quarter was essentially unrevised. Prices excluding food and energy, a measure preferred by the Federal Reserve, advanced by 2.2 percent in the first quarter, still above what the central bank has said it considers acceptable. But there were some revisions to the numbers that economists said they found to be encouraging. Consumer spending, the staple of economic growth for the last decade, was revised higher. It advanced 4.4 percent in the first quarter, compared with an initial estimate of 3.8 percent. And the drag from the collapse in residential real estate was slightly less than the government first reported. Most economists agree that the first quarter was probably a low point for the last several years, and they expect the economy has regained some strength in the second quarter. Although consumer spending has probably slowed since the first quarter and the correction in the housing market is ongoing, economists expect demand from overseas to help businesses in the United States. “There are reasons to expect G.D.P. growth to improve,” said Richard Moody, chief economist with Mission Residential, a real estate investment firm in Austin, Texas. Reading Shows Growth Higher in '06 What Could Bog Down the Bull; Slowing Earnings Threaten to Turn the Easy Going Into a Slog Through Mud Vigorous Consumer Spending Helped Economy Grow 3.5% at the End of 2006 Economic Conditions and Trends million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands NYT Keepsake Inside Page Reprint Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31testing.html?ex=1338264000&en=faf61eff6bfca6d0&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Coca-Cola and PepsiCo Agree to Curb Animal Tests - and PepsiCo Agree to Curb Animal Tests May 31, 2007 ATLANTA, May 30 — Under pressure from animal rights advocates, two soft drink giants, , have agreed to stop directly financing research that uses animals to test or develop their products, except where such testing is required by law. People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals sought the assurances after discovering studies financed by the companies that used animals like rats and chimpanzees to test taste perception and, in some cases, to bolster support for promotional health claims. PepsiCo said that it would stop directly financing animal experiments, including some it had financed through grants given to graduate students through its Gatorade Sports Science Institute. Elaine Palmer, a spokeswoman for PepsiCo, said that while the company had never supported the idea of animal testing, “We had not been policing it, so that part is new.” Coca-Cola and PepsiCo are the largest largest manufacturers to agree to the ban. Coca-Cola also said that it would discontinue a grant given to a researcher at Virginia Commonwealth University who has been studying taste perception in rats, which share certain taste pathways with humans. Representatives of Coca-Cola and the university declined to say how much financing the company was providing or to elaborate on what the ultimate application of the research might be. A research associate at PETA, Shalin G. Gala, said, “We see these statements from Coke and Pepsi, massive global conglomerates, as the beginning of the end of all animal tests on food.” Scientists conducting basic research in animal models have cautioned against PETA’s hard line, saying their work, which may have medical benefits, would not be possible in many cases without help from corporate sponsors. “It’s very easy to characterize scientific research like this in a bad light,” said Dr. John A. DeSimone, a professor at Virginia Commonwealth University who had been working under the Coca-Cola grant. “To do medical research, you sometimes need an animal model.” Not everyone agrees with Dr. DeSimone’s thinking, particularly when it involves tests on highly intelligent animals, as did a study involving a Coca-Cola scientist, financed by Nutrasweet, that cut open the faces of chimpanzees to study nerve impulses used in the perception of sweet tastes. “I have never found chimpanzee work justifiable,” said Dr. Alan Goldberg, director of the Center for Alternatives to Animal Testing at Dr. Goldberg said that over the last 30 years, advances in alternatives to animal models, many of which are usually more scientifically precise, have already reduced the number of lab animals in use by 50 percent. “The bottom line for me is that I’d love to see animal studies disappear entirely,” Dr. Goldberg said. “In vitro models are cleaner.” The two soft drink giants are the latest companies to respond to scrutiny by PETA, which has mounted a campaign to denounce animal testing practices in the beverage industry, an industry that, unlike cosmetics or pharmaceuticals, had largely been unpublicized in the animal testing arena. In January, Roll International, the company that makes Pom Wonderful pomegranate juice, agreed to cease tests on animals after PETA disclosed a 2005 study financed by the company that tested the juice to see if it might relieve artificially induced erectile dysfunction in rabbits. Gets 8-Year Term in Coca-Cola Secrets Case Makers of Sodas Try a New Pitch: They're Healthy The Color of Cola Ex-Secretary at Coke Guilty of Trade-Secrets Theft POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31cantor.html Cantor Fitzgerald Sells Unit to eSpeed - Fitzgerald Sells Unit to eSpeed THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 Cantor Fitzgerald, the bond-trading firm, is selling its privately held BGC Partners brokerage unit to , the publicly owned electronic trading house controlled by Cantor, in a deal valued at $1.3 billion. The acquisition will allow Cantor to consolidate its interdealer broker businesses and end all revenue-sharing agreements with eSpeed, which some eSpeed investors had criticized. But Cantor is retaining voting control over the new company, which will be called BGC Partners and trade on the . BGC had made a $460 million initial public offering proposal earlier this year, which it will now withdraw. ESpeed, used to trade primarily United States Treasuries, will issue 133,860,000 shares of its common stock and rights to acquire shares of BGC’s common stock. BGC, which had first-quarter revenue of $249 million, is valued at approximately $1.23 billion, based on the closing price of eSpeed’s stock Tuesday. Shares of eSpeed rose 4 cents, to $9.23. The deal will do little to make BCG and eSpeed more competitive against the market leaders, Icap and Tullett, said Octavio Marenzi, chief executive of consulting firm Celent, noting that the move is more about simplifying the “bizarre, triangular” relationship among Cantor, BGC and eSpeed. He added that if Cantor has voting control, it makes the deal less attractive to investors. The combined company’s 2007 projected revenue is expected to be approximately $1 billion. For 2008, the combined company’s projected revenue is expected to increase by more than 12 percent to over $1.1 billion, the companies said. NEWS; BGC TO BUY MAXCOR, A RIVAL BROKERAGE FIRM Brokerage Firm Sells Loan Unit THE MARKETS: Market Place; Cantor Adds To Network For Its Data On Prices Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Brokers and Brokerage Firms million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands THE NORTH POLE WAS HERE Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31zoellick.html?ex=1338264000&en=83d4457ce87045d5&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Bush&#8217;s Nominee Has New Agenda for Bank - Nominee Has New Agenda for Bank Pool photo by Roger Wollenberg President Bush nominated Robert B. Zoellick, left, yesterday to lead the World Bank. Treasury Secretary Henry M. Paulson Jr. is at right. A scandal forced out the departing bank president, Paul D. Wolfowitz. May 31, 2007 WASHINGTON, May 30 &#151; The stands ready to inherit may be battered, fractious and rudderless. But he said Wednesday that he saw himself not simply as a healer but as a leader ready to establish a new agenda to help the world&#8217;s poor. &#8220;On the one hand, one has to calm the waters,&#8221; Mr. Zoellick told reporters in the afternoon. &#8220;But one also has to start to navigate the course of the future.&#8221; At another point he said, &#8220;People in the bank recognize that it&#8217;s going to have to go through some mission adjustment.&#8221; But he declined to specify details. People close to Mr. Zoellick say that based on his record in past economic and diplomatic jobs, he is likely to bring a demanding approach that could disturb the status quo. At his session with journalists, Mr. Zoellick signaled that he would retain and build on the anticorruption policies of the departing president, , who resigned nearly two weeks ago after a furor over charges of favoritism. Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s nomination was formally announced Wednesday at the White House, where President Bush praised him for having &#8220;earned the trust and support of leaders from every region of the world.&#8221; Mr. Bush also praised Mr. Wolfowitz for making the bank &#8220;a more effective partner for development.&#8221; The bank&#8217;s 24-member board has welcomed Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s nomination but said it would accept other nominations until June 15. But bank officials dismissed the statement as a formality and predicted that the board would move smoothly toward making Mr. Zoellick president, despite reservations by some about the United States&#8217; continuing to exercise its 60-year-old prerogative of filling the job. European officials said they would not disturb the arrangement of having the American president picking the head of the bank, in part to leave intact the tradition of having Europeans pick the head of the Mr. Zoellick has been told by Treasury Secretary Henry M. Paulson Jr. and others that the bank must do more to provide concrete measures of the effects of its $23 billion in lending to poor countries, in part to assure Congress about how the money is being spent. In his remarks to reporters, Mr. Zoellick also suggested that the international community must rethink having the bank provide loans to countries like China that have access to global capital markets and possess huge foreign exchange reserves. The bank, he said, could move more into providing technical assistance to these countries. &#8220;It would have been easy to get a figurehead,&#8221; an administration official involved in the selection process said of Mr. Zoellick. &#8220;Bob&#8217;s first posture at the bank will be to listen and to travel. But he definitely brings some ideas on development. He has thought about it a lot.&#8221; Others who know Mr. Zoellick say that despite having a reputation for being a brusque and demanding executive, he is also good at setting long-term objectives and building consensus. &#8220;The World Bank, like other international organizations, needs substantial reform,&#8221; said former Secretary of State James A. Baker III , who helped bring Mr. Zoellick into government in the 1980s. &#8220;I think Bob will be a very good agent of change. It&#8217;s a huge, humongous bureaucracy. But he&#8217;s a very resourceful person.&#8221; Colleagues noted that Mr. Zoellick brought &#8220;tough love&#8221; to some of his previous jobs, most notably as United States trade representative during Mr. Bush&#8217;s first term. As trade envoy, Mr. Zoellick worked with Europeans in 2001, shortly after the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, to make the next round of global trade talks focus on helping poor countries by letting them export more farm products and industrial goods to rich countries. But he also demanded that poor countries that gained from being able to export more also commit themselves to economic reforms. &#8220;He believes in rewarding opportunity, encouraging small business and frankly reducing the power of entrenched oligarchies that thrive on closed markets and corrupt environments,&#8221; said Christopher A. Padilla, Mr. Zoellick&#8217;s chief of staff at the trade office and when he was deputy secretary of state. &#8220;That agenda was a very important component of what we were trying to achieve,&#8221; said Mr. Padilla, now an assistant secretary of commerce for export administration. &#8220;I&#8217;m confident he will bring the same agenda to the World Bank.&#8221; There are some at the World Bank, many bank officials say, who may resist a bias toward encouraging free-market economies, especially at a time when faith in that philosophy has faded in Latin America and elsewhere. But bank officials said they would welcome a new president with knowledge in this area. &#8220;A lot of people used to think that if the Democrats win the White House in 2008, we might get a new president who won&#8217;t be pursing free markets and corruption,&#8221; said one bank official, who spoke on condition of anonymity. &#8220;But most people at the bank also realize that reform is necessary.&#8221; The official added: &#8220;Sure, Zoellick is coming with an agenda. People at the bank will be focusing on whether he is going to be fixated on trade. But he&#8217;s a basic policy wonk. He&#8217;s actually a lot closer in personality to the typical bank staffer than Wolfowitz was.&#8221; More Articles in Washington &#x00bb; Need Envoy Is Bush&#8217;s Choice for World Bank Rice's Deputy Intends to Resign, Aides Say Fiorina Called Candidate for World Bank Trade Envoy Is Favorite to Lead World Bank More Articles in Washington &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: What I Think About Evolution Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Go Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Google Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity What I Think About Evolution Some Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq Go million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31ebay.html EBay Buys Search Service - Buys Search Service May 31, 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, May 30 ( ) — The Web auction leader has acquired StumbleUpon, a Web browsing recommendation site, for $75 million in cash. StumbleUpon recommends pages within sites like Flickr, MySpace or YouTube based on “thumbs up” or “thumbs down” votes from other Web users with shared interests. It has 2.3 million users and is adding more rapidly. The service helps people find Web sites, videos, products, people and other online information. Community members add more than five million recommendations a day, meaning StumbleUpon’s depth improves the more often it is used. Because StumbleUpon combines peer recommendations with search features, it offers an alternative to the Web search leader, Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (17 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Pays to Have Pals in Silicon Valley A Bold Plan To Go Where Men Have Gone Before MARKET PLACE; Are the Latest Big Deals Really a Big Deal? COMPANY NEWS; EBAY TO PURCHASE RENT.COM FOR $415 MILLION Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Computers and the Internet (17 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/smallbusiness/31sbiz.html Small Business Not as Usual - Business Not as Usual Andrew Councill for A. Little, president of B&W Solutions, a personnel management firm in Oxon Hill, Md., said dealing with the Small Business Administration was frustrating, &#147;and after a while you don&#146;t even bother asking.&#148; May 31, 2007 Hannah Kain, a small-business owner in Fremont, Calif., started her packaging services business, ALOM Technologies, in 1997 with a $250,000 loan. In 2000, her 70-employee company was singled out as an entrepreneurial success by the agency, complete with a ceremony in San Francisco. Skip to next paragraph But in 2003, when she lost a government contract to package and distribute informational CDs to military bases around the world, she didn’t bother to turn to the S.B.A. for help. “I’m not so sure about the overall competency level and the ability to follow through,” Ms. Kain said. “The best you can expect is a list of government agencies you can contact.” Her assessment reflects a growing frustration among many small-business owners with the agency. Over the last five decades, the S.B.A. has been there to propel the likes of Federal Express, , Staples and thousands of lesser-known small businesses. But advocates say recent policy changes and severe budget and staffing cuts in the last six years have left the agency unable to fulfill its mission to provide programs and services to the nation’s 25 million small companies, which the agency defines as businesses with 500 or fewer workers. Since 2001, the agency’s budget has been sliced nearly in half, to $464 million in the proposed 2008 budget. Staff cuts have been almost as deep, with the agency losing 31 percent of its work force. Nowhere has the impact of these changes been felt more than in the S.B.A.’s primary loan program for small businesses, known as 7(a). Since the 2005 fiscal year, the agency has cut funding to the program and restored an earlier, more costly fee structure for borrowers. Now a borrower pays a minimum of $2,000 in upfront fees for the smaller loans up to $150,000, a rise from $1,000 before. For larger loans up to $700,000, the fee now is 3 percent, up from 2.5 percent before. For loans above $700,000, the fee remains unchanged at 3.5 percent. Even with the higher fees, the agency says, the loans have easier credit terms and longer repayment periods than those typically available at commercial banks. But many small-business advocates say that is a moot point as many small businesses cannot even pull together the amounts to cover the fees. The S.B.A. has also proposed raising the fees in its microloan program, which can be used for construction and expansion of facilities. Together these loans totaled $20 billion in 2006, according to the S.B.A. While fees for the loans have increased, the average size of the loans under the 7(a) and microloan programs has decreased 25 percent, to $188,878 in fiscal year 2006, from $252,314 in fiscal year 2001, according to data from the S.B.A. The total number of loans has more than doubled, however. The S.B.A. said that part of the reason that the average amount of the loans has dropped is because a number of banks use a process called S.B.A. Express. For it, banks use their own documents and need less interaction with the agency. The S.B.A guarantees only 50 percent of these loans instead of the 75 percent to 85 percent on larger loans. The increased fees for the loans may have had another effect. The number of banks participating has dropped by nearly half, to 2,751 in fiscal 2006, from 5,228 in fiscal 2001, according to the National Small Business Association in Washington. The association said some of the drop may reflect bank consolidation, but fees and other changes in the 7(a) program had the biggest impact. Because of the higher fees, many entrepreneurs have turned to a growing credit card market aimed at small-business owners. A survey by the association found that the overwhelming majority of small businesses use credit cards for their financing instead of S.B.A or other bank loans — meaning that the interest rate paid can be as much as 10 percentage points more than a conventional loan. “The S.B.A. in many ways is hurting small business by increasing these fees,” said Marilyn Landis, owner of Basic Business Concepts, a small company in Pittsburgh, who relies on credit cards for most of her financing. “The decrease in the size of the loans is certainly a detriment to small companies — it’s barely enough to get a company started and certainly not enough to grow one.” Ms. Landis is vice chairwoman of the National Small Business Association. Even more than the higher fees, reduced staffing levels at the agency have had a profound effect on small business, advocates say. the List: Health Care and Pay JOB CAMP; How to Walk a Mile in Your Dream Career House Committee to Examine Recent Performance of S.B.A. HOME FRONT; Helping Small Businesses Get Bigger BUSINESS RESOURCE CENTER Marketing & Advertising &raquo; Operations & Technology &raquo; Retail & Franchising &raquo; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-JAPANTOBACCO_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=d44bd98f08d7ae35&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Canada: Japan Tobacco Unit to Face Trial - Japan Tobacco Unit to Face Trial May 31, 2007 Japan Tobacco’s Canadian unit was ordered by an Ontario judge to stand trial on charges it defrauded the Canadian government out of about a billion Canadian dollars ($931 million) in the 1990s by shipping cigarettes to the United States to avoid paying taxes. The judge, David Fairgrieve of Ontario Provincial Court, said in a 29-page ruling that prosecutors had presented enough evidence to warrant a trial of the unit, JTI-MacDonald. The company has denied any wrongdoing. dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-INDUSTRIALOU_BRF.html South Korea: Industrial Output Rises - Korea: Industrial Output Rises May 31, 2007 South Korea’s industrial output rose in April, helped by increased exports of chips and cars. Manufacturing production jumped 3.1 percent from March, the largest gain in seven months, the National Statistical Office said. Output rose 6.7 percent from a year earlier. Corporate investment in factories surged 15.6 percent in April from a year earlier, the biggest gain since September 2006, the report showed. The figures also showed an index of economic indicators climbed 5.1 percent in April from a year earlier after rising 4.9 percent in March. BUSINESS; Hyundai to Retain Chairman as Sentence Is Appealed Daewoo Motor Becomes A Bright Spot for G.M. World Business Briefing | Asia: Japan: Sharp Adding A Plant Samsung Says It Will Expand Chip Factories million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Skyline & Clouds - 2003 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31yahoo.html Yahoo Technology Chief to Leave in Wake of Company Revamping - Technology Chief to Leave in Wake of Company Revamping May 31, 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, May 30 — Farzad Nazem, ’s chief technology officer and one of its longest-serving executives, said he would leave on June 8 after 11 years at the company. Yahoo said its co-founder, Jerry Yang, would assume Mr. Nazem’s responsibilities while it searches for a replacement. The departure of Mr. Nazem, 45, who is known as Zod, will follow a turbulent year at Yahoo that included a companywide revamping. Several other senior executives, including the chief operating officer, have left in the wake of the overhaul. Yahoo would not make Mr. Nazem or any other executive available to discuss his departure. But a spokeswoman, Joanna Stevens, said that Mr. Nazem had wanted to retire and that he and the chief executive, Terry S. Semel, had been planning his departure for some time. Writing in the company’s , Mr. Nazem said, “As I began contemplating retirement, there were a few milestones that I (along with the executive leadership team) wanted to accomplish prior to my departure.” Those milestones, he wrote, included the reorganization of the company and its technology group, as well as the introduction of an advertising platform, known as Project Panama, which Yahoo began introducing in February. “It was very important to me,” Mr. Nazem said, “to drive all the way to my last day here at Yahoo without distractions of an announcement like this.” The new advertising platform is aimed at narrowing the lead of in online advertising, but it has yet to translate into financial gains for the company. Mr. Nazem, who is responsible for the operation of the Yahoo Web site and for product development, was popular among the company’s technology ranks, whom he largely helped hire. This month, Yahoo appointed Blake Jorgensen, a founder of Thomas Weisel Partners, as chief financial officer, replacing Susan L. Decker, who is switching roles to become head of the company’s advertiser and publisher group. Yahoo is looking for an executive to lead its audience group, which is responsible for much of the main company Web site. After Mr. Nazem’s departure, Yahoo is likely to have vacant positions at the top of two of its three operating units. As part of his separation agreement, Mr. Nazem will receive a lump sum equal to his base salary for the rest of the year as well as accelerated vesting of stock options and stock awards, a package that an executive compensation firm, Equilar, estimated around $6.9 million. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (10 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Aiming for Agility, Shuffles Executives Suspensions, Dismissals and Resignations (10 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Lady Liberty in Times Square - 1945 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/30/technology/31pogue.html?ex=1338177600&en=50d565b783b2c03f&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data - of the Art The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data May 30, 2007 If you’ve ever felt as though you can’t keep up with the pace of life, well, it could have been worse. You could have been a computer disk. Skip to next paragraph Backing Up Your Files The current Iomega Rev drive takes 70-gigabyte cartridges and also accepts the 35-gigabyte cartridges of the original 2004 model. The Dell PowerVault RD 1000 and an 80-gigabyte cartridge, above. The cartridge contains a complete shock-mounted hard drive. The history of removable disks is one sad “couldn’t keep up” story after another. Remember the floppy disk (800 kilobytes)? The SyQuest cartridge (44 megabytes)? The Zip disk (100 megabytes)? The Jaz disk (1 gigabyte)? The recordable DVD (4.7 gigabytes)? Each one seemed at first like a handy system for making backups and transporting files. But as computer hard drives grew, those removable disks wound up looking pathetically puny. Nowadays, it’s not unusual for a new computer to come with a 320-gigabyte hard drive. Are you really going to back it up onto 68 blank DVDs? Or 444,431 floppies? It’s been years since there was a cartridge system on every desk. But like the hip-huggers, side ponytails and other fads of the 1980s, removables are making a comeback. At least three companies — , Quantum and ProStor —now offer cartridge systems that are just as convenient and transportable as Zip disks once were, but big enough to back up a hard drive. That’s because the cartridges actually Your initial outlay is for the drive itself. Each company makes both an internal model, which is installed inside a computer, and an external one that sits on the desk and connects with a U.S.B. cable. The price is fairly high; for example, the external Rev drive from Iomega costs about $500, the external GoVault from Quantum will cost around $370 when it hits stores in July, and an external RDX drive is on special from Dell for $300. Each drive includes one starter cartridge. (ProStor doesn’t actually sell its RDX systems. Instead, it created the design for RDX drives, which are manufactured and sold interchangeably by companies like Dell, , Tandberg and Exabyte under their own names. The Dell model I tested is called the PowerVault RD 1000.) The drive itself is just a dock with electronics and power circuitry. Into this shell, you slide the interchangeable cartridges that contain your data. All three drives leave one cartridge edge exposed — the edge with the label, so you can see which cartridge is currently inserted. The edge of an RDX cartridge (not just the drive) also bears a status light, which makes life much easier if troubleshooting is ever required. Once inserted, the cartridge behaves exactly like a hard drive. You can add and remove files by dragging and dropping, or by using an automated backup program. Backup software is included with all three drives. Quantum’s superb backup program, for example, crams more onto your cartridges using “de-duplication” — storing only new sections of documents you’ve already backed up. The drives are silent and fast. On a Windows PC, copying a 1.5-gigabyte folder full of large and small files took 80 seconds on the Quantum, and 90 seconds on the Rev and RDX drives. The Quantum GoVault and RDX cartridges both come in several sizes, ranging from 40 to 160 gigabytes. It’s very cool how a single drive can accommodate cartridges of all different capacities, present and future. Iomega, on the other hand, intends to keep releasing new drives to accommodate larger-capacity cartridges. The current drive takes 70-gigabyte cartridges. It also accepts the 35-gig cartridges of its original 2004 Rev drive, but “plays” them much slower. The Quantum and RDX cartridges (both 4.5 by 3.5 by 1 inch) are incredibly rugged. They’re intended to be handled, tossed, shipped and even dropped. They can shrug off one-meter drops onto concrete — a claim my kids and I had a glorious time investigating. The RDX cartridges even have what the company calls a static-dissipation system. The tiny Rev cartridges (3 by 3 by 0.4 inch) are built differently. Whereas each Quantum and RDX cartridge is a complete, sealed, shock-mounted 2.5-inch hard drive, the Rev cartridge contains only the spinning platter and the motor; the delicate stuff, like the read-write heads (the “needle” that plays the disk) are in the drive. As a result, Rev cartridges are slightly less tough; they can handle only three-foot drops onto “industrial carpet.” Still, anyone who nervously recalls the “click of death” that occasionally haunted Iomega’s previous systems, like Zip and Jaz, should be reassured; Rev drives have been on the market since 2004 (Iomega says that it has sold over a million cartridges), and even a search fails to reveal any Jaz-like community of bereaved customers with failed cartridges. Rev is also the only product that works on both Mac and Windows, and the only one available in both U.S.B.-connector and FireWire-connector editions. These cartridge systems sound great, right? Fast, tough, capacious — what more could you ask? You’ll pay $100 for Quantum’s 40-gigabyte cartridge and $305 for a 160-gig cartridge. The RDX cartridges are priced similarly, ranging from $118 (40 gigabytes) to $270 (160 gigs). Sorry, but that’s just nuts. For a fraction of that price, you could just buy a big old hard drive. These days, a 250-gigabyte internal drive costs about $66, for heaven’s sake. Of course, the beauty of the cartridges is that they’re transportable. A proper backup system involves storing a copy of your data off site, not in your office. So a more apt comparison would be with those little pocket hard drives — external U.S.B. drives like Seagate’s FreeAgent Go or ’s Pocket Media drive. But these, too, cost less than cartridges. A 120-gigabyte pocket hard drive costs about $85 — about one-third the price of the same-size Quantum cartridge. Iomega Rev cartridges are much more reasonably priced: $270 for a five-pack, which comes to about $54 each. They’re the only reasonable option for people whose last name isn’t “Inc.” Even so, that’s 77 cents per gigabyte, compared with 71 cents for a self-contained pocket hard drive. (You don’t even want to know the Quantum and RDX cost per gigabyte. All right, maybe you do: $2.03 and $1.70, respectively. And I’m not even counting the price of the drive itself.) So what, exactly, is the value proposition here? All three companies emphatically stress that their products are not intended for everyday desktop storage. Instead, these systems are supposed to be highly reliable backup machines for businesses. They are primarily intended to replace tape backup drives, which thousands of small businesses use to back up their computers. Sure enough, compared with these cartridges, tape backup systems are unreliable, high maintenance and even more expensive. You don’t have random instant access to files — the tape literally has to rewind or fast-forward to find a certain file — and tracking and managing the tapes themselves are a headache. Well, fine. If that’s the cartridge companies’ narrowly defined mission — replacing tape backup systems for businesses — then congratulations to them; they’ve succeeded. But the technology in these systems, including their speed, convenience, silence, compactness and reliability, is terrific. If it weren’t for the nosebleed pricing, cartridge systems would find a huge and happy home among everyday computer users. Think of all the photographers, music buffs and video editors who would love to hot-swap 160-gigabyte cartridges on the fly, ready to toss in the briefcase or cram into a envelope. Think of how great it would be to create a snapshot of your entire hard drive every few days, creating a rotating cartridge system that would mean you’re always backed up and safe. Imagine a return to the heady days when cartridges were so popular and prevalent, you could stuff a Zip disk in your coat pocket, confident that you’d be able to use it at your buddy’s house. This time, at last, the disk engineers have figured out how to create cartridge capacities that keep up with the pace of life. Now we just have to get the marketing executives on board. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (12 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Hewlett-Packard Stakes a Claim as an Information Manager Equity Firm to Acquire Net Retailer Computers and the Internet (12 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Comedy Business Turns to the Web Basics: Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice Silicon Valley Wide-Eyed Over a Bride Go Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites Go million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31mcdonalds.html 3 Claims Dismissed Against McDonald&#8217;s - Claims Dismissed Against McDonald’s May 31, 2007 won dismissal yesterday of three out of five claims in a lawsuit over allergens said to be in French fries and hash browns. Judge Elaine E. Bucklo of Federal District Court in Chicago said the plaintiffs’ complaint did not give enough detail about a supposed scheme by the company to conceal the existence of gluten and dairy in its food products. Judge Bucklo allowed two claims on breach of warranty and unjust enrichment to proceed. The suit had sought to force the company to change food product information in its advertising. Lawyers for McDonald’s, which is based in Oak Brook, Ill., asked the court to throw out the lawsuit in November, referring to the plaintiffs as a few “hypersensitive consumers with allergies.” The complaint was filed by 11 people who accused McDonald’s of concealing allergens until it was forced to disclose them by a change in food-labeling laws. Colonel Is Phasing Out Trans Fat From the Menu A Fright Over Fries; California Wants to Serve a Health Warning With That Order The Food Industry Empire Strikes Back Is a Trip to McDonald's Just What the Doctor Ordered? million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Men's Denim Authentic Pigment-Dyed Box Hood Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-MORGANSTANLE_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=c26520fb8457ab46&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Morgan Stanley to Buy Real Estate Investor - Stanley to Buy Real Estate Investor May 31, 2007 has agreed to buy a real estate investor, the Investa Property Group of Australia, for 4.7 billion Australian dollars ($3.9 billion) in cash. Including debt, the offer values Australia’s biggest publicly traded owner of office buildings at 6.6 billion Australian dollars. The bid is subject to an independent expert’s report confirming that the offer is in the best interests of shareholders. Stanley to Buy Real Estate Trust Cablevision Deal Remains Very Much Up in the Air STREET SCENE; The Pressure of Great Expectations Blackstone Says It Plans To Go Public Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31tivo.html Subscriber Revenue Drives TiVo Profit Up - Revenue Drives TiVo Profit Up May 31, 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 30 ( posted a small quarterly profit on Wednesday, reversing a year-ago loss on higher revenue from subscribers to its digital video recording service. TiVo, whose service faces growing competition from set-top boxes made by cable and satellite TV providers, reported a fiscal first-quarter profit of $835,000, or 1 cent a share, in contrast to a loss of $10.7 million, or 13 cents a share, a year ago. Analysts had expected a loss of 2 cents a share, according to Reuters Estimates. The company, which is based in Alviso, Calif., makes systems that let users skip commercials and record programs on a built-in computer hard drive. It said that service and technology revenue increased to $58.1 million, from about $55 million. Net revenue rose to $60.4 million, from $56.8 million. dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Fifth Avenue From St. Regis, circa 1904 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-CLOTHINGMAKE_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=298aef0cc95d1ba8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Canada: Clothing Maker Moves Operations - Clothing Maker Moves Operations May 31, 2007 , a maker of clothing like T-shirts, tank tops and golf shirts, said it would close two sock plants in North Carolina and lay off 520 employees as part of its plan to shift production to lower-cost factories in other countries. The North Carolina factories will close by the end of August, leaving one American plant, in Hillsville, Va., for making socks. Gildan is based in Montreal. Business Briefing | Americas: Canada: T-Shirt Maker Shifts Production COMPANY NEWS; T-SHIRT MAKER SHIFTS WORK TO U.S. FROM CANADA million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31shelter.html?ex=1338264000&en=f1391cf59f465415&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Four Men, but Not Ernst & Young, Are Charged in Tax Shelter Case - Men, but Not Ernst & Young, Are Charged in Tax Shelter Case May 31, 2007 Four current and former partners of the accounting firm Ernst & Young have been charged with tax fraud conspiracy over their work on questionable tax shelters. Skip to next paragraph Text of the Indictment The firm itself was not charged. But the indictment against the four, which was announced yesterday, did not mean that Ernst & Young, which has been under investigation since 2004, was entirely off the hook in a widening criminal investigation of the web of banks, accounting firms, law firms and investment boutiques that promoted questionable shelters. Those shelters have turned out to be bogus in the eyes of the , and prosecutors contend that they were shams or frauds that deprived the government of billions of dollars in tax revenue from the late 1990s through recent years. Federal prosecutors in Manhattan said yesterday that their investigation was continuing. The four Ernst & Young employees — Robert Coplan, who is also a former I.R.S. official, Richard Shapiro, Martin Nissenbaum and Brian Vaughan — were indicted by a federal grand jury in Manhattan on eight charges including conspiracy to defraud the I.R.S., tax evasion, making false statements to the I.R.S., and impeding and impairing the lawful functioning of the I.R.S. from 1998 through 2004. James Tucker, a lawyer for Mr. Vaughan, declined to comment yesterday. A lawyer for Mr. Nissenbaum said yesterday in a statement that his client had entered a plea of not guilty and “did not engage in any unlawful activity.” Jack Tigue, a lawyer for Mr. Shapiro, could not be reached for immediate comment. Lawyers for the other men did not return calls for comment. If convicted, each faces as much as 18 years in prison. The charges come nearly four years after Ernst & Young reached a settlement with the I.R.S., paying a $15 million penalty to resolve a civil investigation into the firm over its design and sales of questionable shelters. The civil settlement, however, did not prevent Ernst & Young from a criminal investigation less than one year later, as federal scrutiny of a rival accounting firm, KPMG, intensified, and as prosecutors made progress in teasing out the links between the web of firms that promoted tax shelters. But the 2003 settlement may make a criminal case against the firm more difficult. “Once you’ve got a civil settlement and a closing agreement with the I.R.S., it’s pretty hard for the Southern District to go back and get the firm — that bar makes it pretty hard,” argued a senior tax lawyer involved in the wider tax shelter investigation, referring to the federal Southern District of New York. Ernst & Young could still ultimately reach a deal that does not involve charges, but an acknowledgment of wrongdoing. KPMG reached a $456 million deferred-prosecution agreement with the Justice Department in 2005, as a condition of not being indicted — a near-certain corporate death sentence. Sixteen former KPMG employees, plus an outside lawyer and investment adviser, are set to stand trial at an undetermined date over their tax shelter work. Yesterday’s developments suggest that federal prosecutors are more likely to focus on individuals rather than firms in the tax shelter investigation. Robert Bennett, a lawyer for KPMG who persuaded the Justice Department not to indict the firm in 2005, said yesterday that “there’s a movement away from a knee-jerk reaction to impose vicarious liability on companies.” The indictment accuses the four Ernst & Young men of lying to the I.R.S. in the summer of 2002 during the audit of their employer that resulted in the $15 million penalty. “After being placed under oath, they sought to obstruct and impede the I.R.S. by providing false and misleading testimony concerning the origin, design, marketing and implementation of E.& Y.’s tax shelters,” the indictment said. In a statement yesterday, Ernst & Young said the four “were part of a small group within the firm, disbanded years ago, that was responsible for developing the transactions in question. None of the individuals was part of the firm’s management. ” It added that “Ernst & Young has cooperated with the government from the beginning of its investigation. We have voluntarily made many changes and enhancements to our tax practice. We have also made other changes to our tax practice pursuant to our 2003 agreement with the I.R.S., which the I.R.S. commissioner called a model for agreements with practitioners.” - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31photo.html?ex=1338264000&en=a35cf39cf63262f3&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss A Unit of News Corp. Agrees to Buy Photobucket and Flektor - Unit of News Corp. Agrees to Buy Photobucket and Flektor THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 Fox Interactive Media, a unit of the , has agreed to acquire the photo-storage site Photobucket, just weeks after a public spat in which the popular networking site MySpace partly blocked content from Photobucket. MySpace, which is also owned by the News Corporation, lifted the block after about two weeks, but both sides have been silent on the details of their peacemaking. Separately, Fox also agreed to buy Flektor Inc., which offers Web-based tools for creating slide shows, recombined videos and other interactive presentations. Financial terms of the two deals were not disclosed. MySpace users often embed third-party photos, video and other material in their personal profile pages, and sites like Photobucket and YouTube, ’s video-sharing site, make that easy by providing the programming code to cut and paste into MySpace pages. The practice has made Photobucket one of the leading sites on the Internet, even though relatively few users access content directly through its home page. MySpace blocked Photobucket in April, after complaining that the hosting service had been encouraging users to incorporate an ad-supported slide show into their MySpace profiles. MySpace said the slide show violated its policies banning unauthorized commercial activity. Photobucket’s chief executive, Alex Welch, responded by accusing MySpace of limiting free expression and treating users as a commodity. He was more conciliatory two weeks later, saying the two had “established open lines of communication and procedures,” but he made no mention of negotiations over a sale of his company. MEDIA BUSINESS; Murdoch Plan Under Scrutiny THE MEDIA BUSINESS; A Texas Newspaper For Hearst COMPANY NEWS; Stake Purchased In Reiss Media THE MEDIA BUSINESS; News Corp. To Sell Stake Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31device.html?ex=1338264000&en=f9f06d1c7e9a37b8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Palm to Sell Device That Won&#8217;t Fit in the Palm - to Sell Device That Won&#8217;t Fit in the Palm May 31, 2007 CARLSBAD, Calif., May 30 &#151; Fifteen years after pioneering personal computers that nestled comfortably in a user&#8217;s hand, reversed itself Wednesday and said that it would begin selling a two-handed laptop-size machine called the Foleo. The 2.5-pound &#8220;appliance&#8221; comes with a 10-inch screen and is meant to be a companion for a smartphone, according to one of Palm&#8217;s founders, Jeff Hawkins, who introduced the machine here at the D: All Things Digital technology industry conference. The Foleo, which will be priced starting at $499, synchronizes information with Palm and Windows Mobile phones and can be linked wirelessly via phones to the Internet, although it comes with During a demonstration, Mr. Hawkins acknowledged the limitations of smartphones, which have been viewed as a lighter, less expensive alternative to carrying a portable laptop computer. &#8220;Sometimes you need a big screen,&#8221; Mr. Hawkins said. He said he had struck on the idea of a mobile companion for the phone five years ago, but that his business partners Donna Dubinsky and Ed Colligan had resisted the project as a distraction while the company introduced the popular The Foleo, which will go on sale this summer, is based on the Linux operating system. But it does not have a broad range of applications. For example, while Mr. Hawkins demonstrated the ability to synchronize e-mail automatically with a smartphone, synchronizing with a datebook was not a feature. The notion of an inch-thick device that is sold as a peripheral to a phone generated some skepticism. But several analysts saidt the phone might get a following of Linux enthusiasts. &#8220;This could become the first commercially viable portable Linux system,&#8221; said Tim Bajarin, an industry analyst at Creative Strategies, a consulting firm based in Campbell, Calif. The Foleo is the latest in a series of industry efforts to define a new category between cellphones and laptops. has tried to create interest in devices it calls ultra-mobile PCs, and has been encouraging developers to introduce systems it describes as mobile Internet devices. Several smaller start-up companies like Oqo, based in San Francisco, have also been offering hand-held systems that have most of the features of standard laptops, but fit comfortably in jacket pockets. This year&#8217;s conference also included an interview with . Mr. Jobs said his company would soon be focused on three business &#151; computers, digital music, and cellular telephone handsets &#151; and &#8220;a hobby,&#8221; the company&#8217;s recently introduced Apple TV peripheral. He called the device an experiment and said it would soon make it possible to download videos from the YouTube site of onto a home TV. He described efforts by PC and consumer electronics companies and others to replace the cable set-top box as failures. Apple has recently reset its strategy and is going to try to shape Apple TV as something other than a conduit for television. &#8220;We want to be the DVD player for the Internet age,&#8221; he said. Mr. Jobs also said that more than two hundred million copies of the Apple iTunes software had been downloaded, with most of them running on Windows-based personal computers. He did not let that fact pass without taking a not-so-subtle jab at his long-time competitor, , Microsoft&#8217;s founder: Offering iTunes software to Windows users was like &#8220;offering a glass of water to someone in hell,&#8221; Mr. Jobs said. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (11 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Responds to the iPhone Cellular Carriers Offer Phone With E-Mail but Less Bulk SATURDAY INTERVIEW -- With Ed Colligan; Hand-Helds And Palm: What's Next? CIRCUITS; Palm Returns, In Both Plain And Less Plain Computers and the Internet New Models, Design and Products (11 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Comedy Business Turns to the Web Basics: Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice Silicon Valley Wide-Eyed Over a Bride Go Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites Go million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31novell.html Novell Posts Loss After Trimming Jobs - Posts Loss After Trimming Jobs May 31, 2007 , which sells networking software and computer consulting services, reported a second-quarter loss after the company cut jobs to compensate for declining sales. The loss was $2.19 million, or 1 cent a share, in contrast to a profit of $3.34 million, or 1 cent, a year earlier, Novell, based in Waltham, Mass., said yesterday in a statement. Sales rose 2.6 percent, to $239.2 million, in the period that ended April 30. The company is spending as much as $45 million to cut jobs and expenses in a bid to increase profit. The company’s newer Linux operating system programs have not grown enough to offset declining sales of older products. The company said that sales for the year would be $925 million to $955 million, below the $957 million average of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg. Shares of Novell, which have risen 19 percent this year, fell 10 cents, to $7.36. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (18 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Novell to Eliminate 16% of Work Force Novell, Once Foundering, Finds a Way to Coexist With Microsoft Novell to Cut Its Work Force; Software Maker Posts Deficit Novell to Cut 50 Positions Layoffs and Job Reductions (18 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands George Washington Bronze Portrait Bust Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31place.html?ex=1338264000&en=926c01b0b05c6ea5&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Manufacturer of Risky Drug to Sell Shares - of Risky Drug to Sell Shares May 31, 2007 Is a pharmaceutical company whose biggest-selling drug is considered as dangerous as heroin or LSD a good investment? Jazz Pharmaceuticals &#151; along with the private equity firm Kohlberg Kravis Roberts &#38; Company and some of Wall Street&#8217;s most prestigious investment banks &#151; is hoping investors think so. Jazz, based in Palo Alto, Calif., has filed to sell as much as $180 million in stock as early as today in its first public offering. Jazz&#8217;s main product is gamma hydroxybutyrate, or GHB, a fast-acting with a history of use in date rape and serious risks of overdose, including coma and death. Jazz sells it under the brand name Xyrem to treat narcolepsy, a serious lists GHB as a Schedule I drug, the most dangerous kind, in the same category as heroin. But the Food and Drug Administration has approved Xyrem for narcolepsy, and when dispensed by prescription Xyrem can be used legally. Because of its risks, Xyrem can be distributed only under very strict rules. And the marketing of the drug by Jazz is the subject of a federal criminal case in Brooklyn that has already resulted in one felony guilty plea by a former Jazz employee. The narcolepsy market is small, estimated at only 120,000 patients, and sales of Xyrem were just $29 million in 2006. As for Jazz, it lost $82 million last year and has lost almost $200 million since it was founded in 2003. Auditors have warned that the losses raise &#8220;substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern,&#8221; according to the offering prospectus Jazz filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In plain English, Jazz &#151; which had $67 million in cash as of March 31 &#151; is running out of money. And if it does not get more, it could go broke as early as the end of this year. Jazz is hoping to solve that problem, at least temporarily, by selling as much as 6.9 million shares to the public at $24 to $26 a share. The offering, which values Jazz at about $600 million, could be completed as early as this morning, with shares sold to institutional or individual buyers who can resell them when Jazz begins trading later in the day. (which is also an investor in Jazz) and are leading the deal. Aside from Jazz itself, the biggest winner in the public offering would be Kohlberg Kravis and other private equity firms. Since 2003, they have sunk $265 million into Jazz. If the company cannot go public, they will have to choose between putting more money up or potentially losing their entire investments. Matthew K. Fust, Jazz&#8217;s chief financial officer, declined to comment about the offering or Jazz. A spokeswoman for Kohlberg said the firm could not comment because the offering is imminent. Securities and Exchange Commission rules discourage companies from discussing their prospects in advance of a public offering. Jazz hopes to expand Xyrem&#8217;s potential market vastly by winning approval from the F.D.A. to promote it for fibromyalgia, a vague and poorly understood pain disorder with symptoms that are often treated with antidepressants. Jazz is conducting two late-stage clinical trials to prove that Xyrem reduces the pain of fibromyalgia, with results expected in the one trial in the second half of 2008. In an earlier trial, about 30 percent of the people who took Xyrem reported improvement in their fibromyalgia symptoms, compared with 13 percent on a placebo. Whether that figure will be enough to persuade the F.D.A. to approve Xyrem &#151; whose label warns that abuse of GHB can cause &#8220;seizure, respiratory depression and profound decreases in level of consciousness&#8221; &#151; is not clear. Much bigger drug companies, including , are also researching fibromyalgia treatments and have medicines further along in development. Jazz, meanwhile, is still under a cloud in a criminal case in Brooklyn involving the way it promoted Xyrem to doctors. Last year, federal prosecutors charged Dr. Peter Gleason, a psychiatrist, with working illegally with Jazz to encourage doctors to use Xyrem to treat fibromyalgia and other diseases for which Xyrem has not been approved, so-called off-label uses. The case has raised debate about free speech and how tightly the government may regulate discussions by doctors with one another. Under F.D.A. rules, doctors may prescribe drugs for any condition they see fit, but pharmaceutical companies are not allowed to promote drugs for off-label uses. Dr. Gleason is fighting the charges. But in March, David Tucker, a former sales manager for Jazz who worked with Dr. Gleason, pleaded guilty to a single felony count of introducing a misbranded drug into interstate commerce. Mr. Tucker has not been sentenced, but the charge carries a maximum sentence of up to three years in prison, according to Bruce Maloy, Mr. Tucker&#8217;s lawyer. Geoffrey Kaiser, the prosecutor handling the case, said he could not comment. In its prospectus, Jazz says it is close to settling the case by pleading guilty to the same felony charge as Mr. Tucker and paying $20.5 million in civil and criminal fines and restitution. With all the clouds over Xyrem, potential investors in Jazz may be pleased to know that it does sell another drug, Antizol, used to treat people who have been poisoned by antifreeze. Unfortunately &#151; or fortunately, perhaps &#151; Antizol&#8217;s market is even smaller than Xyrem&#8217;s. Antizol had sales of $2.6 million in the first three months of 2007. of Doctor Tests Drug Marketing Rules Drug Company With No Products Raises $250 Million POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31google.html Moving Web-Based Software Offline - Web-Based Software Offline May 31, 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, May 30 — Millions of people enjoy free Web-based software programs that deliver e-mail, news and many other services. But those programs are available to users only when they are online. Skip to next paragraph Google&#146;s chief executive, Eric Schmidt, speaking at the Seoul Digital Forum Wednesday. He said Google wanted to expand in South Korea. is hoping to help make many of those programs, among them its own free Web applications like Gmail and Docs and Spreadsheets, available offline, say when a user is on an airplane. In doing so, Google will more openly challenge and its office productivity tools, like Excel and Word, which users must buy for hundreds of dollars. That rivalry was heightened Wednesday when Google released a set of tools to software programmers, which it calls Google Gears, that addresses what is perhaps the single most critical shortcoming of Web-based software. The tools can be used by all programmers, whether they work for Google or not, to enhance their own Web-based programs for offline use. The company is making the technology available in an open-source model, so programmers can use it free, test its abilities and extend them as necessary to fit their needs. “The whole idea of extending browser capabilities to offline is something that a lot of people are going to get pretty excited about,” said David Mitchell Smith, a vice president at Gartner Research. Google is introducing Gears during a coming-out party of sorts. The company is playing host to what it calls its first “developer day,” an event held around the world at which Google will present itself not as the world’s most-used search engine, or as the biggest Internet advertising company, or even as the creator of applications like Gmail, but rather as the provider of tools that others can use to build their own programs. It is an event that underscores Google’s evolution from its roots as a search engine into a company that hopes to become central to a new way of computing in which software is delivered over the Web, often free and supported by ads, rather than bought and installed on users’ PCs. This evolution sharpens Google’s rivalry with Microsoft and others who are trying to provide both new Web-based software and technology building blocks for Web programmers. Google has been among the most enthusiastic proponents of this new computing model, and its executives say it will help usher in faster innovation because many Web applications can be created quickly by cobbling together existing components created by others. “It is a different model,” Google’s chief executive, Eric Schmidt, said in an interview. “The rate at which you can build applications is an order of magnitude faster because the components all fit together so quickly.” Google hopes other companies will use Gears to extend their own software and services. Some Microsoft rivals, including and Mozilla, which is behind the Firefox Web browser, are collaborating with Google on the technology. But it could also help Google’s rivals. If the Gears technology proves effective, scores of software programs, including Mail and Microsoft’s Hotmail, might one day be used offline to read e-mail messages and to compose new ones. The new e-mail messages would be sent the next time a user connects to the Internet. Google said Gears was in early stages of development. “This is not a solution that is going to work with everything on Day 1,” Mr. Smith said. For now, Google itself has applied Gears only to one of its own programs, Reader, which is used to track blogs and news sources. But the company plans to use Gears to make other programs like Gmail, Calendar, and most notably, Docs and Spreadsheets, available offline. That would make those programs more competitive with Microsoft’s Office suite of programs, one of the software giant’s cash cows. Google has begun marketing a package of these productivity applications to businesses. But many analysts say these products, unlike Microsoft’s competing software, lack the support or functions that most businesses need. “I don’t think Google is a serious player in personal productivity applications, certainly not for businesses,” said David Card, an analyst with Jupiter Research. This is not the first time that Google has offered tools to developers. Indeed, the company, much like many of its competitors in recent years, has long opened up many of its own programs to others, in hopes they would use them as building blocks for their own software and services. For instance, when Google allowed others to build map-based software and services on top of its Google Maps product, an explosion of creativity ensued. Online travel and real estate companies used the maps to enhance their own Web sites or to create entirely new businesses. And even individual programmers used data from multiple sources to “mash up” new applications. Some of these companies and Web sites, in turn, are supported by advertising that is sold by Google. Microsoft and Yahoo have opened up their own map products to developers with similar results. In putting on its first developer day, Google hopes to lure even more programmers into its camp at a time when many Internet companies are competing for their skills by offering them new tools aimed at making Web programs more capable or easy to assemble. Microsoft, for instance, recently released a product called Silverlight, which allows programmers to deliver high-quality video and other features to Web applications. “We see an emerging market that combines what people love about the Web with richness and interactivity of full desktop application,” said Brian Goldfarb, senior product manager for Silverlight. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (3 of 22) &#x00bb; Need BY LINK; Firefox and the Anxiety of Growing Pains Out of Chaos, Order. Or So Google Says. WHAT'S ONLINE; Apple Cult Becoming a Religion Searching for Michael Jordan? Microsoft Wants a Better Way Computers and the Internet (3 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Kutenai Duck Hunter - 1910 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31deal.html Ceridian to Be Taken Private in $5.3 Billion Deal - to Be Taken Private in $5.3 Billion Deal May 31, 2007 , a human resources company, said last night that it had sold itself to the private equity firm Thomas H. Lee Partners and the specialty insurer for $5.3 billion in cash. The deal values Ceridian at $36 a share, a 5.3 percent premium to its closing price of $34.19 yesterday. In after-hours trading, Ceridian rose $1.41, or 4 percent, to $35.60. Ceridian and its buyers noted, however, that Ceridian was trading at around $31 before Feb. 17, when the company announced that it was putting itself up for sale. The deal represents a 16 percent premium over that price, and a 56 percent premium to Ceridian&#8217;s price on Oct. 6, the day before Ceridian announced Kathryn V. Marinello&#8217;s appointment as chief executive. Last year, Ceridian reported earnings of $174 million, or $1.20 a share, so the merger values the company at 30 times its trailing earnings, compared with about 18 times earnings for the average company in the Standard &#38; Poor&#8217;s 500-stock index. Ceridian&#8217;s human resource division offers payroll, tax and benefits services to 110,000 companies, with a combined 25 million employees, in 38 countries. The company also processes payments and issues credit and stored-value cards for the trucking and retail industries. In a statement announcing the deal, Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity said they planned to bring other investors into the transaction. Fidelity will own less than 50 percent of Ceridian at closing and for accounting purposes will not consolidate Ceridian&#8217;s results into its income statement. The transaction will be presented to Ceridian shareholders for approval at the company&#8217;s annual meeting, after the filing of proxy materials with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Ceridian said it would hold its annual meeting no later than Sept. 21. Ceridian and the buyers said they expected that the purchase would close by the end of the year. is serving as financial adviser to Ceridian, and Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen &#38; Katz is serving as legal adviser. Securities acted as financial adviser to Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity; Deutsche Bank and will finance the deal. Weil, Gotshal &#38; Manges is acting as legal adviser for Thomas H. Lee and Fidelity. NEWS; CERIDIAN TO SEPARATE INTO TWO COMPANIES BY YEAR-END THE MARKETS: Market Place; Wild Ascent Of a Small-Cap Stock, Perhaps By Mistake COMPANY NEWS; CERIDIAN AGREES TO BUY ABR INFORMATION SERVICES COMPANY NEWS; CERIDIAN TO BUY LIFEWORKS, A RIVAL IN EMPLOYEE SERVICES Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Lee, Thomas H, Partners Fidelity National Financial Incorporated million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Hindenburg Explodes In Lakehurst, NJ - May 6 - 1937 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31digital.html For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce - Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Bill Gates and Steven P. Jobs in a rare joint appearance at a technology conference in Carlsbad, Calif. May 31, 2007 CARLSBAD, Calif., May 30 — In a highly anticipated encounter, Bill Gates of Microsoft and Steven P. Jobs of Apple took the stage Wednesday evening to relive old battles and alliances and speculate about the future of digital culture and technology. Rivals for three decades, the two executives have rarely appeared in public together and have generally been viewed as bitter rivals, despite occasional partnerships. In front of about 600 technology executives at the D: All Things Digital conference, which was sponsored by The Wall Street Journal, the two executives attracted the attention usually reserved for rock singers and Hollywood stars. However, attendees who came hoping for fireworks or a confrontation were disappointed. The mild tone to the session did not take anything away from the event and after discussing the past and present of the computing industry, the two were greeted with a standing ovation. After the event was over a number of the attendees who are veterans of decades in the computer industry said the joint appearance was the most memorable moment of any of the many conferences they had attended. Mr. Gates and Mr. Jobs largely pioneered the personal computer industry beginning in 1975 and 1976 and they spent part of the evening sharing memories of those days. Today "we ship these computers with one or two gigabytes and nobody remembers 128 kilobytes," Mr. Jobs said. Apple and Microsoft were business partners at the start of the computer era beginning in 1977 when Mr. Gates supplied a copy of the BASIC programming language for the Apple II computer. Later, Mr. Gates made an early bet on writing software for the Macintosh, two years before the computer was introduced in 1984. Neither was willing to acknowledge the possibility that the personal computer era they helped create would end any time soon. "The PC has proven to be very resilient," Mr. Jobs said. At the same time they called themselves believers in the explosion of hand-held communications devices, also known as "Post PC devices." Mr. Gates said he was sometimes frustrated by the fact that the players in the industry changed so quickly. "I miss it when people come and go. It's nice when people stick around and it gives us some context," he said. During a question and answer period at the end of the session both men were asked to comment on the other's strengths. Mr. Gates singled out Mr. Jobs intuitive aesthetic sense. "I'd give a lot to have Steve's taste," Mr. Gates said, drawing laughter from the audience. "The way he does things, it's just different." Mr. Jobs returned the compliment, noting that Mr. Gates skills at building business partnerships were something that eluded him in his first decade at Apple. Asked to comment on today's computer industry and the youth culture that it markets to, both men pointed to examples of applications of computer technology that had been readily adopted by seniors. Mr. Gates said that when he showed the Microsoft Surface, the touch computing system introduced on Wednesday to a group of chief executives at his home several weeks ago, he was surprised they were more enthusiastic about the product than he was. The executives, he noted came from a generation that was not comfortable with keyboards. They were particularly interested in a technology that allowed them to control things on a display screen by pointing and moving them directly with their fingers. Neither man was willing to say harsh things about the other and Mr. Jobs summed up his feelings by quoting from a Beatles song: "&#61486;'You and I have memories longer than the road that stretches out ahead,' that's clearly true here," he said. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (4 of 22) &#x00bb; Need SUITS; Most-Admired C.E.O. Is Not an Oxymoron Gates vs. Jobs: The Rematch THEATER: THIS WEEK; The 'Bomb-itty' Team Sends in the Nerds TV WEEKEND; A Couple of Nerds Trying to Take Over the World (4 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Towers in the Fog - 1992 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31adco.html?ex=1338264000&en=735b9e7eb7306b76&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss About Online Surveys, Traditional Pollsters Are: (C) Somewhat Disappointed - Online Surveys, Traditional Pollsters Are: (C) Somewhat Disappointed May 31, 2007 PARIS, May 27 — To traditional pollsters, a random survey adjusted to reflect the general population is the only way to measure public opinion properly. First developed in the 1940s by George Gallup, the father of modern polling, random sampling requires hours of costly legwork by an army of specially trained pollsters. But some survey companies that offer an Internet-based alternative to traditional polls are trying to make inroads, including a British one, YouGov, which plans to introduce its methods in the United States for the next presidential election. Working with a large panel of respondents who answer a range of questions through an online questionnaire, YouGov says it can predict election outcomes and consumer preferences with greater accuracy for far less money than ever before. To reflect a broad spectrum of opinion, the online panelists are recruited from all walks of life, and efforts are made to reach out to people who are less likely to be online, like the elderly and people with low incomes. Panelists are paid to participate — which is a big no-no in conventional polling — and their identities are validated by their home addresses and other personal details. To be sure, traditional pollsters and political consultants do not view online surveys as scientifically acceptable. The sampling of consumer opinion tapped through an online questionnaire cannot be as random as traditional measures, they argue, and it is easier for people to misrepresent themselves and their opinions online. Another critical difference is that in traditional polls, participation is voluntary, not paid. “Voter polling by the Internet is not yet viable,” said Joel Benenson, a Democratic pollster working for the presidential campaign of Senator of Illinois. “There are some uses for online polling, but it still misses out on too much of the population for us.” Despite the strong skepticism, Internet-based survey results are likely to get some publicity during the 2008 elections, and executives from companies that conduct these surveys hope that they can use the attention to gain credibility for their methods. YouGov, for example, has formed a partnership with Polimetrix, an online survey company based in Palo Alto, Calif., for surveys in the United States. Polimetrix, with a panel of one million people, plans to track the 2008 presidential election with a 50-state survey covering a minimum of 1,000 panelists in each state. “State-by-state election results are an important way for us to prove that our methodology delivers accurate results,” said Douglas Rivers, a political science professor who founded Polimetrix in 2004. “You can be lucky once, but not 50 times.” Professor Rivers said that the margin of error for Polimetrix surveys is similar to that of polls conducted by telephone. YouGov said that its own results in recent British elections were as close or closer to the actual votes than traditional polling methods. Mr. Benenson of the Obama campaign said that the Internet can be an effective way to test ad campaigns for specific populations, but that the variables are too great for judging the views of the general population. Polls on which public policy decisions are based still require walking the streets, said Leendert de Voogd, managing director of TNS Opinion in Brussels, one of the world’s largest polling companies. “It is still way too early for public opinion polling to go online,” Mr. de Voogd said. “Internet polling is like the Far West, with no rules, no sheriff and no reference points.” Among the surveys run by TNS Opinion is Eurobarometer, a survey of public opinion across Europe conducted for the “The decisions made on the basis of our polls are far too important to be left to an online survey,” Mr. de Voogd said. “Online polls can miss very important parts of the population.” For YouGov, developing a balanced panel of regular respondents from all sectors of the population is a priority, said Nadhim Zahawi, YouGov’s chief executive. “We expend a lot of effort reaching older people and other demographics” of people who are less likely to use the Internet, he said. Mr. Zahawi added that modern technology has made old-fashioned polls more cumbersome and unreliable. “Thanks to the increased use of mobile phones, the traditional pollsters face a growing problem of how to track down people at home,” he said. In London, The Daily Telegraph, which uses YouGov’s services roughly twice a month, appreciates the ability to query a large number of people in a short time. Control Of Electric Bill, Hour by Hour Despite Steps, Disaster Planning Still Shows Gaps Through His Webcam, a Boy Joins a Sordid Online World Young, Assured and Playing Pharmacist to Friends Computers and the Internet POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31phone.html Motorola Says It Will Eliminate 4,000 More Jobs - Says It Will Eliminate 4,000 More Jobs THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 CHICAGO, May 30 (AP) &#151; said Wednesday that it would cut another 4,000 jobs, or more than 6 percent of its shrinking work force, as part of a plan to improve sagging financial and operational results. With the latest round of cuts, the company has announced plans to eliminate more than 10 percent of its work force since the start of 2007, when it became clear that two years of strong momentum behind the popular Razr mobile phone had collapsed. The company&#8217;s travails caused it to be the target of a proxy fight this year by the billionaire investor , who lost his bid this month for a board seat. Motorola said Wednesday that Mr. Icahn had received 717.1 million votes, compared with 931.7 million for John A. White, the company nominee he was closest to defeating. All other Motorola nominees got at least 1.6 billion votes. The company had been in the process of eliminating 3,500 jobs as part of a two-year cost-cutting plan to save $400 million. Motorola said the newly announced cuts, together with other cost-control measures, would save another $600 million in 2008. Motorola&#8217;s work force, which stood at 150,000 worldwide as recently as 2000, had declined to 66,000 at the beginning of the year. Wall Street gave modest approval to the latest cuts. Motorola shares rose 17 cents in after-hours trading after closing the regular session down 2 cents, at $18.28. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (15 of 22) &#x00bb; Need Plans to Cut 5% of Work Force At A.M.D., A Quiet Doer Gets His Due Technology Briefing | Hardware: Motorola To Cut 1,000 Jobs Worldwide Technology Briefing | Hardware: Motorola Lowers Growth Predictions Layoffs and Job Reductions (15 of 22) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31scene.html?ex=1338264000&en=8345e60ee2c55235&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Copyrights That No One Knows About Don&#8217;t Help Anyone - That No One Knows About Don’t Help Anyone May 31, 2007 Here’s a quiz question for authors: To copyright a written work in the United States, you must (a) register it with the Copyright Office; (b) insert a notice that says “Copyright © 2007”; (c) insert a notice that says “All rights reserved.” Answer: none of the above. Under current law, a work is automatically copyrighted the moment it is “fixed in tangible form.” And these days, that copyright lasts virtually forever: 70 years after the death of the author, in most cases. Since there is no requirement to register a work and a copyright lasts so long, the legal owner of a work can be difficult to find, particularly when the work is more than a few decades old. When some librarians at tried to request permissions to digitize a collection of out-of-print books, they were unable to find more than 20 percent of the rights holders, despite persistent efforts. Failing to locate rights holders can be costly since copyright infringement may be subject to statutory damages of up to $150,000 an incident. The costs of locating rights holders are an example of what economists call transactions costs. Not surprisingly, high transactions costs tend to discourage transactions from occurring. The so-called orphan works problem was examined by the Copyright Office in a 2006 report in which it proposed legislation to address the transactions costs issues. Under its proposal, if you conducted a “diligent search” to locate a rights holder and still failed to find the owner, you would be off the hook. You could then incorporate the work in question into your own work, as long as you provided proper attribution. If the legitimate rights holder was subsequently found, he or she could not require that your work be withdrawn from circulation, but could collect “reasonable compensation” for use. But what is a “diligent search?” The report leaves the interpretation of this phrase up to the courts but suggests some relevant considerations: whether the work includes identification, the age of the work, whether the work can be found in public databases like Copyright Office records, and so on. The Copyright Office’s proposal is certainly a step in the right direction. Clarifying the rights and obligations of the buyers and sellers of copyrighted material would reduce transactions costs, and that should lead to a more efficient market for intellectual property. But does the proposed legislation go far enough? According to Law professor who is an expert in copyright law, it does not. He favors a system where authors receive an automatic copyright when they create new works, but they must register their copyright within 14 years to retain it past the initial period. (Unfortunately, such a registration requirement cannot apply to foreign creators because of international copyright treaties.) This is in the same spirit as the copyright law in place before 1964 requiring that copyrights be renewed at the Copyright Office in their 28th year. Materials that weren’t renewed fell into the public domain. Mr. Lessig envisions the Copyright Office as specifying the standards for registries but not necessarily operating them, since the private sector may be better positioned to build and maintain such systems. His inspiration is the domain name system used to register Internet sites. In that system, a standards body specifies the design, but it is up to individual organizations to carry out the necessary registries. The proposals by the Copyright Office and Mr. Lessig are not necessarily exclusive. If easily accessible copyright registries existed, the courts would probably find that simply searching the registries would satisfy the diligent search requirement. Creators of works with commercial potential would then have strong incentives to register their works. In such a world, a legal requirement to register works could be redundant, since the commercial incentives to register would be strong. Still, why take a chance? Establishing the expectations that works should be registered to receive the full protection of copyright law makes a lot of sense. Creating a registry is not that difficult from either a technological or a business perspective. The Copyright Clearance Center ( ) was established by a group of publishers in 1978 to provide rights clearance for printed works. The Harry Fox Agency ( ) serves as a clearinghouse for those who want to make recordings of songs, and there are plenty of Web sites devoted to image search to ease the sharing of photographs. But would the creators charge excessive fees if rights clearinghouses became widespread? I would argue that just the opposite would occur. An easy-to-use, efficient and competitive marketplace tends to push prices down. Reducing the transactions costs of acquiring reproduction rights potentially makes both creators and users of information better off. The orphan works legislation from the Copyright Office is still on the back burner in Congress. Let us hope that it soon gets the attention it deserves. Information plays a crucial role in today’s economy. Making it easy for creators and users of information to find each other should be a high priority for policy makers. Hal R. Varian is a professor of business, economics and information management at the University of California, Berkeley. Trip By Paulson Lifts Stakes Apple Gets French Support In Music Compatibility Case Skin Deep; Is a Scent Like a Song? Oui and Non Paris Approves Law Aimed at Making iTunes Compatible With Rival Devices POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-QATARAIRWAYS_BRF.html France: Qatar Airways Raises Airbus Order - Qatar Airways Raises Airbus Order THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 Qatar Airways ordered 20 more Airbus A350s to become the largest customer for the wide-body jet, with a total order of 80 planes worth a listed price of $16 billion. Louis Gallois, chief executive of Airbus, said it was one of Airbus’s biggest orders ever. The Qatar Airways agreement for 20 A350-800s, 40 A350-900s and 20 A350-1000s, as with most large orders, would probably come with deep discounts from the listing price. The agreement replaces one for 60 A350s signed in 2005. The commitment for 20 extra planes brings Airbus’s total orders for the A350 to 268. Business Briefing | Europe: Russia: Aeroflot to Buy Airbus Planes Airbus Chief Says Order Ensures Jet Will Be Built million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/worldbusiness/31fobriefs-EXECUTIVEISL_BRF.html?ex=1338264000&en=e38e996e62add665&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Britain: Executive Is Leaving BP - Executive Is Leaving BP THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: May 31, 2007 , the British oil company, said the chief executive of its refining and marketing operations is leaving to run of Canada. The executive, John Manzoni, had been passed over for the chief executive’s position at BP when Tony Hayward was named to the job this month. Mr. Manzoni will become president and chief executive of Talisman. He will be succeeded at BP by a fellow executive, Iain Conn, BP said. Mr. Manzoni was criticized for his handling of safety management after an explosion killed 15 workers at a BP refinery in Texas in March 2005. New Chief, BP's Problems Range From Rusted Pipes to a Tarnished Image BP's Chief Quits Over Revelations About Private Life Chief's Bonus Is Cut at BP; Safety Issues Cited as Factor INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS; BP's Quarterly Profit Falls to 2-Year Low Suspensions, Dismissals and Resignations million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/media/31martha.html?ex=1338264000&en=14b3480ddc610b09&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Settlement for Martha Stewart Investors - for Martha Stewart Investors May 31, 2007 A federal judge has approved a class-action settlement that requires Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia and its founder to pay shareholders $30 million in compensation for losses suffered during the trading scandal, lawyers said yesterday. was convicted by a Manhattan federal court jury in March 2004 of lying to investigators looking into her sale of shares of ImClone Systems. She served five months in prison and five more months of house arrest. The shareholders accused executives of Omnimedia, a media and merchandising company, of misleading investors by making false statements related to the government inquiry into Ms. Stewart’s suspicious stock trading. The lawsuit contended that stockholders lost money because of the scandal. The pact requires that Ms. Stewart pay $5 million of the total settlement, according to the law firm Milberg Weiss & Bershad, which represented the investors. The settlement was approved by Judge John E. Sprizzo of Federal District Court in Manhattan on Tuesday, according to Milberg Weiss. Omnimedia did not immediately respond to a request for comment yesterday. MONEY: INVESTING; Will a Short Sentence Prove Sweet for a Stock? MARTHA STEWART'S SENTENCE: THE OVERVIEW; 5 Months in Jail, and Stewart Vows, 'I'll Be Back' THE MARTHA STEWART VERDICT: THE COMPANY; A Harsh Blow To a Company Based on Image Prosecutor Says Martha Stewart Spun Web of Lies About Shares Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia Incorporated POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fliers and No Plan B In India, Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Go Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Not to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04whyte.html?ex=1338609600&en=c00cf88b4501d439&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Trial of Black Raises Conflict Issue - New York Times Trial of Black Raises Conflict Issue June 4, 2007 Maclean’s Magazine, a leading Canadian weekly newsmagazine, has been as eager to cover the trial of as any other Canadian news outlet. Skip to next paragraph Mr. Black, a Canadian-born businessman who made part of his fortune as chairman of one of the world’s biggest newspaper groups, (now called the Sun-Times Media Group), is on trial in Chicago, accused of stealing millions of dollars from . Mr. Black stepped down as chairman in January 2004. Although quite a few journalists in Canada have worked for Mr. Black at some point, Maclean’s (which Mr. Black never owned) has two important connections with him that complicate its role as an impartial chronicler of his predicament. Mr. Black’s wife of 15 years, Barbara Amiel, is a well-known conservative columnist who has worked for Maclean’s for 30 years, and Ken Whyte, Maclean’s publisher and editor in chief, is a former employee of Mr. Black’s who remains a close friend. In an e-mail message, Mr. Whyte said that he had discussed the situation with Ms. Amiel and they agreed “she should avoid comment on the proceedings and the particulars of the case but that she could on occasion write about her own experiences as the wife of a high-profile criminal defendant.” Though her columns from Chicago refer to the trial only obliquely, in one of her most recent columns she wrote that a conviction would be a “miscarriage of justice.” A further complication is that several weeks ago Mr. Whyte, who worked for Mr. Black for 10 years, was called as a defense witness. His testimony started Friday and is scheduled to continue today. Mark Steyn, a Maclean’s columnist who used to work for some of Mr. Black’s newspapers, has been commenting on the trial. Mr. Whyte said that readers of Maclean’s were informed of the potential conflicts. “When I decided to answer the subpoena I disclosed to our readers that I would appear as a witness in my capacity as a former Black employee,” Mr. Whyte said. “Ms. Amiel’s relations to the defendant have been abundantly disclosed, as has Mr. Steyn’s former employment in the Black empire.” Mr. Whyte said that his role in the trial should not affect Maclean’s coverage, adding: “Mr. Steyn has informed me that he plans to prove his journalistic integrity by treating me twice as harshly as other witnesses.” Mr. Steyn posted online Friday that his boss “seemed unprepared” for the cross-examination. Maclean’s is owned by and has a circulation of around 500,000. Kelly McBride, a journalism ethics specialist at the Poynter Institute, said that this situation was not unusual in the profession, and often drew criticism from nonjournalists. “As an outsider what you see is a sort of incestuous relationship,” she said. “People have jobs and relationships with each other, they have financial gains based on these relationships, they are all scratching each other’s backs under the guise of journalism.” On the other hand, she said, these connections are sometimes unavoidable. “A lot of journalists marry other journalists, are children of other journalists, and it looks very suspicious to outsiders.” She added: “The best way to judge whether one powerful person is scratching the back of another or whether you have powerful editors hiring journalists into positions that are appropriate for their skills and abilities is to look at the work itself.” Mr. Whyte said that Maclean’s had not given Mr. Black any special treatment. “In the pretrial period,” he said, “Mr. Black sued me and Maclean’s over coverage he considered unfavorable. In fact, he’s sued two of my columnists over our coverage of his affairs.” Next Article in Business (15 of 20) &#x00bb; Need TALK; Ex-Vice President's Review Is 'Full of Heart' Judge Scolds Central Witness In Conrad Black's Fraud Trial Executive Tells of Odd Payouts to Hollinger Start of Conrad Black Trial Put Off to Today Next Article in Business (15 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/04ahead.html?ex=1338609600&en=ea1b6abf52c50b86&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Looking Ahead - New York Times June 4, 2007 A BREAK IN THE ACTION It will be a relatively slow week for economic news, led by the report on the trade deficit for April (Friday). Other reports will include April factory orders (Monday), the Institute for Supply Management ’s nonmanufacturing index (Tuesday), revised first-quarter productivity and labor costs (Wednesday) and April numbers for wholesale trade and consumer credit (Thursday). Henry M. Paulson Jr. , will discuss United States-China relations at the Heritage Foundation in Washington (Tuesday). The summit takes place Wednesday through Friday. The is scheduled to rule on a patent dispute between CANCER DRUGS ON DISPLAY The annual meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology continues through Tuesday in Chicago. Companies like are presenting data on their latest drug treatments for cancer. It will be a quiet week for earnings, with reports coming from Retailers will report their same-store sales for May (Thursday). will have its annual meeting (Tuesday). Next Article in Business (19 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Article in Business (19 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04quarter.html Why the Silver Surfer Isn&#8217;t the Coin of the Realm - New York Times Why the Silver Surfer Isn’t the Coin of the Realm June 4, 2007 The studio behind a coming summer movie, “Fantastic Four: Rise of the Silver Surfer,” has roused the ire of the United States Mint with its promotional gimmick for the film, in which Marvel Comics superheroes battle a metallic alien. Skip to next paragraph 20th Century Fox, via Associated Press The California quarter, as altered by the Franklin Mint. The Silver Surfer stamps. The studio, 20th Century Fox, hired the Franklin Mint, a private company that manufactures scale models, statuettes, pocket knives, medallions and collectibles, to place a full-color image of the Silver Surfer, complete with Web address, on the backs of 40,000 California statehood quarters. The altered coins (which are not in fact silver) were distributed nationwide in the period leading up to Memorial Day. Visitors to the Web site can compete to win a prize in connection with the movie’s June 15 release (finding one of the coins is not required). But the United States Mint, which is the exclusive maker of American coinage, took exception to the stunt. Although it is not illegal to deface American coins as long as there is no intention to defraud, it is illegal to advertise on coins, the mint pointed out last week. M. Moshe Malamud, chairman of the Franklin Mint, denied that what the company put on the coins was an advertisement. He said it “enhanced” the coins to make them “commemorative,” as it did a few years ago when it added images of to millions of Tennessee state quarters. A spokesman for the United States attorney’s office in Los Angeles, where Fox is based, declined to comment on the matter yesterday. The United States Postal Service, meanwhile, plans to issue a sheet of 41 cent stamps in July featuring 10 Marvel Comics characters. Among them are the Silver Surfer and Spider-Man, the subject of another summer movie. A similar sheet showing DC Comics characters was issued last summer. Congress made it legal last year to use commercial images on postage. Some of the Silver Surfer quarters have shown up on , where collectors have paid as much as $149 each — a high price for a quarter, but modest in comparison to the $250-plus that was bid recently for an original copy of the first issue of the Silver Surfer comic book. The Silver Surfer first appeared in a Fantastic Four comic book in 1966; he was given his own title in 1968. MATTHEW HEALEY Next Article in Business (16 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Article in Business (16 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Elizabeth Taylor - 1985 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/04bonds.html?ex=1338609600&en=1b4afcf012397d0d&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Treasury Auctions Scheduled for This Week - New York Times Treasury Auctions Scheduled for This Week June 4, 2007 The Treasury’s schedule of financing this week includes today’s regular weekly auction of new three- and six-month bills and an auction of four-week bills tomorrow. At the close of the New York cash market on Friday, the rate on the outstanding three-month bill was 4.78 percent. The rate on the six-month issue was 4.97 percent, and the rate on the four-week issue was 4.79 percent. The following tax-exempt fixed-income issues are scheduled for pricing this week: Prince George’s County, Md., $245.2 million of general obligation bonds. Competitive. Las Vegas Valley Water District, Nev., $82.5 million of general obligation bonds. Competitive. New Jersey Educational Facilities Authority, $325 million of revenue bonds. Competitive. San Jose, Calif., $93.5 million of general obligation bonds. Competitive. State of Virginia, $146.7 million of general obligation bonds. Competitive. State of Wisconsin, $150 million of general obligation bonds. Competitive. New Jersey Environment Infrastructure, $114.2 million of debt securities. Competitive. ONE DAY DURING THE WEEK Albemarle, N.C., Hospital Authority, $68 million of debt securities. Baltimore Water and Wastewater Projects, $151 million of debt securities. Citigroup Global Markets. California Educational Facilities Authority, $188 million of debt securities for City of Phoenix, $188.8 million of senior revenue and taxable bonds for civic improvement. RBC Capital Markets. Clarke County, Ga., School District, $50 million of general obligation bonds. Department of Veterans Affairs , $207 million of home purchase revenue bonds. Fillmore, Calif., Wastewater Treatment, $73 million of debt securities. Fort Bend County, Tex., $130 million of limited tax bonds. Siebert Brandford Shank. Massachusetts Health and Education Facilities Authority, $300 million of revenue bonds for Partners HealthCare System. Massachusetts Housing, $50 million of single-family mortgage revenue bonds. Modesto, Calif., Irrigation District Finance Authority, $90 million of debt securities. Bear Stearns. New Mexico Mortgage Finance Authority, $50 million of debt securities. George K. Baum. New York City Transitional Finance Authority, $370 million of future tax secured subordinate bonds. Ramirez & Company. New York State Thruway Authority, $354 million of debt securities. Merrill Lynch. Orlando-Orange County, Fla., Expressway, $425 million of debt securities. Citigroup Global Markets. State of Illinois, $270 million of general obligation bonds. Loop Capital Markets. State of Illinois, $150 million of general obligation bonds. Popular Securities. Texas Transportation Commission, $1.6 billion of general obligation mobility funds. Morgan Stanley. Next Article in Business (20 of 20) &#x00bb; Need ONLINE; Playing Games at CNBC FIVE DAYS; China&#8217;s Investors Pull Back, but U.S. Bull Is Unfazed What Seller Wants a Low Price? Jazz Lowers Offering Price Next Article in Business (20 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04song.html A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; - New York Times A Theme Song for Clinton: ‘I’m a Believer’ vs. ‘Cold as Ice’ ANDREW ADAM NEWMAN Published: June 4, 2007 asked YouTube viewers to vote on a theme song for her presidential campaign, she certainly got the attention she wanted — and a whole lot of jokes at her expense. While her campaign provided a list of upbeat songs to choose from — like “I’m a Believer” and “Beautiful Day” — her detractors suggested alternatives like “Let’s Call the Whole Thing Off” and “Cold as Ice.” On May 16, the campaign uploaded a video in which Mrs. Clinton says, in a mock serious tone, “I want to know what you’re thinking on one of the most important questions of this campaign,” then directs viewers to to vote on one of her staff’s nine song choices (or suggest others). The clip concludes with some mild self-deprecation, with brief footage of Mrs. Clinton vocally mangling the national anthem. On May 24, she posted another video to YouTube, announcing that voters had narrowed the original list to five (including “Rock This Country!” by Shania Twain and “Suddenly I See” by KT Tunstall), and that five of the top write-in suggestions also were now contenders (including “Every Little Thing She Does Is Magic” by The Police and “You and I” by Celine Dion). The campaign is expected to close the second round of voting and announce the winning song this week. “The numbers are insane,” Peter Daou, the Clinton campaign Internet director, said of the response. Each video has been viewed on either YouTube or the campaign site more than 900,000 times, and more than 100,000 votes were cast in the first round, he said. Tech President, a blog about candidates’ Internet exposure, credited Mrs. Clinton’s campaign song videos with “helping her dethrone Senator as the candidate with the most YouTube buzz.” But the contest also has functioned as a kick-me sign. suggested a theme song of Sir Mix-A-Lot’s “Baby Got Back”; on “The Chris Matthews Show” on NBC, David Brooks, a columnist for The New York Times, suggested Hall and Oates’s “Maneater”; on the Web site , Jon Sanders suggested R.E.M.’s “It’s the End of the World as We Know It” and Barry McGuire’s “Eve of Destruction.” Other media observers are holding their own contests. On The New Republic’s Web site, Michael Crowley, a senior editor at the magazine, asked readers for their own suggestions, which yielded The ’ “She’s So Cold,” Foreigner’s “Cold as Ice,” and Lou Reed’s “Vicious.” Mr. Crowley said in a telephone interview that while he was inclined to mock the contest, he did see some value to it for the campaign. “She’s sort of the embodiment in modern American politics of control-freakery and micro-calculation, but the videos were fun and she seemed likable and funny, and she doesn’t get many opportunities to come across that way,” Mr. Crowley said. “There are a lot of spoofs, and we take it in good fun,” said Mr. Daou of the Clinton campaign. “When you invite people to interact, people from all across the political spectrum will interact, and that’s the nature of the contest and it wasn’t unexpected.” Indeed, he pointed out, Mrs. Clinton’s second YouTube video included pieces from clips that YouTube users had submitted in response to the first, including one unidentified man saying, “Are you freaking kidding me?” and another saying “This is ridiculous.” Mr. Daou said that the write-in song candidates, which all carried positive themes, were not cherry-picked but were in fact the most popular. “This is about the will of the people,” he said. But rock lyrics are not known for being entirely on-message all the time, and some pundits are already gleefully micro-analyzing the potential winners. On , a reporter, Robert Smith, played a sound bite of Sting singing with The Police, “Ever little thing she does is magic, everything she do just turns me on.” Then Mr. Smith asked: “Do you really want a president that turns you on?” It would not be the senator’s first song-related miscue. During the nationally televised event at which she announced a run for the Senate from New York in 2000, after one of her staff members cued up the album “New York State of Mind,” the CD played “Captain Jack,” a song with lyrics referring to masturbation. Rob Sheffield, author of the book “Love Is a Mix Tape: Life and Loss, One Song at a Time,” said he wished that Mrs. Clinton would choose a song she personally liked rather than deferring to the tastes of strangers. “I’m more interested in hearing what Hillary is rocking in the crib, you know?” he said. Next Article in Business (11 of 20) &#x00bb; Explore TimesSelect with a no-risk 14-day free trial. '08 Hopefuls, Media Technology Can Be Friend or Foe Presidential Election of 2008 Computers and the Internet Next Article in Business (11 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04drill.html No, Not Everyone Skips the Commercials - New York Times No, Not Everyone Skips the Commercials June 4, 2007 began releasing standardized information about viewership of commercials. The numbers came as a relief to television executives, showing that viewers who own DVRs do not fast-forward through the ads as much as had been feared. Skip to next paragraph Even if they did not confirm the industry’s worst expectations, however, the numbers still showed that ownership affected ad viewing. For example, among all 18- to 49-year-olds who watched the real-time broadcast of “The Office” on May 10, about 249,000 people did not tune into the commercials, a 6.2 percent drop-off in viewership. But in households that owned a DVR, commercials were skipped by 50.9 percent of those who watched the show, a figure that counts both live viewers and those who watched the show up to a week after its broadcast. Over all, in the first week of May, the proportion of viewers who stuck around for TV commercials was 69.9 percent among 18- to 49-year-olds in households with DVRs, 24 percentage points lower than it was for real-time viewers that age in all households. “I don’t think people were shocked,” said Brad Adgate, senior vice president for research at Horizon Media, an ad-buying agency. “I think the industry was hanging its hat on 70 percent at some point,” as the proportion of DVR viewers who watched commercials. Next Article in Business (18 of 20) &#x00bb; Need DOWN; Up Next: A Real Tally of Couch Potatoes ADVERTISING; At Last, Television Ratings Go to College ADVERTISING; A Career Change Shows the New Importance of Data Collection THE MEDIA BUSINESS: ADVERTISING; A Yardstick for Video-on-Demand Next Article in Business (18 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Elizabeth Taylor - 1985 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/05/technology/05cnd-palm.html Palm Sells 25% Stake to Equity Firm in Revamping - New York Times Palm Sells 25% Stake to Equity Firm in Revamping June 5, 2007 , the struggling hand-held device company that makes the , has reached a deal to sell a quarter of the company to Elevation Partners, a private equity firm, for about $325 million as part of a plan to reorganize the company. Jon Rubinstein, a former executive who ran its division, is planning to join Palm as its executive chairman as part of the transaction, which was announced today. The deal includes a plan to pay out about $940 million in dividends to Palm shareholders, worth $9 a share. “As a result of this transaction, we will strengthen the Palm leadership team and create a more effective capital structure, which puts us in a great position to attract new talent, significantly strengthen our execution capabilities and deliver long-term shareholder value,” Ed Colligan, Palm’s president and chief executive, said The reorganization comes after several months of unsuccessful efforts to find a buyer for Palm, which is facing increasing competition from all directions including , which now dominates the smartphone market with its Windows Mobile software. , which makes the , is also a direct competitor, and Apple will soon enter the cellular phone market with its highly anticipated iPhone. And is said to be preparing its own software competitor and is building alliances. Palm, which invented the first hand-held organizers in 1992, held preliminary talks with several rivals, including , and private equity firms including Silver Lake Partners and the Texas Pacific Group, but none was willing to buy out the entire company amid such uncertainty over its future, these people said. The transaction with Elevation, a relatively new firm that bought a minority interest in Forbes last year, gives Palm an important cash infusion and also some experienced advisers. In addition to Mr. Rubinstein, Fred Anderson, a former chief financial officer at Apple, and Roger McNamee, a co-founder of Silver Lake Partners, both of whom are managing directors at Elevation, will join Palm’s board. The deal is Elevation’s largest. Palm spent the last few months trying to play down the prospect of a buyout. Just last week, Palm’s chief executive, Ed Colligan, told CNBC, “We’re not focused on figuring out how to sell the company. We’re focused on how to build the company and create long-term shareholder value.” At Apple, Mr. Rubinstein, an engineer who developed high-performance computer workstations at Hewlett Packard, oversaw successful products like the consumer-oriented iMac and oversaw the development of the company’s iPod music player. He retired from Apple in 2005. Mr. Rubinstein will be joining Palm as it tries to break out with new products against its better-financed competitors. Last week Palm introduced a 2.5-pound laptop computer called the Foleo that Palm’s co-founder, Jeff Hawkins, said would serve as a large-screen peripheral for the company’s Treo smartphone and Windows Mobile devices. The introduction was greeted with skepticism by industry analysts who said that the system would find only niche market acceptance because most smartphone owners already have portable computers. Under the terms of the deal, Elevation will purchase $325 million of a new series of convertible preferred stock. The conversion price will be $8.50 a share. Palm will take on about $400 million in debt to pay out the dividend to shareholders. The deal is subject to shareholder approval. If completed, Eric Benhamou and D. Scott Mercer, two current board members, will step down to make room for Mr. Anderson and Mr. McNamee. is serving as financial adviser to Palm. Houlihan Lokey Howard & Zukin Advisory Services Inc. provided a fairness opinion to Palm, and is acting as financial adviser to Elevation. The Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati Professional Corporation is serving as outside counsel to Palm, and Simpson Thacher & Bartlett is acting as legal adviser to Elevation. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles Next Article in Technology (2 of 23) &#x00bb; Need Briefing | Hardware: Palm Awards Stake In Unit To 8 Employees Technology Briefing | Hardware: Palm To Change Name After Spinoff When Palm Does a Deal, Prices Get Crazy TECHNOLOGY; Deal Reunites Early Makers Of Hand-Helds Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Next Article in Technology (2 of 23) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Afghan Pushcart - 2001 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04speakers.html A Way to Give Authors a Lucrative Second Platform - New York Times A Way to Give Authors a Lucrative Second Platform Lawrence Wright at the Woodrow Wilson School of Princeton University. June 4, 2007 Even before Lawrence Wright, a staff writer for The New Yorker, won a for his book “The Looming Tower: and the Road to 9/11,” he was one of the busiest lecturing authors published by Alfred A. Knopf. For April and May, he had been booked to speak at Princeton and Wesleyan Universities, at a public relations seminar in Santa Barbara, Calif., and at a lunch in Chicago sponsored by the Skip to next paragraph James L. Swanson signing books in Frederick, Md. But Mr. Wright is not on the typical whirlwind book tour, when authors make free appearances at bookstores and talk shows to promote their latest work. Rather, he is being paid to speak by the host groups, which also cover his travel expenses. The engagements are arranged by the Knopf Speakers Bureau, which was set up a year and a half ago to sell books and market authors after the initial publicity campaign, and has helped the company’s authors earn extra money. Mr. Wright’s best seller, which was published last summer, is for sale wherever he speaks. Mr. Wright says the Knopf Speakers Bureau has changed his life. Victoria Gerken, its manager, “kind of holds my whole calendar,” he said, “and is also a really good counselor for me — it’s like having my own office.” Before the speakers bureau represented him, “I was getting lots of offers, but none with money attached,” Mr. Wright said. “This really helps a writer supplement his income and make a living.” In the last two years, several major publishing houses have set up speakers bureaus. HarperCollins was the first, in May 2005, followed by Random House, which set up a partnership with an existing company, the American Program Bureau, rather than build its own. Knopf and Penguin established in-house speakers bureaus in 2006, and two other publishers, Holtzbrinck and the Hachette Book Group, may do the same. All the companies say they are responding to common industry trends: fleeting tastes in mass-market books, shrinking shelf lives in bookstores, disappearing book review sections, and the brief attention span of a media audience hooked on celebrity sound bites and Hollywood entertainment. A speakers bureau “goes beyond the traditional marketing opportunities,” said Jamie Brickhouse, who heads the HarperCollins enterprise. “It’s a way for authors to continue to raise their profiles and reach new audiences. It’s great for the frontlist and for the backlist, and has brought new life to authors who don’t have an ongoing book push.” One example is Jean Strouse, whose biography of , “Morgan: American Financier,” was published in paperback by Harper Perennial in 2000 and who recently gave a paid lecture for the Chilton Investment Company, a fund manager. HarperCollins recently sent James L. Swanson, author of “Manhunt: The 12-Day Chase for Lincoln’s Killer,” to Frederick, Md., to participate in the city’s Frederick Reads program (his book sold 1,000 copies there). And it arranged for the restaurateur Danny Meyer, author of “Setting the Table,” a book about business hospitality, to speak in Philadelphia to 350 executives of Corporate clients tend to pay higher honorariums than institutions like schools and libraries, publishing executives say. If a group cannot afford the standard fee, which ranges from $5,000 to $7,500, sometimes the publisher will offer a discount based on a guarantee of a certain number of book sales. A middle-tier author might make $15,000 to $35,000 a year in speaking fees, depending on the demand for his or her services and how many engagements he or she is willing to take on, according to the executives. The speakers bureau’s commission tends to be 20 percent. Bookstores are frequently enlisted to do the bookselling at events, which helps them share in the benefits of an author’s coming to town. Paul Bogaards, who started the Knopf Speakers Bureau, said, “We want booksellers to become co-brokers — if they find business for us locally, we will split the commission with them.” Not everyone is thrilled by the trend. Sara Nelson, editor in chief of Publishers Weekly, said she was worried that it put too much pressure on authors to hone their presentation skills, potentially at the expense of their literary development. “If whether you’re able to sell yourself as a speaker is part of finding a publisher or not concerns me,” she said. Carlton Sedgeley, founder of the Royce Carlton lecture agency, dismissed the notion of bringing such a demanding business in-house. Contracts must be drawn up, fees and travel expenses negotiated, travel arrangements made and, most important, clients identified and cultivated. “They’ll all fail,” he said. He scoffs at the lesser-known, midlist and emerging authors the publishers have been working to promote alongside more established names — many of whom already have lecture representation. “They can’t sell them, they can’t give them away,” he said. He has a best-selling Random House author, Anna Quindlen, all locked up, he said, “and she gets $35,000” a lecture. Many writers with the in-house bureaus receive a fraction of that. “It’s been tried before,” he said, “and it never works out.” He referred to five years in the 1970s, when Esther Margolis, then Bantam’s marketing and publicity chief, started the Bantam Lecture Bureau. The venture grew so large and diversified — branching out to show business and movie figures — that the publisher decided to back out. “But things are different now,” said Ms. Margolis, president of Newmarket Publishing and Communications. “There are many more publicizable authors, authors are more in demand, and more clients are looking. The whole evolution of the superstore created book marketplaces in sections of the U.S. that would not have had that before.” In-house speakers bureaus have also been helped by the Internet, which lets them connect with potential clients faster and more easily than they would have in the past. The Penguin Speakers Bureau has just celebrated its first anniversary by introducing a Web site. “I had some goals for this year,” the director, Jacqueline Fischetti, said. “I wanted to sign up at least 30 great speakers, and we already have more than that. There’s the Web site.” Every month, she said, the number of requests for speakers increases. The bureau, she said, “allows us not only to be reactive, but proactive.” Next Article in Business (12 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Harris, Author of &#8216;Bang the Drum Slowly,&#8217; Is Dead at 84 LETTER FROM TEHRAN; Seeking Signs of Literary Life BOOKS OF THE TIMES; Understand the South, Y'all, Even the Puzzling Parts IDEAS & TRENDS; Writers Take Out Their Knives Knopf, Alfred A, Inc Next Article in Business (12 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Statue of Liberty, New York Harbor, 1905 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/technology/04iphone.html Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) - New York Times Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) June 4, 2007 SAN FRANCISCO, June 3 — During an onscreen demonstration of the iPhone in ’s sprawling retail store here recently, an employee, clad in a black T-shirt, of course, surprised a potential customer. Skip to next paragraph David Paul Morris/Getty Images Apple introduced its iPhone at MacWorld in San Francisco in January. Do you think the iPhone has been over-hyped? Illustration by The New York Times Nonplused, the customer stammered, “You mean it’s a cellphone, too?” Such is the spell that has cast on the American consumer. It has been almost six months since Mr. Jobs, the world’s consummate salesman, introduced the iPhone as the Ronco Veg-O-Matic for the Internet era. Tongue only partly in cheek, Mr. Jobs promised that Apple’s entry into the cellular handset market would be a better phone, Web browser and music player. Mr. Jobs succeeded in building expectations for what some have called “the God machine.” The bar-of-soap-size phone is being coveted as a talisman for a digital age, and iPhone hysteria is beginning to reach levels usually reserved for video-game machines at Christmas. Although the phones are expected to cost as much as $600 when they go on sale at Apple and AT&T stores later this month, each company has received more than a million inquiries about the product's availability. Apple disclosed in television commercials Sunday night that the phone would be released June 29. Further evidence that expectations have been wound up to a fever pitch: the phones, or promises to deliver a phone, are already on sale on eBay for $830. A pundit as unlikely as Arianna Huffington sought out Mr. Jobs directly for advice on being the first to score a phone. (He told her to go to an AT&T store.) Last week, during an appearance at a technology industry conference in Southern California, Mr. Jobs teased the audience by briefly pulling an iPhone out of his jeans pocket and immediately slipping it back out of sight. The anticipation, which is intense even by Jobsian standards, has led to some quiet, behind-the-scenes anxiety at Apple. Some Apple executives worry privately that expectations for the one-button phones may be too high and that first-generation buyers will end up disappointed. Certainly there are skeptics. The high price will limit the phones’ appeal to true believers. The cellular network that the iPhone operates on is slower than those of many of its rivals. Several of Apple’s handset competitors hope that its decision not to include a keyboard, relying instead on a touch-screen virtual keyboard, will limit the attractiveness of the iPhone in text-intensive business markets. “It’s very media-centric,” said a director at a handset competitor who declined to be identified, saying that his company did not want to elicit comparisons with the iPhone. “It will hit one sweet spot, but not necessarily all of the sweet spots — we hope.” As has often been the case during the last three decades, Mr. Jobs’s timing may be impeccable. While entire industries have been struggling for more than half a decade to find the right combination of features to merge cellphones and computers, Apple appears to have stepped in at precisely the right moment. “These devices have become ubiquitous, and there’s an enormous hunger out there,” said Peter Schwartz, the chairman of Global Business Network, a consulting firm based here. Most analysts believe that Apple will easily exceed its initial goal of selling 10 million phones by the end of next year. “It will be just 1 percent of the handset market,” said Jagdish Rebello, director of wireless communications research at iSuppli, a market research firm based in El Segundo, Calif. “But it is essentially shifting the balance of power into the hands of the mobile device manufacturers.” News reports out of Asia in recent weeks indicate that Apple may have placed an order for an additional five million phones with Quanta Computer, a Taiwanese manufacturer that is a leading maker of laptop computers. Another Taiwanese manufacturer, Hon Hai Precision Industry, was earlier reported to have been awarded the original order. Apple declines to comment on its plans. Although a tiny fraction of the global phone industry, a 1 percent market share would make Apple a head-to-head competitor with the high-end version of ’s Windows Mobile software, which is used on a number of smartphones. During the first quarter of 2007 Microsoft’s software was used on about 3.2 million personal digital assistants, or about 60 percent of the market, according to Gartner, the market research firm. Microsoft has come to dominate the market against competitors like , Research In Motion and Symbian, but Apple’s entry is likely to reset the most profitable high end of the handset market. “It will change the whole category of what people think a phone is,” said Richard Doherty, president of the Envisioneering Group, an industry consulting firm. To head off potential consumer disappointment, Apple said several months ago that it would have the ability to add features to the iPhones after they were purchased. The company’s executives say that the capability to upgrade the iPhone in the field will give it a significant advantage over other cellphones, which are usually replaced frequently. “Other carriers are scrambling to figure out what their strategies should be,” said Chetan Sharma, an industry consultant who follows the wireless data market. One potentially crucial factor in determining the iPhone’s success that has yet to be clarified by the company: How willing is Apple to permit independent software vendors to develop programs for the iPhone? When he introduced the phone in January, Mr. Jobs seemed unwilling to permit outside software development. He said that opening that door would tend to raise both security and stability issues that were unacceptable in the wireless handset market. Last week, however, at the D: All Things Digital conference, he seemed to relent. He said Apple was looking for ways to make it possible for developers to create software for the iPhone. A person briefed on Apple’s plans said that at its software developer conference this month, Apple intends to announce that it will make it possible for developers of small programs written for the Macintosh to easily convert them to run on the iPhone. Software, Mr. Jobs said last week, is what would make the difference. Poor software, he said, is what undermined the Japanese consumer electronics industry. And by that same token, software is what will give the iPhone what he said would be a five-year lead on the rest of the handset industry. “If you look at the iPhone, it’s software wrapped in wonderful hardware,” he said. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles Next Article in Technology (1 of 23) &#x00bb; Need Responds to the iPhone STATE OF THE ART; Apple Waves Its Wand At the Phone In Cingular-Apple Deal, Only a Phone Was Missing Retail Stores and Trade Next Article in Technology (1 of 23) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04adcol.html?ex=1338609600&en=c770249699aa16c9&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies - New York Times Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies June 4, 2007 Like executives at advertising agencies, Richard D. Beckman and his team talk to managers at consumer brand companies about the customers they want to reach. Four to six weeks later, they present a marketing and advertising plan. Skip to next paragraph Part of an eight-page insert in Vogue and Vanity Fair, designed by Cond&#233; Nast creative group. Addenda: Shake-Up at JWT in Chicago After Loss of Kraft Foods Cond&#233; Nast&#146;s own agency created four-page supplements for the World Gold Council. The agency also created supplements for Lexus. But Mr. Beckman does not run an advertising agency. He is the president of the Condé Nast Media Group, a division of the magazine company that publishes titles like Vogue, Wired and The New Yorker. Over the last five years, Mr. Beckman has developed an agencylike business within Condé Nast’s ad sales unit, generating new revenue by planning events for advertisers and creating advertisements that help sell more magazine pages. Traditionally, magazine companies have made money by selling ad space in their magazines or, more recently, on their Web sites. Now some of them have set up what amount to internal miniagencies that work with clients to design campaigns for their own pages. Sometimes this work spills out into other forums, like radio and television ads. Condé Nast Publications, the Meredith Corporation, , Hearst and even Surface magazine, a small independent title dedicated to fashion and design, are now handling some creative work for their advertisers. The trend poses a challenge to traditional agencies and has created some unusual partnerships (think of Vogue designing ads for The Condé Nast Media Group has been developing sweepstakes, television specials, radio spots, in-store events and, of course, magazine ads for brands like , Grey Goose and Lexus. The unit, which relies on a panel of more than 100,000 consumers to evaluate advertising, generates about $200 million of revenue from these marketing programs. Mr. Beckman’s group has drawn the most attention for “Fashion Rocks,” a television special about music and the fashion industry that goes beyond a typical agency project. The event, now in its fourth year, ties in several large advertisers like Chevrolet, , L’Oréal and Cingular, and was featured last year in a custom magazine sent to Condé Nast subscribers. This year, Condé Nast is planning another large event to sell to advertisers, “Movies Rock.” That show, produced by Mr. Beckman and some Hollywood heavyweights, will feature music that has been influential in movies. It will have its debut in December, and Condé Nast hopes to turn it into an annual event, another focal point for selling ads. The idea behind both programs is to create a so-called television event, custom magazine and other content that showcases each advertiser. During Fashion Rocks last year, for example, performed a private show the night before that was streamed only onto Cingular Wireless cellphones. Andrew McLean, president and chief client officer of Mediaedge:cia, the ad-buying agency that represented Cingular Wireless when it worked with “Fashion Rocks,” said that his client’s work with Condé Nast had moved from “just buying bits of paper in a magazine to a much more multifaceted relationship.” Mediaedge:cia is part of the Mr. Beckman’s unit also has the ability to approach celebrities who would do not often work directly with advertisers. For example, Condé Nast arranged for Robert F. Kennedy Jr. to appear in an ad for Lexus that also showcased the Waterkeeper Alliance, a water protection group that Mr. Kennedy heads. “They have the cachet and the credibility for top-tier celebrities to want to partner with them,” said Robin Steinberg, senior vice president and director of print investment and activation for MediaVest, an agency that buys media in the For Dillard’s, Condé Nast has created everything from the store chain’s current slogan — “The Style of Your Life” — to fashion shows for local department stores. Condé Nast set up the first national campaign for Dillard’s last year, with components like radio and television ads, online videos and magazine ads. Condé Nast’s internal agency evolved from within, but Meredith, which publishes such titles as Family Circle, More and Ladies’ Home Journal, took a different approach. Last summer the company established Meredith 360, an advertising consulting group that is a separate business unit from the publishing group. Meredith has purchased three advertising agencies in the last year, allowing it to offer a broad spectrum of services. “A lot of our different divisions do what a lot of different agencies do,” said Nancy Weber, Meredith’s chief marketing officer. Hearst also has a division that does creative work for its largest clients, in formats that include print, online, video, mobile and outdoor. Hearst has modeled its marketing division after an ad agency, said Jeff Hamill, senior vice president of Hearst Integrated Media, complete with a sales staff that serves as account directors, creative teams and researchers. Mr. Hamill said that agencies that buy ads are often involved in the process, but agencies that create ads are not, since Hearst can do that work. Meredith 360 charges for its services, while Condé Nast and Hearst charge for costs only when they create custom programs for advertisers, executives at those companies said. (Condé Nast also makes a profit from events like Fashion Rocks.) The rate structure means that Condé Nast can often beat ad agencies on price, Mr. Beckman said. “We don’t have to make money from our creative, because we make money from our media,” he said. Some advertisers think that’s the way it should be. Condé Nast is currently working with CIT, the financial services company, on a series of interviews with people like fashion designer Marc Ecko, whose clothing company is called Marc Ecko Enterprises. The interviews are featured online, and Condé Nast will produce live events and magazine sections over the next several months for CIT. Kelley Gipson, director of brand marketing and communications for CIT, said that she does not expect to pay Condé Nast anything more than the cost of the pages her company purchases. “I look at it as part of the value chain for media,” Ms. Gipson said. “We don’t charge for it when we’re working with our customers. We look at the opportunity to provide sort of intellectual capital as the glue in the relationship, so we challenge our media partners to think about it the same way.” Next Article in Business (5 of 20) &#x00bb; Need In a Troubled Time, a New Business Magazine THE MEDIA BUSINESS: ADVERTISING; Online Experiment for Print Magazine ADVERTISING; Marketers, Gingerly, Bite at Parody Bait THE MEDIA BUSINESS: ADVERTISING; Ads Made, No Agency Required Conde Nast Publications Inc Next Article in Business (5 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/05/business/media/05decency.html?ex=1338696000&en=d31a8d498dfcd90a&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss F.C.C. Rebuffed by Court on Indecency Fines - New York Times F.C.C. Rebuffed by Court on Indecency Fines June 5, 2007 WASHINGTON, June 4 — If President Bush and Vice President Cheney can use vulgar language, then the government cannot punish others for doing the same thing on television. Skip to next paragraph Decision by the U.S. Court of Appeals (pdf) That, in essence, was the decision today when a federal appeals court struck down the government policy of fining stations and networks that broadcast programs with profanity. The decision, by a divided panel of the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit in New York, was a sharp rebuke for the and for the Bush administration. It was a major victory in a legal battle being waged by the four television networks — Fox, , NBC and ABC — that had filed the case. Beginning with its indecency finding in a case against NBC for an obscenity uttered by the during the Golden Globes ceremony in 2003, President Bush’s Republican and Democratic appointees to the commission have imposed a tougher indecency policy by punishing any station that used what was known as a “fleeting expletive,” or blurted profanity. Reversing decades of more lenient policy, the commission had found that the mere utterance of profane words implied sexual or excretory acts and therefore violated the indecency rules. But in striking down the commission’s interpretation, the appeals court noted that “in recent times even the top leaders of our government has used variants of these expletives in a manner that no reasonable person would believe referenced sexual or excretory organs or activities.” Adopting an argument made by lawyers for NBC, the court then cited examples in which Mr. Bush and Mr. Cheney had used language that would be penalized under the policy. Mr. Bush was caught on videotape last July using a common vulgarity that the commission finds objectionable in a conversation with Prime Minister . And three years ago, Mr. Cheney was widely reported to have muttered a profane comment to , a Vermont Democrat, on the floor of the “We find that the F.C.C.’s new policy regarding ‘fleeting expletives’ fails to provide a reasoned analysis justifying its departure from the agency’s established practice,” said the court. Although the court struck down the policy on statutory grounds, it also said that it had serious broader constitutional problems with the commission’s attempt to regulate the language of television programs. “We are skeptical that the commission can provide a reasoned explanation for its ‘fleeting expletive’ regime that would pass constitutional muster,” said the court in an opinion written by Judge Rosemary S. Pooler and joined by Judge Peter W. Hall. “We question whether the F.C.C.’s indecency test can survive First Amendment scrutiny.” While the court sent the case back to the commission to rewrite its policy, it said that it was “doubtful” that the agency would be able to “adequately respond to the constitutional and statutory challenges raised by the networks.” The case decided today, Fox et al. v. Federal Communications Commission, has been closely watched by the television industry and its critics for their broad implications on television programming — as has a case now before a federal appeals court in Philadelphia involving the malfunctioning wardrobe of at the 2005 Super Bowl. Neither cable nor satellite television face the same indecency rules even though they cover about 85 percent of homes. And as the Bush administration’s appointees have taken a tougher view on indecency, the industry has waged a counter-campaign in the courts. The case decided today involved findings against the networks for comments by Cher and Nicole Richie on the Billboard Music Awards, the use of expletives on “N.Y.P.D. Blue,” and a comment on “The Early Show” by a contestant on CBS’s reality show “Survivor.” Next Article in Business (1 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Erred in Firing Reporter Who Cursed, Arbitrator Says Senate Backs Increase in Fine for Indecency 'Sopranos' Undergoes Cosmetic Surgery for Basic Cable THE TV WATCH; As Stern Ranted, Letterman Debated Next Article in Business (1 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/03/magazine/03wwln-consumed-t.html Wines - Alcoholic Beverages - Alcohol - Consumed - Rob Walker - New York Times June 3, 2007 Skip to next paragraph Illustration by Leif Parsons Consumer sophistication is on the rise. Just look at what we drink. Not coffee from a can or mass-market beer, but complex lattes and fine pinot noir. When there is a great enough thirst for sophistication (or anything else), something becomes inevitable: a chain of relevant franchises. Or in the case of wine, a couple of them: one recent list of fast-growing franchises included both Vino 100 (with about 60 locations open) and WineStyles (about 110 locations). In both instances, the guiding mission is to present wine to consumers in a manner that’s unpretentious and demystified — not so, you know, sophisticated. Each chain emphasizes a desnobbed lexicon for wine discussion, a heavily edited selection of relatively low-priced bottles and an emphasis on the shop as a location for events and socializing. WineStyles, which began franchising in 2004, sorts its offerings on shelves not by country of origin or grape varietal but by way of a “style system” that boils down to eight “flavor profile” words, like “crisp” “silky” and “bold.” This is an easier system for a consumer to relate to, according to Robert Spuck, the C.E.O. of WineStyles. Similarly, a typical WineStyles store carries about 160 wines, because, he argues, that’s as much as the shopper wants to deal with. Many of the selections at any given WineStyles store are actually proprietary: the chain works with wineries to produce batches that are under labels, like Killer Bee, that the chain owns. This means you “don’t have to pay for all that branding and everything” that’s built into the price of some other wines, Spuck says. New house labels are introduced all the time to meet the wine consumer’s thirst for variety. But the strategy also happens to play to many a wine buyer’s tendency to buy some labels over and over — long after the actual vintage he first enjoyed has been quaffed (as oenephiles like to say) out of existence. At Vino 100, the organizing principle is suggested by the name: a hundred wines priced at $25 or less. Employees are trained to use the company’s “vino speak,” which avoids words like “tannin” or “sulfates” in favor of continuums like dry versus fruity and light versus heavy, and food pairings. “It’s talking English,” says Gary Blumenthal, the founder. Blumenthal is also the president of Tinder Box, a chain of 150 or so cigar stores, and he aims to replicate the system he says has worked well for that chain, keeping track of customers’ purchases, likes and dislikes to guide new suggestions. “People ask me all the time, ‘What’s a good cigar?’ ” he says. “I tell them it’s the one you like.” It’s the same with wine, he says: “Somebody is involved with cigars or wine because they want to be. They want it to be fun. They don’t want it to be stressful, they don’t want to feel stupid and they don’t want to feel cheap.” It’s safe to say that these chains aim to be something like the of wine. Starbucks, after all, is an icon of the new and more sophisticated America. You can argue that Starbucks has achieved its place by fancying up a commodity (coffee) or by making the once-unusual latte into something as easily obtainable as a Whopper. But both Spuck and Blumenthal stress a different Starbucks-like quality: the retail establishment as gathering place. Vino 100 franchises hold scores of events with names like Wining Women. WineStyles shops all have clubs, some with hundreds of members. Both have put a great deal of effort into inviting store design. In a way, the actual wine sounds less important than the context in which it’s purchased. “That’s what people in our demographic enjoy doing,” Spuck says. “Meeting other people who are congruent with their personality and with income and probably education background. We give them a meeting place, and wine happens to be the focal point.” Or rather, lots of meeting places. These chains have not invented the idea of the comfortable, neighborhood wine shop, which has been around for a long time. One pertinent example is Best Cellars, which opened in Manhattan in 1996 with a welcoming design, a 100-bottle selection and an eight-category flavor-profile system — “fresh,” “juicy,” “big,” etc. (It now has eight locations.) Then again, Starbucks did not invent the cafe. The key to chains in the new sophisticated America is the same as ever: not creating a special place but replicating it, as far and wide as possible. Next Article in Magazine (11 of 16) &#x00bb; Need OF THE TIMES; Summer Breezes in, Sipping Barbera LONG ISLAND VINES; A Smooth and Meaty Malbec Napa Valley? Bordeaux? No, but Still Wine Country Retail Stores and Trade Next Article in Magazine (11 of 16) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Sultans of Swat Commemorative Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/04avaya.html?ex=1338609600&en=2ecea4d7ac140197&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Phone Equipment Manufacturer May Be Sold - New York Times Phone Equipment Manufacturer May Be Sold MICHAEL J. de la MERCED Published: June 4, 2007 was near a deal last night to sell itself to Silver Lake Partners and the Texas Pacific Group for more than $8 billion in the latest buyout in the telecommunications industry, according to people briefed on the sale. The two private equity firms appear to have bested a rival bid from and a deal may be announced as early as today, those people said. But they cautioned that the talks were ongoing and that Nortel could field a higher 11th-hour bid. The firms are expected to pay about $17 per share, the people said. Avaya’s shares closed Friday at $16.08. Speculation about a buyout first arose two weeks ago, when the company unexpectedly postponed a meeting with analysts without offering an explanation or setting a new date. An Avaya spokeswoman would not comment. Avaya, which was once a division of Lucent Technologies and before that, is one of the nation’s top makers of phone equipment, rivaling in providing Internet-based communications to corporations. Much of its business focuses on upgrading companies to voice networks that can also offer video and data services. Avaya draws almost a third of its revenue from its long-term maintenance contracts, though the company has warned that as those agreements expire, its customers have the leverage to demand lower fees. The company, which was spun off from Lucent in October 2000, suffered in 2002 as the dot-com bubble burst. But its financial health has rebounded so strongly that a analyst recently described Avaya as an ideal buyout candidate. In its fiscal year ended Sept. 30, 2006, the company reported net profit of $201 million on revenue of $5.12 billion, and it is virtually debt-free. The company, based in Basking Ridge, N.J., has about 20,000 employees. The move comes amid heavy deal-making in the telecommunications sector. Last month, , the wireless service provider, agreed to a $27.5 billion buyout by Texas Pacific and a unit of Analysts have predicted consolidation in the telecommunications equipment sector. Mergers among phone companies have amplified their size and purchasing power, while low-cost Asian companies have squeezed the profits of their Western counterparts. Last year, Alcatel and Lucent agreed to merge in an $11.6 billion deal, which many analysts say forced players like Avaya and Nortel to ally to stay competitive. Some analysts had seen an Avaya-Nortel pairing as a good fit. But the companies’ overlap in product offerings make integration difficult, analysts said. Next Article in Business (13 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Is Said to Be Exploring a Sale of All or Some of Itself Next Article in Business (13 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/sports/othersports/04racing.html?ex=1338609600&en=178eceda5a948977&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Sheik Buys Breeding Rights to Street Sense - New York Times Sheik Buys Breeding Rights to Street Sense Calvin Borel riding Street Sense to victory in the Kentucky Derby. The colt finished second in the Preakness. June 4, 2007 Sheik Mohammed bin Rashid al-Maktoum&#8217;s breeding operation has bought the breeding rights of the winner Street Sense and will stand him at a farm in Kentucky when his racing career is over. Darley America, the United States arm of the breeding operation, also bought the breeding rights to Hard Spun, who finished second in the Derby and third in the Preakness Stakes. &#8220;Street Sense and Hard Spun are the two most thrilling horses of their generation, each blessed with remarkable, exceptional gifts,&#8221; Dan Pride, chief executive of Darley America, said in a statement posted on the farm&#8217;s Web site. &#8220;They&#8217;ve achieved so much, and impressed so much, both in victory and also in defeat. It will be an enormous privilege to take charge of their stud careers. They are both so deeply talented that it&#8217;s easy to see how they could each leave a lasting impression on the breed.&#8221; The two colts will join 11 stallions, including Street Sense&#8217;s father, Street Cry, at Jonabell Farm in Lexington, Ky. Sheik Mohammed, the ruler of Dubai, has more than 4,000 acres in the bluegrass of Kentucky, where he has aggressively stepped up his breeding operation for many reasons, not the least of which is to win the Derby. Neither horse is expected to retire until after its 3-year-old campaign. Hard Spun will race in the Belmont Stakes on Saturday. Street Sense, beaten by a head by Curlin in the Preakness, will not race again until August. His trainer, Carl Nafzger, says the colt&#8217;s next race will be the Travers Stakes at Saratoga Race Course. He will also run in the $5 million Breeders&#8217; Cup Classic in October at Monmouth Park in New Jersey. Pride, Nafzger and Street Sense&#8217;s owner, Jim Tafel, did not return telephone calls. There is little doubt that Sheik Mohammed paid generously for Street Sense. Last year, his representatives offered $17 million to the owner of Nobiz Like Shobiz, Elizabeth Valando, after his first race. She turned him down. Tafel also had overtures from the sheik to purchase Street Sense as a 2-year-old. In addition to Street Cry, Darley America owns the colt&#8217;s mother, Bedazzle, having paid an undisclosed amount for her from a group that included Nafzger. Not only is Street Sense an impeccably bred Derby winner, but he was also named the 2-year-old male champion last year after a runaway victory in the Breeders&#8217; Cup Juvenile. He commanded a premium, much like Smarty Jones, the last Derby winner retired to stud. Smarty Jones was undefeated before losing for the first time in the Belmont. Smarty Jones&#8217;s owners, Roy and Pat Chapman, sold 50 percent of his breeding rights for more than $20 million to Three Chimneys Farm. Next Article in Sports (16 of 26) &#x00bb; Need Sense (Race Horse) Maktoum, Mohammed Bin Rashid Al- Next Article in Sports (16 of 26) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Go Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/worldbusiness/04merge.html?ex=1338609600&en=fb23c00a36d4a521&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Qiagen to Buy Digene, Maker of Tests for Cancer-Causing Virus - New York Times Qiagen to Buy Digene, Maker of Tests for Cancer-Causing Virus June 4, 2007 , a Dutch maker of tools for gene research, has agreed to buy the for $1.6 billion in shares and cash to gain tests for a virus that causes cervical Digene investors will get $61.25 a share, 37 percent more than Friday’s closing price. Digene, based in Gaithersburg, Md., produces the only test for that has been approved in Europe and the United States, Qiagen said yesterday. The two companies have worked together for more than 10 years. The human papilloma virus, or H.P.V., is linked to about 70 percent of cervical cancer cases. have developed vaccines for the illness, which is the second-most-common cancer among women after , and kills 250,000 women a year. The market for an H.P.V. test is worth more than $1 billion, the companies said. The purchase gives Qiagen “instantaneous market and technology leadership” in molecular diagnostics and will be “a catalyst for growth,” Peer M. Schatz, chief executive of Qiagen, said. Digene’s H.P.V. test is often done in labs that also use Qiagen products, the companies said. Qiagen sells sample and testing technologies used to research , RNA and proteins. The products are used by drug makers, academic research labs and medical clinics. The purchase will add as much as $60 million to sales in the fourth quarter and between $260 million and $270 million to revenue next year, Qiagen said. The deal will add as much as 4 cents to adjusted earnings a share next year and will be “significantly accretive” thereafter. Pretax cost savings will be $35 million to $45 million a year. The company does not expect significant changes in the work force, Mr. Schatz. The company said that it expected total sales to increase to more than $800 million next year. On Feb. 13, Qiagen forecast revenue for this year of as much as $535 million. Digene shareholders can choose between the cash offer or 3.545 of Qiagen’s stock for each of their shares. Qiagen expects Digene shareholders to own about 22 percent of its stock on a fully diluted basis after the transaction. The transaction, which is supported by both boards, is expected to be completed before the end of September. Mr. Schatz will remain chief executive, and Roland Sackers of Qiagen will remain chief financial officer. Daryl J. Faulkner, Digene’s chief executive, will serve as co-head of the steering committee overseeing the integration. The company’s United States headquarters will be in Maryland. Qiagen now has operations in Valencia, Calif. Next Article in Business (14 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Papilloma Virus (HPV) Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Next Article in Business (14 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/05/business/05bizcourt.html Supreme Court Rules in Favor of Insurance Companies - New York Times Supreme Court Rules in Favor of Insurance Companies THE ASSOCIATED PRESS Published: June 5, 2007 WASHINGTON, June 4 (AP) — The Supreme Court sided with two insurance companies Monday in a case involving alleged violations of the Fair Credit Reporting Act. The law requires insurance companies and other businesses to notify customers who are charged more because of their credit ratings. In a unanimous decision, the justices said the Geico General Insurance Company did not violate the law and that Safeco might have, but did not do so recklessly. The insurance industry said a decision against it could have subjected companies to billions of dollars in punitive damages for failing to notify customers. To find liability, a company’s conduct must be more than “merely careless,” wrote Justice David Souter. Justice Souter said that a company’s conduct must entail an unjustifiably high risk of harm that is either known to a company or is so obvious that it should have been known. Overturning an appeals court decision, the Supreme Court adopted a notification requirement favored by the industry. The standard limits the circumstances in which customers must be told their premiums are higher because of their credit ratings. Thirteen state insurance commissioners said that a lower threshhold for proving liability, adopted by the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit in San Francisco, would motivate compliance with the law. The appeals court and lawyers for consumers said they must be notified any time they pay more than the lowest rate available to customers with the very best credit scores. “Geico has the better position,” the Supreme Court said. Geico did not owe a prospective customer such notification, the court said. The company had offered him a rate that was the one he would have received if his credit score had not been taken into account. Safeco did not notify two of its customers because it thought the law did not apply to initial applications, a mistake that left the company in violation of the law. “The company was not reckless in falling down on its duty,” Justice Souter wrote. Under a more expansive notification standard, Safeco would be required to send adverse action notices to 80 percent of the company’s new customers, Maureen Mahoney, a lawyer defending the two companies, said at arguments in the Supreme Court in January. At Geico, just 10 percent of new customers qualify for the top tier of credit, Ms. Mahoney added. Next Article in Business (4 of 20) &#x00bb; Need Show Their Doubts On State Law On Holocaust Court May Review Health Insurance Case Policyholders Push for Owners' Rights as More Insurers Go Public New Bill on Patients' Rights Is Both Hailed and Criticized Next Article in Business (4 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky George Washington Bronze Portrait Bust Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/worldbusiness/04cnd-chinastox.html Chinese Stocks Fall After Government Increases Taxes - New York Times Chinese Stocks Fall After Government Increases Taxes June 4, 2007 SHANGHAI, June 4 — China’s stock market tumbled again today in one of the biggest sell-offs in years. It followed the government’s move last week to impose higher taxes on stock trades. Skip to next paragraph Stock investors looked at the price monitor at a securities company in Shanghai, China. The New York Times The sell-off today in Shanghai was one of the largest declines in a decade, and was nearly comparable to the sharp drop in February this year when the Shanghai Composite fell 9.9 percent after a phenomenal rise. The benchmark Shanghai Stock Exchange fell 330 points, or 8.3 percent, to close today at 3,670.40. The country’s other major index, the Shenzhen Composite, dropped 7.9 percent to close at 1,039.89. Shares in other parts of Asia fared better, including Tokyo and Hong Kong, where stock prices rose modestly. Analysts and economists have been warning for months about a bubble building in the Chinese stock market. But prices have continued to soar on unprecedented demand for stocks, fueled by the opening of hundreds of thousands of new share accounts every day. The government has repeatedly warned investors about the risks of a downturn, and even moved to calm the markets. Most downturns have been only temporary. Now, however, shares have fallen in what looks like a more permanent correction since the government announced last Wednesday that it would raise its stamp duty tax to 0.3 percent from 0.1 percent. Frank Song, director of the center for Chinese Financial Research at Hong Kong University, said: “This is somewhat expected. Last week’s policy change is a strong signal that the government will no longer tolerate this rising bubble.” The government had said earlier that it had no plans to increase the stamp duty. But it then reversed course and announced an immediate implementation. Shares tumbled 6.5 percent last Wednesday, then bounced back on Thursday before falling again on Friday. Today’s fall saw a massive downturn in prices that peeled back weeks of huge gains and left the benchmark Shanghai Composite down 15.3 percent from its high of 4,334.92 over just three sessions. More than half of the stocks in the CSI 300 plunged by the 10 percent daily limit. “It is not clear whether the market will continue to decline,” Mr. Song said. “It may depend on whether investors will continue to open new accounts.” Concern that the government would raise taxes again on share trading was heightened Friday after figures showed the stamp duty increase failed to deter investors from opening accounts. More than 400,000 brokerage accounts were set up on May 30, exceeding this quarter’s daily average of about 300,000, official figures showed. The number of accounts last week topped 100 million for the first time. Few analysts are forecasting a bear market, but many had been warning of more government measures and a sharp downturn. There are fears, however, among analysts and the government that a severe correction in prices could lead to a rout, creating widespread anger and perhaps even unrest in China. When the government reversed course last week and imposed higher taxes on stock trades, investors vented their anger online and there were even reports that several government web sites, including a finance ministry site, had been hacked into and taken down for a time. Bloomberg News contributed to this report. Next Article in Business (10 of 20) &#x00bb; Get early access to articles from this Sunday's Times. Sign up for TimesSelect free for 14 days. DAYS; China&#8217;s Investors Pull Back, but U.S. Bull Is Unfazed Tax Increase Batters Chinese Stocks, but There&#8217;s Little Wider Damage Chinese Shares Plunge 6.5 Percent In a Switch, China Triples the Tax on Stock Trades Next Article in Business (10 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Blue Crane or Heron, Plate 307 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04carr.html?ex=1338609600&en=fa7ac591edfa6c55&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Mr. Murdoch Comes Round for Tea - New York Times Mr. Murdoch Comes Round for Tea June 4, 2007 The meeting later today between and the Bancroft family that could determine the fate of Dow Jones & Company , publisher of The Wall Street Journal, would seem to be a very modern media moment. But the specter of it — all forced smiles and cleared throats, the discovery of common values whether there are any or not — brings to mind a 19th-century comedy of manners that would be funny, except it is not. The family’s first reaction to Mr. Murdoch’s $5 billion offer was all pursed lips and tut-tuts. Unthinkable, really, for such a man to be offered custody of the family’s most precious asset. He is, after all, a bit of a brute, a man of enormous capital, but very sketchy provenance. “The last man in the world whom I could ever be prevailed upon to marry,” Elizabeth called the well-situated Mr. Darcy in “Pride and Prejudice.” But Mr. Darcy wore her down, erasing her doubts and easing her suspicions by gradually revealing his character and suggesting that the stories she had heard about him were just that. We are nearing the end of a similar makeover of Mr. Murdoch. A coarse, self-seeking tabloid king has become a potential savior, a man with journalism in his blood and money in his wallet who will rescue Dow Jones from being blown away by forces beyond its control. Mr. Murdoch will pass the horns-and-tail test with ease. Anybody who has met him can testify to his easy and substantial personal charm. (Wouldn’t you just kill to watch Mr. Murdoch put on the hula skirt and coconuts and dance his way into the hearts of the Bancrofts?) Mr. Murdoch will reiterate his love of newspapers, perhaps not mentioning that it ranks a bit behind his lust for power. Trust one of the world’s most artful deal makers to evince a wholesale grasp of the newspaper’s importance and a retail grasp of individual family concerns. As the head of a diversified media concern, he will speak with a great deal of insight and portentousness about the challenge posed by the Thomson/Reuters merger. And most critically, there will be a vow of chastity and fealty to the newspaper’s editorial independence, perhaps even dropping retired editor Paul E. Steiger’s name as a suitable head of an editorial board that will serve as an in-house Church Lady. “Rupert Murdoch, of all people, knows what to do. He is quite worldly,” said Letitia Baldrige, a longtime arbiter of social and business graces. “It is a bit of a social ballet, but the outcome is hardly in doubt. The family would not agree to see him unless they were capitulating. Now they just have much face to save in front of family, friends, employees and the public.” Manners aside, someone will eventually get around to addressing the elephant in the room. To wit, “If we take your filthy billions, will we eventually go down in the Book of Life as the people who sold the world’s most important arbiter of capitalism to a cad?” Put more delicately, will owning The Wall Street Journal change Mr. Murdoch, or will his ownership change the newspaper? Journalism history, let alone Mr. Murdoch’s, is a little short on examples of owners who were ennobled by the heralded properties they purchased. “Newspapers are transformed by people, not the other way around,” said David Nasaw, a professor of history at the City University of New York Reporters and editors in The Journal’s newsroom are girding themselves for the kind of tectonic change they have covered in almost every other industry. A few pointed out that it was the paper’s Web site, , that first published the leaked statement detailing the family’s change of heart while some family members were still in a Dow Jones board meeting arguing about its implications. “You have to wonder if we put ourselves in play by leaking that,” one journalist said. But their suspicion supposes that the family was willing to walk away, and there isn’t much evidence for that. Even Michael Elefante, the influential family trustee and Dow Jones director who had been reflexively opposed to a sale, said it may be time for a realpolitik look at the ’s offer, according to The Wall Street Journal on Saturday. Mr. Elefante — in our 19th-century novel, he plays the role of the vicar — and others were most likely influenced by a presentation from Richard F. Zannino, the current chief executive, which showed revenue bar charts being ground to nothing as an independent enterprise, versus the bird-in-hand bid of Mr. Murdoch, replete with massive golden egg. In fact, the Bancrofts’ delayed decision to leap into his arms simply reflected a lack of communication common to all families, even ones that don’t control big heaving media enterprises. The elders felt that they were speaking for the many, and it turned out that they were speaking only for themselves. Younger members who have watched other media companies diversify into a dynamic future while their own company sat on its noble laurels fired up a criss-cross of e-mail messages fomenting dissent. As has happened with the Cowleses (The Star Tribune) and the Chandlers (The Los Angeles Times), subsequent generations began to notice that civic pride of place was not doing much for their net worth. “I don’t think it matters one little bit what he says in that room,” said the scion of another endowed media family who did not want to be seen as poking his nose into another family’s business. “Here is someone who believes in The Wall Street Journal, believes in the future of newspapers, who is willing to pay a price no one else will.” In this instance, it will go easier because it is not a referendum on any family member’s skill as an operator. Unlike The and The New York Times, no blood relation actually runs the place, so they won’t have to see someone they dispossessed at the next family Christmas party. It will be all nice-to-see-you’s, and, hey, isn’t that a gorgeous new diamond necklace? Mr. Murdoch has already made the Bancrofts much richer, just by declaring his ardor. Today, he will make the sort of cuddly noises that will soothe the remaining skeptics in the family, trading lucre for legitimacy. But it all seems a bit foregone, like a hastily arranged rehearsal dinner for a shotgun wedding. He had them at $5 billion. Next Article in Business (9 of 20) &#x00bb; Get early access to articles from this Sunday's Times. Sign up for TimesSelect free for 14 days. Promises and Desires Some on Journal Staff Voice Wish That Different Bidder Would Emerge How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Dow Jones & Co Next Article in Business (9 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky NYT Keepsake Front Page Reprint Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04weather.html Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial - New York Times Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It’s Controversial Erik S. Lesser for The New York Times Heidi Cullen, the Weather Channel&#146;s resident climate expert. June 4, 2007 ATLANTA — For 25 years, they have been talking about the weather nonstop. Skip to next paragraph Erik S. Lesser for The New York Times The Weather Channel&#146;s president, Debora J. Wilson, says it is &#147;good business&#148; to discuss climate change. At The Weather Channel, which has its headquarters here, that talk once amounted to a reliable humdrum of forecasts and storm coverage in the United States and abroad. In addition to broadcasting weather reports, the channel has thrived by selling its utilitarian but appealing content to newspapers, radio stations and Web sites, and by developing specialty programs around everyone’s favorite elevator-ride conversation topic. “The weather is not controversial, but people are very engaged with it,” Debora J. Wilson, the president of the network, said in a recent interview in her office. The daily weather forecast is rarely controversial, but the broader topic of has generated no end of debate. As the network has seen its primary subject turn into a hot-button issue, it has had to grapple with how it wants to address it — and has decided not to tread gingerly. The issue started influencing the network’s coverage in a new way after Hurricane Katrina hit the Gulf coast in 2005, and has been shaping its programming decisions. “If The Weather Channel isn’t talking about climate change and global warming, who is?” said Kaye Zusmann, the vice president for program strategy and development for the network. “It’s our mandate.” The network, which had been gearing up for the opening of hurricane season on Friday, sees the engagement with the issues surrounding climate change as important for content and for business. “We have a point of view, and we think it’s really important to articulate why it’s happening. Secondarily, it’s good business,” said Ms. Wilson, the network president. “Many consumers want to know, ‘What should I do?’ ” The lightning rod for controversy, so to speak, is Heidi Cullen, the network’s resident climate expert. In December, she raised the ire of Fox News and others by writing on her blog that the American Meteorological Society should not give its “seal of approval” to any meteorologist who “can’t speak to the fundamental science of climate change.” (There are now more than 1,700 comments on that one post.) Dr. Cullen, a tiny woman who speaks with conviction, said she believed that people were “finally seeing climate connected to weather,” but that a lot of information still needs to be disseminated. “If you turn on the local forecast, you wouldn’t necessarily know that global warming exists,” she said. Far from being intimidated by the political backlash, Dr. Cullen and executives at the channel say they have embraced the issue of global warming. Dr. Cullen is host of the weekly show “Forecast Earth,” formerly named “The Climate Code” where she has entertained such guests as former Vice President . She also appears on the channel’s other programming with segments on hybrid taxicabs in New York City and the development of more fuel-efficient aircraft. The network’s other programs have also directly engaged the elephant in the room — or, in this case, the polar bear on the melting ice cap: a recent anniversary roundup of “The 100 Biggest Weather Moments” listed global warming as No. 1. And the network is training its meteorologists so that they can discuss long-term trends as well as five-day forecasts. “Weather information on an on-demand basis is the foundation of what we do, and a deeper experience on an emotional level brings us to life.” Ms. Wilson said. Besides sections devoted to travel, golf and pets (yes, pets), the weather.com Web site also has interactive features like blogs and user-submitted videos — as well as consumer-information sections that give users tips on how to prepare for a severe storm, or how to reduce a carbon footprint. Recent developments, from the strong scientific consensus about global warming to President Bush’s proposal last week to set goals for cutting global emissions, seem to have made the network’s embrace of the topic less risky and more closely tied to its service-journalism mission. “I think the debate for most Americans has moved away from, ‘Is global warming happening?’ to ‘What do I do?’ ” Ms. Zusmann said. “The viewers want what they always want; they want good television.” And rather than jeopardizing its relationships with potential advertisers, which include car and airline companies, the network’s focus on global warming might make it more attractive, said Jason Maltby, president and co-executive director for national broadcast at MindShare North America, an advertising agency owned by “There might be some categories that shy away from global warming, but I don’t think that would have an overall large impact,” Mr. Maltby said. The Weather Channel is owned by , a privately held company controlled by the Batten family of Norfolk, Va., which also owns daily newspapers and other media properties. Ms. Wilson said that she is often asked whether, in the frenzy of media mergers, her network might be sold to a larger corporation. “Every media conglomeration has approached Landmark, and there’s never been a yes,” she said, adding that after working through the “hard early years,” Landmark has no plans to lose the channel. “We actually think that we’re stronger being independent,” she said, adding that she is glad to avoid the “distractions” that would come with being part of a larger company. “We like focusing on what we do.” In one of its most significant investments, The Weather Channel celebrated its silver anniversary by breaking ground on a new $50 million high-definition video studio, which will adjoin its current building. All programming will eventually be available in high-definition when the studio is fully operational, by October 2008. The Weather Channel continues to cut deals with advertisers and media companies, like the online portals sponsors a section of the weather.com Web site that gives tips on fishing conditions at various lakes, and WCBS, a local New York television affiliate, supplies The Weather Channel with local videos. Under a partnership with BusinessWeek, The Weather Channel’s “First Outlook” program offers a look at how the weather affects business. The main weather.com Web site, established in 1995, regularly lands on Nielsen’s list of top 10 to 15 sites, attracting 39 million unique monthly visitors in April, according to Nielsen/NetRatings. Of the channel’s 800 employees, over 200 work on the Web site; by contrast, the channel has only about 125 dedicated meteorologists. Ms. Wilson acknowledged that ratings for The Weather Channel were down in 2006 from 2005 — she attributed the decline to the comedown after coverage of Hurricane Katrina — but said that revenues are “growing fairly robustly.” As other television channels and their advertisers struggle to retain viewers in the age of DVRs, The Weather Channel has largely remained immune. Last year, the channel entered into a partnership with , an agency that is part of the , guaranteeing minute-to-minute ratings; at this year’s television upfronts, the network extended that guarantee to qualified other advertisers and agencies. Viewers, Ms. Wilson said, need to keep watching. “It’s perishable information,” she said, “It’s really Next Article in Business (3 of 20) &#x00bb; Need The Barometric Pressure Is Just the Beginning HURRICANE KATRINA: THE WEB LOG; A 'Weather Nerd' in Indiana Sent a Warning to the Mayor THE MEDIA BUSINESS: ADVERTISING; A custom campaign by a cruise ship line will run only during cold snaps and snowstorms. NEWS WATCH: MESSAGING; Fair or Stormy Weather Ahead? Phone Alerts Let You Know Next Article in Business (3 of 20) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky The North Pole Was Here by Andrew C. Revkin Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/business/media/04nbc.html?ex=1338609600&en=32220089164f2325&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss NBC Names Program Executive to Head TV Studio - New York Times NBC Names Program Executive to Head TV Studio June 4, 2007 NBC Universal took another step in revamping its television entertainment operations yesterday, appointing Katherine Pope as president of its television production studio, NBC Universal Television. The move came less than a week after it hired the independent producer Ben Silverman as a co-chairman, with Marc Graboff, of the television group, with authority over both the entertainment division of the NBC network and the television studio. That appointment, which coincided with the removal of Kevin Reilly as president of NBC Entertainment, raised questions about the future of Ms. Pope, who had been the top program development executive for NBC and was one of the most highly regarded young executives at the network. But NBC Universal acted quickly to answer those questions by giving Ms. Pope authority over the studio, which is producing hit shows like “Heroes” and “The Office” for NBC and “House” for Fox. Ms. Pope, who is in her mid-30s, will succeed Angela Bromstad, who headed the studio before she stepped away from the job several months ago. Ms. Bromstad is expected to be appointed to another NBC Universal position, perhaps heading its international division in London. Ms. Pope said in a telephone interview yesterday that she expected to “hit the ground running” in her new position, speaking to writers and producers and instigating new programs as quickly as possible. She said she has been impressed by Mr. Silverman’s passion and vision. “He’s like a hurricane of energy and ideas,” she said. The studio “will take risks both monetarily and creatively,” Ms. Pope said. Asked what that might entail, she said she would encourage writers to bring new ideas and would give them latitude in carrying out those ideas. The studio hopes to commission pilots as early as this summer, she said. NBC continues to trail the other broadcast networks and needs hit programs. Ms Pope said she saw the studio as “having two clients, the writers and NBC.” Beyond the quest for a new generation of hits, Ms. Pope said she and Mr. Silverman had discussed “the larger questions of where the business is going.” That, she said, means “thinking about new ideas, new avenues of distribution and the necessity to think globally about our content.” Next Article in Business (17 of 20) &#x00bb; Need in Shake-Up, Names Outsider to a Top Position NBC Brings In Programming Help '60 Minutes' Creator Takes On Rockettes TV SPORTS; Network Shuffle Leaves N.H.L. Out in the Cold Next Article in Business (17 of 20) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear Google Keeps Tweaking Its Search Engine Your Money: The 6 Percent Solution: Skip Real Estate Agents Advertising: Publishers Creating Their Own In-House Ad Agencies Career Couch: For the Chronically Late, It&#8217;s Not a Power Trip Everybody Talks About the Weather; All of a Sudden, It&#8217;s Controversial Ping: Genius and Misfit Aren&#8217;t Synonyms, or Are They? A Theme Song for Clinton: &#8216;I&#8217;m a Believer&#8217; vs. &#8216;Cold as Ice&#8217; A Hot-Selling Weapon, an Inviting Target Your Money: Advice to All You Graduates: Let&#39;s Start With That Daily Latte . . . Go Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Dow Jones Says It Will Consider Options for Sale Grandma Cooks, They Deliver How the Bancrofts Decided to Talk With Murdoch Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Overbooking, Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Go the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/technology/04chip.html Specialized Software Maker Is Said to Be in Buyout Talks - New York Times Specialized Software Maker Is Said to Be in Buyout Talks MICHAEL J. de la MERCED Published: June 4, 2007 , one of the largest makers of the software used to design computer chips, is in talks with at least two buyout firms about a possible sale of the company, two people close to the matter said yesterday. The company has held talks with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts and the Blackstone Group, and other suitors may emerge, those people said. But they warned that a deal may not happen because of the complicated risks in the company's business. Other private equity firms took a look at Cadence but passed. Representatives for Blackstone, Kohlberg Kravis and Cadence declined to comment. A deal for Cadence would be one of the biggest moves by private equity firms into technology, a sector they have avoided because of its volatility and need for capital. But as buyout firms have grown bolder and more flush with cash, they may be betting that they can still wring out lucrative returns. Though both Kohlberg Kravis and Blackstone have invested in technology firms before — most recently, Kohlberg bought the — private equity has rarely approached a firm as steeped in the arcana of technology as Cadence. Another question that faces Cadence's would-be buyers is its rich valuation. The company, based in San Jose, Calif., has a market value of about $6.4 billion, making it an expensive bet. Founded in 1983, Cadence has since become one of the largest makers of chip design software, partly through a string of acquisitions. Since 2004, it has bought four companies, including the software developer Verisity in a $315 million deal. It has also invested heavily in other Silicon Valley companies. And in 2006 it spent $1 billion in stock buybacks. Cadence is also regarded as one of the most innovative chip software makers. This year the company said that it would introduce a new approach to chip-making design, one that lays wires diagonally as well as horizontally and vertically. The new process would make its designs faster and more efficient, the company has said. Yet even that poses a dilemma for private equity. In such a highly technical field, research and development is crucial to establishing dominance, which requires large amounts of spending. And companies like Cadence and its largest rivals, and Synopsis, must innovate quickly as the pace of chip making accelerates. Cadence has already lost support from , the biggest name in microchips, which has invested in , a smaller rival which Intel said had the time-to-market advantage. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles Next Article in Technology (3 of 23) &#x00bb; Need NEWS; CADENCE DESIGN TO BUY SIMPLEX FOR $300 MILLION Technology Briefing | Software: Mentor Graphics Wins a Round Criminal Charges Against Avant Dismissed AVANT TO BUY TECHNOLOGY MODELING FOR $150 MILLION Cadence Design Systems Incorporated Mergers, Acquisitions and Divestitures Next Article in Technology (3 of 23) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Akeem Olajuwon - 1983 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/technology/04marley.html Tiny Bit of Hardware With Marley Software - New York Times Tiny Bit of Hardware With Marley Software ANDREW ADAM NEWMAN Published: June 4, 2007 When reggae singer Bob Marley released “Exodus” in 1977, fans most likely bought it as a vinyl record, then over the decades went on to purchase it on CD or to download it. But those same boomers now can buy the album in a format that will impress even their computer-using children: on a U.S.B. flash drive. Skip to next paragraph Adrian Boot/Fifty-Six Hope Road Music The 30th anniversary release of Bob Marley&#146;s &#147;Exodus&#148; will also come on U.S.B. flash drives. For the 30th anniversary of “Exodus,” which Time magazine called the best album of the 20th Century, Island Records, a subsidiary of the Universal Music Group, produced 4,000 of the gizmos, which are loaded not only with the original 10 songs but also with additional tracks and concert video footage of Marley, who died in 1981. The memory sticks, which plug in to a computer’s U.S.B. ports, will be priced at $44.99. The high price reflects not only the extra content on the memory stick, but also the fact that the stick itself can be reused for other purposes. U.S.B. flash drives are generally sold empty, for the purpose of transferring data from one computer to another, but with the Bob Marley U.S.B. stick — as with others that store music — the entertainment can be downloaded to a computer and the device wiped clean. While the flash-drive format appears unlikely to reshape the recording industry anytime soon, a few bands are experimenting with it. Last year the Canadian band the Barenaked Ladies released its album “The Barenaked Ladies Are Me” on U.S.B. sticks along with CDs. So far the memory-stick version, at $25, has sold nearly 1,000 copies in North America, compared with 166,000 CDs, which cost $18.98. “By no means is it overtaking the traditionalists, but it’s a good start,” said Adam Smith, who manages artists at the Nettwerk Music Group, the band’s Canadian label. On recent tours, the Barenaked Ladies have been recording live performances and making them available on U.S.B. sticks at concert sites right after the last song is played. So far the band has sold about 3,000, for $40 each. That is more expensive than a CD, but buying music on a flash drive is akin to buying a Big Mac on a piece of Fiestaware. Mr. Smith pointed out that, unlike CDs, once the songs on a flash drive are transferred to a computer, they can be erased from the device, which can then be used to store data. Some flash drives sell for more than $30. “Once you upload the music to your computer, you have a piece of hardware,” Mr. Smith said. “If you’re buying a U.S.B. stick, the cost is not so much different to buy it loaded with music from your favorite band.” ANDREW ADAM NEWMAN Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles Next Article in Technology (12 of 23) &#x00bb; Need and the Internet Next Article in Technology (12 of 23) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The New York Times Company
